S.  HRG.  110–434 
SERIAL 110–37 

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  INVESTIGATION 
OF  THE  NASA  INSPECTOR  GENERAL 

JOINT  HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, 

AND RELATED SCIENCES 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON 

COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND 

TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 

AND THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INVESTIGATIONS 

AND OVERSIGHT 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON 

SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 
UNITED STATES HOUSE OF 

REPRESENTATIVES 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

ON 

JUNE  7,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 

Transportation  and  the  House  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology 

( 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

41–101 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2008 

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SPACE,  AERONAUTICS,  AND  RELATED  SCIENCES 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 

(II) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

HOUSE  COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman 
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois 
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas 
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California 
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado 
DAVID  WU,  Oregon 
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington 
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina 
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois,  Vice  Chairman 
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas 
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona 
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California 
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California 
PAUL  E.  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania 
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon 
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey 
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah 
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas 
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky 
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri 
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana 
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana 
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona 
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio 

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas,  Ranking 

Republican  Member 

F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER,  JR., 

Wisconsin 

LAMAR  SMITH,  Texas 
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California 
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland 
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan 
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma 
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois 
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri 
JO  BONNER,  Alabama 
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida 
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas 
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington 
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas 
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida 
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia 
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California 
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska 
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia 
ROBERT  E.  LATTA,  Ohio 
ROBERT  J.  WITTMAN,  Virginia 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  INVESTIGATIONS  AND  OVERSIGHT 

BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina,  Chairman 
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois 
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas 
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon 
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey 
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington 
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Ex  Officio 

F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER,  JR., 

Wisconsin,  Ranking  Republican  Member 

DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California 
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington 
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia 
RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas,  Ex  Officio 

(III) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 7, 2007  .................................................................................
Statement of Representative Feeney 
.....................................................................
Prepared  statement  submitted  by  Representative  Feeney  for  Hon.  F.  James 
Sensenbrenner, Jr., U.S. Representative from Wisconsin  ................................
Statement of Representative Gordon  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Hutchison  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator McCaskill  .............................................................................
Statement of Representative Miller  .......................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Brian,  Danielle,  Executive  Director,  Project  On  Government  Oversight 
(POGO)  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Carrington,  Lance,  Deputy  Assistant  Inspector  General  Investigations,  Office 
of the Inspector General, U.S. Postal Service and Former Assistant Inspec-
tor General for Investigations, NASA 
................................................................
Carson,  Kevin  J.,  Assistant  Inspector  General  for  Audits  and  Inspections, 
Office of Inspector General, Government Printing Office and Former Deputy 
Assistant Inspector General for Audits, NASA 
.................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Cobb, Hon. Robert W., Inspector General, NASA  .................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Herzog, Debra, Senior Attorney, Office of Inspector General, U.S. Postal Serv-
ice,  and  Former  Deputy  Assistant  Inspector  General  for  Investigations, 
NASA  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Light,  Dr.  Paul  C.,  Paulette  Goddard  Professor  of  Public  Service,  Robert 
F. Wagner School of Public Service, New York University  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Donohue,  Hon.  Kenneth  M.,  Inspector  General,  Department  of  Housing  and 
Urban Development, prepared statement  ..........................................................
Excerpts  from  Record  of  Investigation  of  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb,  Office  of 

Inspector General dated August 30, 2006  .......................................................... 116 

Excerpts  from  Semiannual  Report,  Office  of  Inspector  General,  NASA,  dated 

April–September 30, 2004  ................................................................................... 112 

Excerpts  from  transcript  of  interview  of  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb,  conducted 
by Office of Inspector General, Department of Housing and Urban Develop-
ment, dated June 27, 2006  .................................................................................. 113 
77 

Grassley, Hon. Chuck, U.S. Senator from Iowa, prepared statement  .................
Letter,  dated  August  15,  2003,  from  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb  to  Hon.  Sean 
O’Keefe  entitled  ‘‘Subject:  Observations  on  the  Independence  of  the  Colum-
bia Accident Investigation Board’’  ......................................................................
Policy  and  Procedures  for  Exercising  the  Authority  of  the  Integrity  Committee 
of the President’s Council on Integrity and Efficiency, dated April 24, 1997  ..
Quality  Standards  for  Federal  Offices  of  Inspector  General,  dated  October 
2003  .......................................................................................................................
Report  in  the  form  of  a  letter,  dated  January  22,  2007,  from  James  H. 
Burrus,  Jr.,  Chair,  Integrity  Committee  to  Hon.  Clay  Johnson  III,  Chair-
man, Integrity Committee, President’s Council on Integrity and Efficiency  .. 136 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Bill  Nelson  to  Hon.  Robert 
W. Cobb  .................................................................................................................

89 

84 

Page 
1 
7 

7 
3 
6 
42 
4 
1 

29 
31 

21 

9 
13 
53 
55 

17 
19 

24 
25 

79 

94 

81 

(V) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  INVESTIGATION 
OF  THE  NASA  INSPECTOR  GENERAL 

THURSDAY,  JUNE  7,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND RELATED 
SCIENCES, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, 

U.S. SENATE, 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON INVESTIGATIONS AND OVERSIGHT, 

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY, 

Washington, DC. 

The Subcommittees met, pursuant to notice, at 2:09 p.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bill  Nelson,  Chair-
man of the Senate Subcommittee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator NELSON. Good afternoon. 
Welcome  to  this  hearing,  on  a  matter  of  serious  concern  to  the 
respective committees on the misconduct, or alleged misconduct, of 
the  NASA  Inspector  General.  We  want  to  make  a  special  welcome 
to  our  colleagues  from  the  House  Science  Committee  and  its  Sub-
committee  on  Oversight  and  Investigations:  Chairman  Bart  Gor-
don,  the  Chairman  of  the  full  committee,  Chairman  Miller,  the 
Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  want  to  welcome  our  colleague 
from Florida, Congressman Feeney, who is sitting in for the Rank-
ing  Member,  Jim  Sensenbrenner;  and,  of  course,  our  colleague 
here,  Senator  Hutchison,  the  Ranking  Member  on  this  sub-
committee. 

In April, we received the results of the Integrity Committee’s in-
vestigation  of  the  NASA  Inspector  General,  Robert  Cobb.  That 
independent  panel  found  that  Mr.  Cobb  had  abused  his  office  and 
failed  to  maintain  the  appropriate  appearance  of  independence 
from the agency he is charged with monitoring. Those are the con-
clusions of the Integrity Committee. 

Based  on  these  conclusions  of  the  Integrity  Committee,  I  joined 
Chairman  Gordon  and  Chairman  Miller  in  calling  on  President 
Bush to remove Mr. Cobb from office. My position has not changed. 
However,  some  of  the  conduct  described  in  the  Integrity  Commit-
tee’s  report  is  so  disturbing  that  it  warrants  additional  investiga-
tion.  I  am  particularly  concerned  with  several  specific  instances  of 
Mr. Cobb’s misconduct: 

First,  in  2002,  foreign  computer  hackers  gained  access  to  sen-
sitive information on a NASA computer, including NASA’s most ad-

(1) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

vanced rocket engine designs, the worth of this information is esti-
mated  to  be  worth  $1.9  billion.  In  such  situations,  Federal  export 
control laws require notification to the U.S. State Department, but 
Mr. Cobb ignored the advice of his staff and repeatedly blocked at-
tempts to notify the State Department, for fear that the disclosure 
would be embarrassing to NASA. 

As Exhibit 3 shows, when the Department of Defense was finally 
asked  about  the  impact  of  this  incident,  they  reported  that  the  in-
formation  disclosed  may  allow  our  adversaries  to  develop  larger 
and  more  accurate  ballistic  missiles.  Who  are  those  adversaries? 
Adversaries  with  regard  to  rocket  design  are  almost  any  country, 
not  the  least  of  which  are  Russia,  China,  North  Korea,  and  now 
Iran. You get the picture. 

The  second  incident,  in  December  2004,  and  again  in  2005,  Mr. 
Cobb  delayed  execution  of  search  warrants  in  criminal  investiga-
tions after those warrants had been sworn by an assistant U.S. At-
torney  and  were  signed  by  a  Federal  judge.  The  question  of  ob-
struction of justice arises. 

The  third  example,  in  June  2002,  the  Space  Shuttle  Endeavor 
was launched with one of the two required range safety systems in-
operative. In order to launch, the launch criteria is that both must 
be operative. Despite the critical safety implications for NASA and 
the public, Mr. Cobb blocked a NASA OIG investigation of the inci-
dent,  deferring,  instead,  to  the  Air  Force,  even  when  it  became 
clear that the Air Force was not thoroughly investigating the mat-
ter. 

NASA is unique among Federal agencies, its mission is to expand 
the  boundaries  of  exploration,  push  the  limits  of  technology,  and 
broaden our understanding of our own planet and the universe. All 
of  these  activities  carry  considerable  risk.  In  many  cases  risk  that 
can  jeopardize  the  lives  of  NASA  employees,  and,  with  regard  to 
the range safety concerns, could jeopardize the populations of near-
by cities on the east coast of Florida. 

We’ve  had  too  much  experience  with  this,  with  mistakes  in  the 
past,  and  we  have  lost  two  Shuttles  and  14  astronaut  lives.  First 
in  1986  and  again  in  2003.  Investigators  from  those  tragic  events 
determined  that  a  key  contributor  to  the  death  of  those  14  astro-
nauts was a culture that discouraged employees from raising safety 
concerns. 

With  this  history  in  mind,  it’s  particularly  important  for  NASA 
employees  to  know  about  concerns  about  safety,  waste,  fraud,  and 
abuse, to know that all of that can be reported to a trustworthy in-
spector  general,  and  have  the  full  confidence  that  that  watchdog 
will  pursue  each  case  thoroughly,  professionally,  and  independ-
ently. 

The  investigations  of  the  two  Shuttle  tragedies  found  that,  in-
stead  of  communication  being  a  two-way  street,  it  was  from  the 
top, down; and the top management was not receiving the informa-
tion from the bottom, going up. 

Under  Mr.  Cobb’s  leadership,  the  Office  of  Inspector  General  at 
NASA  has  become  dysfunctional.  Fear  and  mistrust  permeate  the 
office.  More  than  half  of  the  experienced  professionals  in  the  office 
have left since Mr. Cobb’s arrival. The boundaries, or the firewalls, 
between the IG and the agency’s management have been trampled. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

The  evidence  shows  us  that  these  are  not  isolated  instances,  but 
that  a  pattern  of  misconduct  continues  even  today.  As  recently  as 
April  the  10th,  OIG  employees  raised  new  concerns  about  Mr. 
Cobb’s independence from NASA management, and the NASA gen-
eral counsel destroyed government records in a bungled attempt at 
damage control related to the Cobb investigation. 

Whistleblowers,  who  rely  on  the  OIG  to  voice  concerns  about 
agency  operations,  are  unwilling  to  come  forward,  knowing  that 
this  IG  will  not  respond  favorably,  and  may  even  allow  retaliation 
from management against them. 

Congress  depends  on  inspectors  general  as  the  first  line  of  over-
sight  at  government  agencies.  That’s  the  law.  Without  an  effective 
inspector  general  at  NASA,  we  have  no  choice  but  to  increase  the 
frequency and intensity of our own oversight activities. 

With each new revelation, I am more convinced that the current 
dysfunction  in  the  NASA  OIG  is  unrecoverable  under  the  current 
leadership. I am hopeful that the information learned today will be 
helpful in reconstituting an effective OIG at NASA after Mr. Cobb’s 
departure. 

Now,  under  the  procedures  that  we  have  set  up,  each  of  the  re-
spective  leaders  here  will  have  an  opening  statement,  and  I  would 
turn  to  Chairman  Bart  Gordon,  of  the  House  Science  and  Tech-
nology Committee. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BART GORDON, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM TENNESSEE 

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Nelson.  You  know,  it 
was  22  years  since  I  was  able  to  call  you  that,  when  you  were 
Chairman  of  the  Space  Subcommittee  in  the  House  of  Representa-
tives. And so, I’m glad to refer to you as that again. 

And, although this is not unprecedented, it’s certainly unusual to 
have a joint hearing, which I think demonstrates, to the public and 
to  NASA,  that  this  a  very  serious  issue,  and  that  we  take  it  very 
seriously,  and  we  are  very  concerned  that  NASA  is  being  com-
promised. 

In  2002,  Mr.  Cobb  took  on  a  very  difficult  job  when  he  agreed 
to  sign  up  to  be  Inspector  General.  IGs  are  probably  held  to  the 
highest  standard  of  any  office  in  government.  The  expectations  of 
integrity  are  so  high  because  the  job  we  set  for  IGs  is  so  chal-
lenging. 

The  purpose  of  the  IGs,  as  stated  in  the  1978  Inspector  General 
Act, is to act as effective watchdogs on agencies from the inside by 
creating  independent  and  objective  offices.  Those  offices  are 
charged  with  recommending  policies  to  promote  efficiency  and  ef-
fective  administration  of  government,  and  preventing—detecting 
fraud,  waste,  and  abuse.  It  was  expected  that  they  would  leave  no 
stone unturned in searching for improper behavior. 

It’s impossible to do that job if there is even a hint of misconduct 
on  the  part  of  the  IG.  And  the  lack  of  independence  is  a  sure  sign 
of  a  lack  of  objectiveness.  If  you  view  yourself  as  part  of  an  agen-
cy’s  management  team,  you  can’t  be  an  effective  check  on  that 
management  team.  And  it’s  very  clear  that,  from  the  very  begin-
ning, Mr. Cobb saw himself as a part of Sean O’Keefe’s team. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

Senator  Grassley  was  to  testify  here  today,  and  I  would  like  to 
quote,  at  some  length,  from  his  testimony.  Senator  Grassley  noted 
this,  ‘‘I’m  alarmed  by  the  evidence  uncovered  by  the  PCIE  inves-
tigation. In fact, it appears that Mr. Cobb did not act in a manner 
consistent  with  the  spirit  and  intent  of  that  statute.  According  to 
the  evidence,  he  was  used—he  has  used  this  important  position  to 
interfere  in  the  activities  and  conduct  conducted  by  the  investiga-
tive  and  audit  divisions  within  his  office  for  reasons  that  appear, 
at  the  very  least,  improper.  In  fact,  Mr.  Cobb  repeatedly  told  em-
ployees that one of his priorities was to avoid embarrassing NASA. 
Evidence also indicates that he shied away from bringing investiga-
tors against—investigations against high-level NASA officials.’’ 

Senator Grassley continues. This is Senator Grassley, ‘‘It is clear 
to  me  that  our  ability  to  trust  Mr.  Cobb  to  effectively  manage  the 
Office  of  Inspector  General  and  the  vital  functions  that  it  seeks  to 
carry  out  is  in  question.  It  seems  that  Mr.  Cobb  may  care  more 
about  protecting  NASA  from  embarrassment  than  he  does  about 
performing the critical functions of his office. An Inspector General 
must  possess  temperance,  high  ethical  standards,  and  a  firm  un-
derstanding of the independent nature of that office. From the evi-
dence  presented,  Mr.  Cobb  does  not  appear  to  possess  those  at-
tributes.’’ 

I  want  to  concur,  today,  with  Senator  Grassley’s  comments.  An 
IG  has  to  conduct  himself  or  herself  in  a  way—in  a  fashion  that 
Congress  trusts  them,  that  IG  staffs  believe  in  them,  and  that  the 
whistleblower  community  relies  on  them.  The  current  NASA  IG 
has failed on every account. 

Mr.  Cobb,  you’ve—you  were  chosen  Inspector  General  not  for 
your  management  skills  or  your  experience  in  auditing,  investiga-
tions,  financial  analysis,  public  administration,  or  any  of  the  other 
skills  that  IGs,  by  statute,  are  supposed  to  possess;  you  were  cho-
sen  to  play  ball  with  Sean  O’Keefe.  Because  of  that  and  your  own 
actions,  you  have  been  highly  unsuccessful  as  an  Inspector  Gen-
eral. I hope you will consider this, and, for the sake of yourself and 
for NASA, you will do the right thing, and you will resign. 

I yield back. 
Senator  NELSON.  Chairman  Miller—and,  of  course,  each  of  our 
statements will be put in, in full, in—your prepared statement, for 
the record, it will be a part of the record. 

Chairman Miller? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BRAD MILLER, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM NORTH CAROLINA 

Representative  MILLER.  Thank  you,  Senator  Nelson.  Good  after-

noon. 

In  January,  the  Integrity  Committee  of  the  President’s  Council 
on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  completed  its  investigation  of  allega-
tions of misconduct by Robert ‘‘Moose’’ Cobb, the Inspector General 
of  NASA.  After  a  6-month  investigation,  the  PCIE  found  that  Mr. 
Cobb had abused his authority and exhibited the lack of independ-
ence,  or  had  exhibited  the  appearance  of  a  lack  of  independence 
from NASA management. Those are violations of the quality stand-
ards for Federal Offices of the Inspector General established under 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

an executive order. The Integrity Committee said that discipline up 
to, and including, removal was appropriate. 

After  receiving  the  report,  the  majority  leadership  of  the  Senate 
Subcommittee  on  Space,  Aeronautics,  and  Related  Sciences,  Sen-
ator  Nelson,  as  well  as  the  Chairman  of  the  House  Committee  on 
Science  and  Technology,  Mr.  Gordon,  and  I  all—called  upon  the 
President to remove Mr. Cobb as Inspector General of NASA. 

Mr. Cobb remains in office. The findings of abuse of authority by 
the  PCIE  involve  Mr.  Cobb’s  abusive  and  degrading  treatment  of 
his  staff  resulting  in  massive  staff  turnover  and  affecting  produc-
tivity. Mr. Cobb referred to his professional staffs as ‘‘Burons,’’ Mr. 
Cobb’s  shorthand  for  ‘‘Bureaucratic  Morons,’’  and  by  other  vulgar 
terms that I will not repeat here. 

Rather  than  dwell  on  the  abusive  atmosphere  created  by  Mr. 
Cobb  and  its  effect  on  productivity,  I  want  to  make  sure  that  the 
second finding, regarding the appearance of a lack of independence, 
receives the attention that it requires. 

According  to  the  official  standards,  inspectors  general  and  their 
staff  ‘‘have  the  responsibility  to  maintain  independence  so  that 
opinions,  conclusions,  and  recommendations  will  be  impartial,  and 
will  be  viewed  as  impartial  by  knowledgeable  third  parties.’’  Mr. 
Cobb has utterly failed to do that. 

Perception that Mr. Cobb lacked independence was set in motion 
during  Mr.  Cobb’s  hiring.  Shortly  after  Sean  O’Keefe  moved  from 
the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  to  NASA,  Mr.  O’Keefe, 
NASA’s  former  Administrator,  decided  that  he  didn’t  like  the  pre-
vious  NASA  Inspector  General.  He  went  to  the  White  House  and 
demanded  a  new  one.  How  Mr.  Cobb  was  selected  is  not  entirely 
clear,  but  what  is  clear  is  that  Mr.  O’Keefe  personally  chose  his 
new Inspector General and established a regime in which Mr. Cobb 
was part of Mr. O’Keefe’s team, and not the independent Inspector 
General  required  by  law.  As  Mr.  Cobb  described  it,  ‘‘Mr.  O’Keefe 
reached a conclusion that I would be the perfect person to conduct 
the independent Office of Inspector General activities.’’ 

Once at NASA, Mr. Cobb called Mr. O’Keefe his ‘‘boss,’’ and said 
he  was  afraid  he  would  be  fired  if  he  displeased  Mr.  O’Keefe.  And 
why  shouldn’t  he  think  that,  since  Mr.  O’Keefe  had  been  able  to 
fire  the  previous  NASA  Inspector  General  and  pick  the  new  one? 
According to some interviewed by the HUD IG staff, who carried 
out the PCIE investigation, Mr. Cobb was warned, from the begin-
ning, about lacking an appearance of independence, but he ignored 
those  warnings,  and  the  Integrity  Committee’s  record  of  investiga-
tion  is  full  of  evidence  of  his  failure  to  maintain  any  shred  of  an 
appearance of independence. 

Mr.  Cobb  asked  NASA  officials  how  to  design  the  IG  projects.  A 
December  12,  2002,  e-mail,  for  instance,  asked  NASA  officials  to 
discuss  two  proposed  projects,  ‘‘so  we  can  take  your  views  into  ac-
count in designing our activities.’’ 

After the Columbia accident, there are questions about the inde-
pendence  of  the  O’Keefe-appointed  Accident  Investigation  Board. 
Chairman Gordon was one of those asking questions. Mr. Cobb pro-
vided  an  unsolicited  personal  letter  to  Congress—unsolicited  by 
Congress,  at  least—saying  that,  based  on  his  observations,  the 
Board was independent. But, before sending the letter to Congress, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

Mr.  Cobb  sent  a  draft  to  Mr.  O’Keefe  for  his  review  and  comment. 
Mr. O’Keefe liked the letter a lot. 

I  could  go  on  and  on  with  more  examples  of  the  ways  in  which 
Mr.  Cobb  tried  to  make  himself  useful  to  his  friends  at  the  top  of 
the  agency,  especially  Mr.  O’Keefe.  But  what  is  most  important 
here  is  that  Mr.  Cobb  is  now  totally  ineffective  in  his  job,  and 
trusted by no one. 

As  he  has  made  clear  in  his  testimony  today,  his  written  testi-
mony  submitted  in  advance,  Mr.  Cobb  has  learned  nothing  from 
the  PCIE  investigation.  He  admits  no  wrong,  he  blames  others  for 
all  of  his  problems.  Mr.  Cobb  said,  in  this  deposition,  that  if  the 
current  NASA  Administrator,  Mike  Griffin,  invited  him  to  go  play 
golf,  he  would  love  to  go,  ‘‘By  all  means,  I’m  going  to  go  play  if  he 
asks.  If  he  wants  to  invite  me  out  to  dinner,  I  think  it  would  be 
perfectly  appropriate  for  me  to  do  so.’’  He  wants  the  same  kind  of 
relationship that he had with Mr. O’Keefe. Dr. Griffin, to his credit, 
apparently does not. 

Mr. Cobb, you must leave. You have two clients: NASA and Con-
gress.  That  is  clear  from  the  statute,  from  the  Inspector  General 
Act  of  1978.  That  is  clear  from  the  quality  standards  for  Federal 
Offices of Inspector General, which I hope every Inspector General 
would keep on their desk. Congress is your client, one of only two. 
It is apparent that Congress does not trust you. 

The  Committees  of  the  House  and  the  Senate  that  are  respon-
sible  for  oversight  of  NASA  are  sitting  before  you.  All  of  us  have 
called upon the President to fire you. 

You  have  told  our  staff  that  you  are  afraid  to  talk  to  your  own 
staff,  because  they  twist  your  words.  So,  you  are  hiding  from  your 
own staff. As one of our witnesses said in written testimony, ‘‘Each 
IG  must  be  willing  to  accept  responsibility  for  his  or  her  behavior, 
and  acknowledge  when  their  independence  has  been  comprised, 
fairly or unfairly, and exit office gracefully.’’ 

Mr. Cobb, the work of the NASA IG is important. Mr. Cobb, you 
must  leave  to  preserve  what  is  left  of  the  integrity  of  your  office. 

Senator NELSON. Senator Hutchison? 

STATEMENT OF HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM TEXAS 

Senator HUTCHISON. Well, thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  certainly  am  pleased  to  be  here  with  our  House  colleagues  for 

this joint hearing. 

I  want  to  say  that  I  have  not  called  for  Mr.  Cobb’s  resignation, 
because  I  haven’t  heard  from  Mr.  Cobb.  And  I  do  think  that,  re-
gardless  of  how  one  feels  about  the  allegations  made  against  the 
NASA  Inspector  General,  or  the  process  by  which  the  allegations 
were investigated, or the conclusions reached, the hearing certainly 
has  been  brought  about  because  of  a  failure  somewhere.  The  only 
thing that is—that we can say is that the hearing is part of exam-
ination  and  accountability  that  can  help  us  find  where  the  prob-
lems exist within our jurisdictional areas of responsibility, and how 
they can be addressed. 

I have made no prejudgment. I am, of course, I have to say, very 
concerned about the nature of the allegations made against the In-
spector General of NASA. Some of them, if true, represent conduct 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

that  I  find  objectionable,  and  should  be  changed.  However,  I  also 
believe  it  is  only  fair  that  the  oversight  hearing  include  Mr.  Cobb. 
I think that it is going to be very important to hear the allegations, 
and then to allow him to respond. 

Most  of  all,  I  have  to  say  that  this  subcommittee  must  ensure 
that nothing within the NASA institutional structure, including the 
Office  of  Inspector  General,  is  allowed  to  have  a  negative  effect  on 
the ability of NASA to carry out its programs efficiently and safely. 
Those  would  be  the  primary  concerns  that  I  have.  I  have  to 
apologize  right  now  and  say  that  I’m  already  late  for  a  meeting 
that I cannot miss, so I will have to leave. But I will get all of the 
testimony of this hearing, and then will certainly be part of the col-
laboration about what should be done about it. 

I’ve  talked  to  Senator  Nelson  about  the  issue  several  times,  and 
I appreciate that he postponed the hearing to try to make sure that 
we did have all the sides fairly represented, including Mr. Cobb. 

So, thank you for that. And I will certainly look forward to our— 

exercising our responsibility for oversight correctly. 

Thank you. 
Senator NELSON. Congressman Feeney, standing in for Congress-

man Sensenbrenner. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TOM FEENEY, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM FLORIDA 

Representative FEENEY. Well, I’m not sure anybody can stand in 
for  Congressman  Sensenbrenner  under  any  circumstances,  but  it’s 
a  pleasure  to  be  here  with  my  Senator,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  also 
Chairman Miller and Chairman Gordon. 

I’ll  be  very  brief.  I  want  to  echo  Senator  Hutchison’s  remarks 
that I have not prejudged this case. I’m interested in hearing from 
the witnesses, including the expert, Dr. Light, as to the appropriate 
role of Inspectors General, and look forward to hearing and review-
ing the response from Mr. Cobb. 

With  that,  I  would  like  to  ask  for  permission  to  enter  into  the 

record an opening statement from Congressman Sensenbrenner. 

Senator NELSON. So ordered. 
[The information previously referred to follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. F. JAMES SENSENBRENNER, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM WISCONSIN 

There  is  a  line  between  good  governance  and  interference,  and  I  think  we  may 
have  crossed  it.  Without  commenting  on  the  merits  of  any  of  the  investigations,  I 
note that Robert Cobb is one of four inspectors general (IGs) currently under inves-
tigation.  These  investigations  are  in  addition  to  three  investigations  that  recently 
forced  IGs  to  resign.  All  seven  of  these  investigations  are  in  addition  to  the  count-
less  investigations  of  Executive  Branch  officials  outside  of  the  IG  community.  The 
current culture in Washington is becoming one of overzealous oversight. 

Inspectors General are our agency watchdogs. Of course, these watchdogs need to 
be watched—accountability is a hallmark of good government—but when holding of-
ficials accountable is more about press releases than it is about fear of wrongdoing, 
oversight becomes more interference than benefit. 

Endless  investigations  have  consequences,  even  beyond  the  unnecessary  expense 
to  taxpayers.  Congressional  investigators  demand  that  IGs  act  independently,  but 
constant  investigations  undermine  that  independence.  In  drafting  the  Inspector 
General  Act,  Congress  gave  IGs  substantial  freedom  to  develop  audits  and  conduct 
investigations. Congress clearly expected IGs to act independently and rely on their 
own judgment to determine an effective agenda. Constant investigations undermine 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Accountability 23 (1993). 

IGs  already  have  the  unenviable  task  of  criticizing  powerful  agency  heads,  Con-
gressional leaders, and the President, himself—this minefield is inherent in the ge-
ography of the IG Act—but the difficulty is compounded if we continue to perpetuate 
this culture of overzealous oversight. 

8 

that independence. It is as if we have placed our IGs in front of a firing squad and 
told them to ‘‘speak freely.’’ 

One  of  today’s  witnesses,  Professor  Paul  Light  from  New  York  University,  recog-
nized  this  problem  and  argued  that  IGs’  agendas  were  detrimentally  influenced  by 
outside powers: 

Compliance  monitoring  not  only  generates  a  much  greater  volume  of  findings 
of  failure  . . .  and  thus  more  opportunities  for  credit  claiming  by  the  Congress 
and the Administration, but also produces recommendations for actions that are 
less  expensive,  more  politically  palatable,  cleaner  jurisdictionally,  and  faster  to 
implement. 

Frederick  M.  Kaiser,  Paul  C.  Light,  Monitoring  Government  and  the  Search  for 

Beyond the systemic damage it causes, investigations cripple the individual offices 
under investigation. Robert Cobb was under investigation by the Investigative Com-
mittee  (IC)  of  the  President  Council  for  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (PCIE)  for  over  a 
year.  As  soon  as  that  investigation  was  behind  him,  Congressional  investigators 
began  their  own  investigation.  Throughout  this  entire  period,  NASA’s  Office  of  the 
Inspector General (OIG) has been in a state of uncertainty. Congress and the public 
have been unsure of whether the office is reliable, OIG staff has been unsure of the 
future  of  the  office,  and  Mr.  Cobb,  himself,  has  been  uncertain  of  his  own  future. 
Some  investigations  are,  of  course,  necessary,  but  there  are  drawbacks,  so  they 
should  not  be  undertaken  lightly,  and  the  conclusions  should  not  be  preordained. 
Who  would  willingly  enter  this  landscape?  Endless  investigations  will,  if  they 
have  not  already,  discourage  public  service.  Congress  demands  that  only  the  most 
highly qualified individuals serve as IGs, but constant investigations are making the 
positions ones that qualified individuals are wise to avoid. The job is simply too po-
litical and too unstable. 

The balance between good Congressional oversight and overzealous investigations 
should be struck by examining the Executive Branch’s processes for holding IGs ac-
countable.  Robert  Cobb  was  not  exonerated  by  the  IC,  but  neither  did  the  IC  rec-
ommend  his  removal  from  office.  The  Subcommittee’s  Majority  has  been  critical  of 
NASA for discounting the IC’s conclusions and formulating its own course of action, 
but  the  Majority  has  done  the  same  thing.  While  the  IC  stopped  short  of  recom-
mending Mr. Cobb’s removal from office, the Majority has ignored that recommenda-
tion and has been demanding his removal for months. 

The  Majority’s  second-guessing  of  the  Administration’s  investigation  is  especially 
problematic  because,  while  today’s  hearing  is  setting  out  to  prove  that  Cobb  must 
be  removed  from  office,  it  is  not  examining  the  process  that  determined  that  he 
should  not  be.  The  Executive  Branch  should  be  given  some  leeway  over  its  per-
sonnel. In the present case, the Administration conducted a costly and thorough in-
vestigation of Robert Cobb, NASA’s Inspector General. A hearing that condemns the 
results  of  a  decisionmaking  process  without  considering  the  process  itself,  is  fun-
damentally  flawed.  A  hearing  that  examined  the  process  by  which  IGs  are  inves-
tigated  would  have  global  benefits  to  the  IG  community  and  would  eliminate  many 
of the detriments caused by overzealous investigations. Examining the process may 
not produce bold headlines, but it does produce good government. 

Senator  NELSON.  Now,  as  we  have  said,  Senator  Grassley  had 
asked  to  be  the  first  witness.  And,  at  precisely  the  time  this  com-
mittee  kicked  off,  he  was  called  to  a  meeting  with  the  minority 
leader,  and,  therefore,  he  cannot  be  here.  His  lengthy  statement 
will be entered into the record. 

But I would just read his concluding paragraph. And this is Sen-
ator  Grassley,  ‘‘So,  in  conclusion,  I  have  some  questions  that  I 
would like to pose to Mr. Cobb. In answering them, I hope he hon-
estly  places  the  mission  of  his  office  ahead  of  his  self-interest.  Mr. 
Cobb,  do  you  believe  that  an  Inspector  General  can  continue  to 
serve if he has lost the confidence of his staff and of Congress? Do 
you  believe  an  Inspector  General  can  continue  to  serve  who  has 
been  found,  by  an  independent  investigation,  to  have  abused  his 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

authority?  Do  you  believe  an  Inspector  General  can  continue  to 
serve  if  he  is  perceived  as  ‘in  the  pockets’  of  the  people  he  is  sup-
posed to investigate? Do you believe an Inspector General can con-
tinue to serve if he has acknowledged verbally abusing staff on nu-
merous  occasions?  These  would  be  my  questions  to  Mr.  Cobb.  The 
honest answering of those questions should lead him to make a de-
cision as to what is best for NASA and the American people.’’ 

Likewise,  Mr.  Kenneth  Donohue,  the  Inspector  General  of  the 
Department  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development,  who  conducted 
the  factual  investigation  into  the  allegations  against  Mr.  Cobb,  is 
unable  to  be  with  us  today.  He  has  submitted  his  written  testi-
mony, and, without objection, it will be entered into the record. 

Finally,  a  procedural  note  for  all  the  witnesses.  It  is  the  custom 
of  the  House  Subcommittee  that  is  represented  here  today  to  re-
quire  sworn  testimony  from  witnesses  in  oversight  hearings.  This 
is  not  our  practice  in  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee.  However, 
witnesses  are  reminded  of  their  obligations,  under  18  U.S.C.  1001, 
to provide truthful testimony, and the penalties for failing to do so. 
With  that,  if  we  could  ask  the  first  panel  to  come  up,  please,  to 

the witness table. 

The  panel  consists  of  Ms.  Debra  Herzog,  Senior  Attorney,  Office 
of Inspector General, U.S. Post Office, former Deputy Assistant In-
spector General for Investigations at NASA; Mr. Kevin Carson, As-
sistant  Inspector  General  for  Audits,  Office  of  Inspector  General, 
the  Government  Printing  Office,  former  Assistant  Inspector  Gen-
eral  for  Audits  in  NASA;  Mr.  Lance  Carrington,  Deputy  Assistant 
Inspector  General  of  Investigations,  Office  of  Inspector  General, 
U.S.  Postal  Service,  former  Assistant  Inspector  General  for  Inves-
tigations  at  NASA;  Ms.  Danielle  Brian,  Executive  Director,  Project 
on  Government  Oversight;  Dr.  Paul  Light,  the  Paulette  Goddard 
Professor of Public Service, Robert Wagner School of Public Service, 
at New York University. 

So, welcome, all. 
Mr.  Carson,  we  will  start  with  you.  All  of  your  written  state-
ments  will  be  entered  into  the  record.  We  would  like  to  have  you 
give  us  your  five-minute  statements,  and  then  we  can  get  into  the 
questions. 

Mr. Carson? 

STATEMENT  OF  KEVIN  CARSON,  ASSISTANT  INSPECTOR 
GENERAL  FOR  AUDITS  AND  INSPECTIONS,  OFFICE  OF 
INSPECTOR  GENERAL,  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE 
AND  FORMER  DEPUTY  ASSISTANT  INSPECTOR  GENERAL 
FOR AUDITS, NASA 
Mr.  CARSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  Members  of  the  Committees,  thank 
you for the opportunity to be here today to discuss my experiences 
while employed in the NASA Office of Inspector General. 

Since March 2005, I have been employed as the Assistant Inspec-
tor  General  for  Audits  and  Inspections  at  the  U.S.  Government 
Printing  Office,  Office  of  Inspector  General,  in  Washington,  D.C. 
Previously,  I  worked  over  15  years,  between  August  1989  and 
March 2005, for the NASA OIG. While with the NASA OIG, I held 
a  variety  of  audit  positions,  including  Deputy  Assistant  Inspector 
General for Audits, Director of Audit Quality, Program Director for 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Safety  and  Security  Audits.  Including  my  employment  with  the 
NASA OIG, I’ve spent approximately 27 years of my career in var-
ious Federal audit organizations. 

I’ve  been  invited  here  today  to  provide  testimony  related  to  my 
time and experience in the NASA OIG, while working under the di-
rection of NASA Inspector General Robert Cobb. 

I request that my full statement be submitted for the record, and 

will answer any questions related to its contents. 

In  early  1999,  the  previous  NASA  Inspector  General,  Roberta 
Gross,  upon  the  NASA  Administrator  stating  that  the  agency’s 
number-one priority was safety, appointed me to form a directorate 
whose specific mission was to audit safety and security issues with-
in NASA. While forming the directorate with a small staff of audi-
tors, the directorate quickly performed a series of audits and issued 
reports  addressing  various  safety  issues,  primarily  at  NASA’s 
manned  spaceflight  centers.  Among  the  first  reports  issued  by  the 
directorate  included  safety  concerns  with  Kennedy  Space  Center’s 
payload  ground  operations,  contractor  safety  requirements  at  Ken-
nedy Space Center or Marshall Space Flight Center, Space Shuttle 
Program  management  safety  observations,  controls  over  the  use  of 
plastic  films,  foams,  and  adhesive  tapes  used  in  and  around  the 
Space  Shuttle  Orbiter  vehicles,  safety  of  lifting  devices  and  equip-
ment at Stennis Space Center. 

The  report  on  safety  of  lifting  devices  and  equipment  at  Stennis 
resulted  from  a  request  by  the  NASA  Associate  Administrator  for 
Safety and Mission Assurance. The audit identified significant safe-
ty  issues  related  to  lifting  devices  and  equipment,  and  found  that 
Stennis  did  not  safely  perform  critical  lifts  of  high-dollar  items, 
such  as  space  hardware,  one-of-a-kind  test  articles,  major  facility 
components, or personnel. In addition, we found that operators and 
riggers  were  not  properly  trained  and  certified,  operators  used 
cranes with safety deficiencies, and crane maintenance and inspec-
tions were inadequate. 

At the request of the House Science Committee, we performed an 
audit  of  safety  related  to  Kennedy  Space  Center’s  payload  ground 
operations,  and  found  various  materials  used  in  processing  facili-
ties at the Kennedy Space Center consistently failed required tests 
for  flammability  resistance,  and  electrostatic  discharge.  These  po-
tentially  hazardous  materials  included  plastic  films,  foams,  adhe-
sive tapes used by payload processing personnel under the Center’s 
payload  ground  operations  contract.  These  materials  have  been 
used without approval of the Kennedy Safety Office since 1992. We 
also  found  that  NASA  had  not  identified,  documented,  and  appro-
priately  mitigated  the  risks  of  using  these  potentially  hazardous 
materials,  exposing  personnel  and  flight  hardware  to  increased 
risks.  We  also  reviewed  USA’s  controls  over  the  plastic  films, 
foams, and adhesive tapes used in and around Orbiter vehicles and 
other segments of the Space Shuttle, such as the solid rocket boost-
ers, main engines, and found similar problems. 

Each  of  the  highlighted  reports  addressed  potentially  serious 
safety issues within NASA and within the Manned Spaceflight Pro-
gram.  I  believe  that  the  success  of  the  safety  and  security  direc-
torate  was  directly  attributable  to  the  outstanding  professionalism 
and work ethic of the managers and staff, and their collective dedi-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

cation  to  the  NASA  mission.  It  also  helped  that  the  directorate’s 
work  was  always  supported  by  then-Inspector  General  Roberta 
Gross. Although we issued some controversial reports that were not 
always  accepted  by  the  agency,  I  always  felt  the  directorate  had 
the  complete  support  of  senior  OIG  management,  including  Ms. 
Gross. 

On two occasions, in 1999 and 2001, the directorate received the 
OIG Audit Report of the Year Award. One of these reports, related 
to  contractor  safety  requirements,  was  transmitted  by  the  NASA 
Administrator  to  every  NASA  center  director,  who  was  directed  by 
the  Administrator  to  implement  the  recommendations  at  their  re-
spective centers. 

In  April  2002,  Robert  Cobb  was  appointed  the  NASA  Inspector 
General.  Although  the  Office  of  Audits  initially  continued  to  oper-
ate  as  previously,  within  3  to  4  months  there  was  a  noticeable 
change.  Specifically,  there  was  considerably  more  involvement  in 
writing,  rewriting,  and  revising  a  lot  of  reports  by  the  Inspector 
General.  There  was  also  considerable  questioning  of  the  audit  re-
sults,  with  Mr.  Cobb  frequently  not  agreeing  with  the  conclusions 
and recommendations in audit reports. 

There was also what I would say was a general disrespect shown 
by Mr. Cobb, for auditors in particular. Mr. Cobb would often make 
comments like, ‘‘Anybody can perform an audit,’’ or, when an audi-
tor  would  mention  something  like  ‘‘compliance  with  government 
audit  standards,’’  he  would  make  the  statement  that,  ‘‘The  stand-
ards were only something for auditors to hide behind.’’ 

He  also,  on  more  than  one  occasion,  mentioned  to  me  that  the 
safety audit directorate had produced nothing of value to the agen-
cy, that our audits were archeological digs, or that we were too far 
in the weeds. 

It  was  also  during  this  time  period  that  Mr.  Cobb  appeared  to 
be  providing  our  reports  to  agency  officials  for  review  and  com-
ment,  prior  to  official  draft  release,  in  order  to  determine  whether 
the  agency  would  agree  with  our  findings  and  recommendations. 
One  such  occasion—on  one  such  occasion,  a  proposed  draft  audit 
report  on  the  International  Space  Station  was  provided  to  the 
NASA general counsel to review prior to official release. The NASA 
general  counsel  did  not  agree  with  a  conclusion  in  the  report  re-
lated  to  the  potential  for  NASA  noncompliance  with  various  inter-
national  agreements  on  the  ISS.  Prior  to  the  release  of  the  report, 
the  audit  team  was  instructed  to  remove  this  section  from  the  re-
port, or the report would not be issued. 

In instances like the previous one, if any of the senior audit man-
agers  were  to  disagree  with  Mr.  Cobb  or  try  to  defend  our  conclu-
sions and recommendations, we were subject to severe berating and 
profane language by Mr. Cobb. 

In  2003—in  January  2003,  the  Office  of  Audits  was  advised  by 
Mr.  Cobb  that  it  would  be  merged  with  the  Office  of  Inspections, 
and  that  all  senior  management  positions  in  the  reorganized  office 
would be moved to NASA headquarters so that there could face-to- 
face  accountability.  Mr.  Cobb  frequently  stated  that  he  wanted 
these  senior  managers  in  Washington  so  that  he  could  personally 
‘‘choke them.’’ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

In  February  2003,  the  Office  of  Audits  was  merged  with  the  Of-
fice  of  Inspections  into  a  new  Office  of  Audits.  As  part  of  the  reor-
ganization,  I  was  transferred  to  NASA  headquarters  and  reverted 
to  my  former  position  as  director  of  safety  and  security  audits.  It 
was made clear to me, by both the new AIGA and his deputy, that 
Mr. Cobb never expected any of the senior managers, like me, who 
were  located  at  field  centers,  to  accept  the  transfer  to  head-
quarters.  The  new  AIGA  even  mentioned  that  Mr.  Cobb  now  had 
me where he could ‘‘choke me.’’ 

After  arriving  at  headquarters  in  April  2003,  I  had  even  more 
contact  with  Mr.  Cobb.  It  was  also  during  this  time  that  the  Co-
lumbia  accident  occurred,  and  the  investigation  of  its  cause  had 
begun.  As  the  Director  of  Safety  and  Security  Audits,  my  direc-
torate  assumed  a  large  role  in  directing  the  work  of  the  OIG  re-
lated  to  the  recommendations  of  the  Columbia  Accident  Investiga-
tion  Board,  which  published  its  final  report  in  August  2003.  In  re-
sponse to the CAIB report, I compiled a plan to review the agency’s 
implementation of most of the recommendations. In addition, I was 
authorized to hire additional technical staff to assist with the work 
to be performed. 

It was also during this period that Mr. Cobb began further inter-
ference with the work of the directorate through either constant re-
writing of products or attacking the work of the staff and technical 
experts, to the point where findings and recommendations were ei-
ther never officially issued to the agency or were issued unofficially 
by  Mr.  Cobb  to  various  agency  officials,  and,  thus,  never  posted 
publicly to the NASA OIG website. 

I  have  provided  examples  of  such  issues  in  my  prepared  state-
ment, including findings developed, but never issued, related to the 
organizational safety recommendations of the CAIB and the failure 
of  the  backup  Command  Destruct  System  during  a  2002  Space 
Shuttle  launch.  In  response  to  these  issues,  Mr.  Cobb  made  state-
ments  such  as,  my  staff  had  spent  almost  a  year  reviewing  the 
independent  technical  authority  and  safety  organizational  rec-
ommendations  of  the  CAIB,  ‘‘yet  had  nothing  to  show  for  it,’’  or, 
with respect to the Command Destruct failure, that it ‘‘was the Air 
Force’s problem.’’ There were numerous other—— 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Carson, I need you—— 
Mr. CARSON. I’m sorry. 
Senator NELSON.—to wrap up. 
Mr.  CARSON.  In  summary,  by  constantly  rewriting  and—writing 
and  rewriting  audit  reports,  not  allowing  audits  of  potentially  con-
troversial  issues  to  be  performed  or  reports  of  completed  audits  to 
be  publicly  issued,  constantly  denigrating  the  audit  staff  in  public 
and  in  private,  intimidating  auditors  and  staff  through  the  use  of 
verbal  threats,  foul  language,  and  intimidating  gestures,  Mr.  Cobb 
showed that he lacked independence from agency officials and was 
willing  to  go  to  any  length  not  to  issue  audit  reports  that  would 
embarrass  the  agency.  In  my  opinion,  he  clearly  created  and  en-
dorsed a hostile work environment. 

Thank you. And I would be pleased to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Carson follows:] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KEVIN J.  CARSON,  ASSISTANT INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR 
AUDITS AND INSPECTIONS, U.S. GOVERNMENT PRINTING OFFICE AND FORMER DEP-
UTY ASSISTANT INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR AUDITS, NASA 
Mr. Chairmen and Members of the Committees: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  my  experiences  while 

employed in the NASA Office of Inspector General (OIG). 

Since  March  2005,  I  have  been  employed  as  the  Assistant  Inspector  General  for 
Audits  and  Inspections  at  the  U.S.  Government  Printing  Office,  Office  of  Inspector 
General  in  Washington,  D.C.  Previously,  I  worked  over  15  years  (August  1989  to 
March 2005) for the NASA OIG. While with the NASA OIG, I held a variety of audit 
positions including Deputy Assistant Inspector General for Audits, Director of Audit 
Quality, and Program Director for Safety and Security Audits. Including my employ-
ment with the NASA OIG, I have spent approximately 27 years of my career in var-
ious Federal audit organizations. 

I have been invited here today to provide testimony related to my time and expe-
rience in the NASA OIG while working under the direction of NASA Inspector Gen-
eral  Robert  Cobb.  In  order  to  talk  about  this  time  period,  I  must  first  discuss  my 
experience with the organization prior to Mr. Cobb’s appointment in April 2002. 
NASA OIG Prior to 2002 

In  early  1999,  the  previous  NASA  Inspector  General  Roberta  Gross,  upon  the 
NASA  Administrator  stating  that  the  agency’s  Number  One  Priority  was  ‘‘Safety,’’ 
appointed  me  to  form  a  directorate  whose  specific  mission  was  to  audit  safety  and 
security  issues  within  NASA.  While  forming  the  directorate  with  a  small  staff  of 
auditors, the directorate quickly performed a series of audits and issued reports ad-
dressing  various  safety  issues  primarily  at  NASA’s  manned  space  flight  centers. 
Among the first reports issued by the directorate included: 

erations, March 30, 2000; 

shall Space Flight Center, June 5, 2000; 

• IG–00–028  Safety  Concerns  with  Kennedy  Space  Center’s  Payload  Ground  Op-
• IG–00–035 Contractor Safety Requirements at Kennedy Space Center and Mar-
• IG–01–017 Space Shuttle Program Management Safety Observations, March 23, 
• IG–01–034  Controls  Over  the  Use  of  PFA’s  In  and  Around  the  Space  Shuttle 
• IG–01–042  Safety  of  Lifting  Devices  and  Equipment  at  Stennis  Space  Center, 

Orbiter Vehicles, August 31, 2001; and 

2001; 

September 28, 2001. 

During  the  first  2  years  the  directorate  was  in  existence,  we  also  issued  several 
other  reports  related  to  issues  such  as  controls  over  Foreign  National  Visitors  at 
NASA  Centers,  Management  and  Administration  of  International  Agreements  at 
NASA,  and  NASA  Oversight  of  Contractor  Exports  of  Controlled  Technologies.  The 
directorate  was  also  responsible  for  audits  of  classified  NASA  Programs  and 
Projects. 

Some of the highlights of the reports issued included the report on Safety of Lift-
ing Devices and Equipment at Stennis which resulted from a request by the NASA 
Associate Administrator for Safety and Mission Assurance. The audit identified sig-
nificant  safety  issues  related  to  lifting  devices  and  equipment  and  found  that  Sten-
nis did not safely perform critical lifts of high-dollar items such as space hardware, 
one-of-a-kind  test  articles,  major  facility  components,  or  personnel.  In  addition,  we 
found  that  operators  and  riggers  were  not  properly  trained  and  certified,  operators 
used  cranes  with  safety  deficiencies,  and  crane  maintenance  and  inspections  were 
inadequate. 

At  the  request  of  the  House  Science  Committee,  we  performed  an  audit  of  safety 
related  to  Kennedy  Space  Center’s  Payload  Ground  Operations  and  found  that  var-
ious  materials  used  in  processing  facilities  at  the  Kennedy  Space  Center  consist-
ently  failed  required  tests  for  flammability  resistance  and  electrostatic  discharge. 
These  potentially  hazardous  materials  included  plastic  films,  foams,  and  adhesive 
(PFAs)  tapes  used  by  payload  processing  personnel  under  the  center’s  Payload 
Ground  Operations  Contract.  These  materials  had  been  used  without  approval  of 
the Kennedy Safety Office since 1992. We also found that NASA had not identified, 
documented,  and  appropriately  mitigated  the  risks  of  using  these  potentially  haz-
ardous materials, exposing personnel and flight hardware to increased risks. 

On  the  audit  of  the  United  Space  Alliance’s  (USA’s)  safety  procedures  under 
NASA’s  Space  Flight  Operations  Contract  (SFOC),  we  reviewed  the  oversight  of 
USA’s  safety  procedures  for  the  Space  Shuttle  Program  at  the  Lyndon  B.  Johnson 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

Space Center (Johnson). We found that the Johnson Safety, Reliability, and Quality 
Assurance  Office  (Johnson  Safety  Office)  was  not  providing  the  required  support  to 
the Space Shuttle Program Safety Manager, for oversight of USA’s safety activities. 
We  also  found  that  NASA’s  contractor  surveillance  plans  do  not  address  all  SFOC 
requirements  for  safety;  and  USA’s  reporting  to  NASA  of  close  calls  and  mishaps 
needed improvement. We concluded that NASA did not have adequate management 
controls  in  place  to  ensure  (1)  effective  oversight  of  USA’s  safety  operations  under 
the  SFOC,  (2)  better  control  over  $13  million  in  annual  Space  Shuttle  Program 
funds provided to the Johnson Safety Office, and (3) that adequate corrective actions 
are taken on all safety mishaps and close calls. This report and its results were dis-
cussed  in  the  August  2003  Report  of  the  Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board  in 
Chapter 7, ‘‘The Accident’s Organizational Causes.’’ 

We also reviewed USA’s controls over the use of plastic films, foams, and adhesive 
tapes  (PFA’s)  used  in  and  around  the  Orbiter  vehicles  and  other  segments  of  the 
Space  Shuttle  such  as  the  solid  rocket  boosters  and  main  engines.  We  found  that 
USA  was  routinely  using  in  and  around  the  Space  Shuttle  Orbiter  vehicles,  PFA’s 
that  had  no  record  of  being  tested  to  ensure  that  the  PFA’s  met  NASA  standards 
for flammability resistance, electrostatic discharge (ESD) rate, or compatibility with 
rocket  fuel.  In  addition,  neither  Kennedy  Space  Center  nor  USA  safety  personnel 
had approved the use of these materials, thereby creating a potential safety hazard 
to personnel, the Orbiter vehicles, and other flight hardware and equipment. 

Each of the highlighted reports addressed potentially serious safety issues within 
NASA and within the manned spaceflight program. I believe that the success of the 
Safety and Security Directorate was directly attributable to the outstanding profes-
sionalism  and  work  ethic  of  the  managers  and  staff  and  their  collective  dedication 
to  the  NASA  mission.  It  also  helped  that  the  directorate’s  work  was  always  sup-
ported  by  then-Inspector  General  Roberta  Gross.  Although  we  issued  some  con-
troversial  reports  that  were  not  always  accepted  by  the  agency,  I  always  felt  that 
the  directorate  had  the  complete  support  of  senior  OIG  management  including  Ms. 
Gross.  Further  highlights  from  the  initial  years  of  the  directorate  included  on  two 
occasions,  in  1999  and  2001,  the  directorate  received  the  OIG  Audit  Report  of  the 
Year  Award.  One  of  these  reports  related  to  Contractor  Safety  Requirements  and 
was  transmitted  by  the  NASA  Administrator  to  every  NASA  Center  Director,  who 
was  directed  by  the  Administrator  to  implement  the  recommendations  at  their  re-
spective centers. 

In late 2001, I was selected to be the Deputy Assistant Inspector General for Au-
dits. In this position, I had four audit directorates that reported to me including the 
Safety  and  Security  Directorate.  The  directorate  continued  to  produce  high-value 
audit products. 
April 2002 to March 2005 

In April 2002, Robert Cobb was appointed the NASA Inspector General. Although 
the  Office  of  Audits  initially  continued  to  operate  as  previously,  within  3  to  4 
months there was a noticeable change. Specifically, there was considerably more in-
volvement in writing, rewriting, and revising audit reports by the Inspector General. 
There  was  also  considerable  questioning  of  the  audit  results  with  Mr.  Cobb  fre-
quently  not  agreeing  with  the  conclusions  and  recommendations  in  audit  reports. 
There  was  also  what  I  would  say  was  a  general  disrespect  shown  by  Mr.  Cobb  for 
auditors in particular. Mr. Cobb would often make comments like ‘‘anybody can per-
form  an  audit’’  or  when  an  auditor  would  mention  something  like  compliance  with 
government  audit  standards,  he  would  make  the  statement  that  he  had  read  the 
government  audit  standards  and  that  all  they  were  was  ‘‘something  for  auditors  to 
hide  behind.’’  He  also  on  more  than  one  occasion  mentioned  to  me  that  the  safety 
audit  directorate  had  ‘‘produced  nothing  of  value  to  the  agency,’’  that  our  audits 
were ‘‘archaeological digs’’ or that we were ‘‘too far in the weeds.’’ 

It  was  also  during  this  time  period  that  Mr.  Cobb  appeared  to  be  providing  our 
reports  to  agency  officials  for  review  and  comment  prior  to  official  draft  release  in 
order  to  determine  whether  the  agency  would  agree  with  our  findings  and  rec-
ommendations.  On  one  such  occasion,  a  proposed  draft  audit  report  on  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  (ISS)  was  provided  to  the  NASA  General  Counsel  to  review 
prior to official release. The NASA General Counsel did not agree with a conclusion 
in  the  report  related  to  the  potential  for  NASA  noncompliance  with  various  inter-
national  agreements  on  the  ISS.  Prior  to  release  of  the  report,  the  audit  team  was 
instructed to remove this section from the report or the report would not be issued. 
In  instances  like  the  previous  one,  if  any  of  the  senior  audit  managers  were  to 
disagree  with  Mr.  Cobb  or  try  to  defend  our  conclusions  and  recommendations,  we 
were  subject  to  severe  berating  and  profane  language  by  Mr.  Cobb.  During  these 
tirades  about  audits  and  auditors,  I  never  once  saw  Mr.  Cobb’s  Deputy  Inspector 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

General  ever  support  the  audit  staff  or  the  rationale  for  their  conclusions  even 
though  they  were  clearly  supported  by  audit  evidence.  In  fact,  Mr.  Cobb’s  Deputy 
often  made  matters  worse  for  the  Office  of  Audits  despite  having  been  an  auditor 
himself for many years. 
2003 Audit Reorganization 

In  January  2003,  the  Office  of  Audits  was  advised  by  Mr.  Cobb  that  it  would  be 
merged  with  the  Office  of  Inspections  and  that  all  senior  management  positions  in 
the  reorganized  office  would  be  moved  to  NASA  Headquarters  so  that  there  could 
be  ‘‘face-to-face  accountability.’’  Mr.  Cobb  frequently  stated  that  he  wanted  these 
senior managers in Washington so that he could personally ‘‘choke them.’’ 

In February 2003, the Office of Audits was merged with the Office of Inspections 
into  the  Office  of  Audits.  The  new  Assistant  Inspector  General  for  Audits  (AIGA) 
selected to head up the new organization was the previous Assistant Inspector Gen-
eral  for  Inspections  who  had  no  experience  either  performing  audits  or  managing 
any  type  of  audit  organization.  The  previous  AIGA  was  placed  in  the  position  of 
Deputy AIGA. 

As  part  of  the  reorganization,  I  was  transferred  to  NASA  Headquarters  and  re-
verted to my former position as Director of Safety and Security Audits. It was made 
clear  to  me  by  both  the  new  AIGA  and  his  deputy  that  Mr.  Cobb  never  expected 
any of the senior managers like me, who were located at field centers, to accept the 
transfer  to  Headquarters.  The  new  AIGA  even  mentioned  that  Mr.  Cobb  now  had 
me where he could ‘‘choke me.’’ 

After  arriving  at  Headquarters  in  April  2003,  I  had  even  more  contact  with  Mr. 
Cobb. It was also during this time that the Columbia accident occurred and the in-
vestigation  of  its  cause  had  begun.  As  the  Director  of  Safety  and  Security  Audits, 
my directorate assumed a large role in directing the work of the OIG related to the 
recommendations  of  the  Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board  (CAIB)  which  pub-
lished  its  final  report  and  recommendations  in  August  2003.  In  response  to  the 
CAIB  report,  I  compiled  a  plan  to  review  the  agency’s  implementation  of  most  of 
the recommendations. In addition, I was authorized to hire additional technical staff 
to assist with the work to be performed. 

It was also during this period, that Mr. Cobb began further interference with the 
work  of  the  directorate  through  either  constant  rewriting  of  products  or  attacking 
the  work  of  the  staff  and  technical  experts  to  the  point  where  findings  and  rec-
ommendations were either never officially issued to the agency or were issued unof-
ficially by Mr. Cobb to various agency officials and thus never posted publicly to the 
NASA OIG website. 
CAIB Organizational Recommendations 

There  are  several  instances  of  the  stifling  or  covering  up  of  audit  results  by  Mr. 
Cobb that I can provide. For example, my staff and I were responsible for reviewing 
all  agency  actions  and  plans  related  to  the  organizational  safety  recommendations 
of  the  CAIB,  specifically,  (1)  the  establishment  of  an  Independent  Technical  Engi-
neering Authority (ITEA), and (2) straight line authority and funding for the Space 
Shuttle Program safety organization. 

On  at  least  three  different  occasions  beginning  in  December  2003,  my  staff  pre-
pared  audit  reports  basically  concluding  that  NASA  was  not  establishing  the  ITEA 
or Space Shuttle Program safety organization in the manner intended by the CAIB. 
Specifically, we stated that NASA had not fully achieved the reporting and funding 
independence  for  either  function  recommended  by  the  CAIB.  We  concluded  that 
Technical Warrant Holders—those individuals the NASA Chief Engineer empowered 
to  ensure  compliance  with  technical  standards  and  requirements,  lacked  independ-
ence  from  major  program  influences.  We  further  stated  that  NASA’s  plans  to 
strengthen  safety  functions  did  not  provide  for  a  safety  official  at  the  centers  to  be 
accountable  to  the  head  of  safety  at  NASA  Headquarters.  Based  on  the  structure 
the  agency  was  proposing,  we  concluded  that  the  individuals  ultimately  held  ac-
countable  for  ITEA  and  safety  would  be  subject  to  cost,  schedule,  and  other  pres-
sures  from  the  same  program  they  would  be  responsible  for  independently  assess-
ing. 

Despite  drafting  three  reports  with  basically  this  same  message  over  a  period  of 
15 months, Mr. Cobb refused to release any of them. On a couple of occasions, these 
issues  were  addressed  in  either  a  letter  signed  by  Mr.  Cobb  or  an  e-mail  sent  by 
Mr. Cobb to selected NASA officials. 

On  October  6,  2004,  during  my  monthly  Directorate  briefing,  the  subject  of  this 
review  was  brought  up  and  Mr.  Cobb  stated  that  my  staff  had  spent  almost  a  year 
reviewing  the  ITEA  and  Safety  recommendations  of  the  CAIB  yet  ‘‘had  nothing  to 
show for it.’’ When I reminded Mr. Cobb that my staff had prepared three separate 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

audit  reports  that  he  chose  not  to  issue,  he  stated  that  he  was  not  satisfied  with 
the message of the reports. I defended the work of my staff and stated that the re-
ports  were  right  on  the  issue  and  that  they  should  be  issued.  I  subsequently  have 
been  told  that  the  current  NASA  Administrator  made  several  of  the  organizational 
changes with safety and the ITEA that we had recommended in our reports despite 
the fact that they were never issued. 
Cape Canaveral Air Station Command Destruct 

During October 2004, my Directorate also received a referral from the NASA OIG 
Office  of  Investigations  concerning  a  ‘‘potential  safety  issue  involving  command  de-
struct’’  at  the  Eastern  Test  Range  of  Cape  Canaveral  Air  Station.  The  allegation 
concerned  a  possible  safety  violation  that  occurred  in  conjunction  with  a  launch  of 
the  Space  Shuttle  in  2002.  Specifically,  that  during  the  June  5,  2002  launch  of  the 
Space  Shuttle,  the  Commander  of  the  Eastern  Range  overruled  the  ‘‘No-Go’’  rec-
ommendations  of  the  Air  Force’s  Mission  Flight  Control  Officer  (MFCO)  and  Chief 
of  Safety  and  proceeded  to  declare  the  range  ‘‘Go’’  for  launch  of  the  Space  Shuttle. 
The reason for the ‘‘No-Go’’ recommendations of the MFCO and Chief of Safety was 
that  there  was  a  failure  of  the  backup  Command  Destruct  System  which  was  not 
certified as mission capable prior to launch as required. The original allegation had 
been  referred  to  the  NASA  OIG  by  the  U.S.  Air  Force  Inspector  General  in  August 
2003. After reviewing the allegation for any potential criminal violations, the Office 
of  Investigations  referred  it  to  audits  and  my  directorate  because  of  the  potential 
safety issues involved with the allegations. 

Upon  assigning  this  issue  to  a  member  of  my  staff,  who  was  an  Air  Force  officer 
with  an  extensive  safety  background,  it  quickly  became  apparent  that  there  was 
substantial  merit  to  the  allegation  and  that  the  sequence  of  events,  where  the 
Range Commander overruled the MFCO and Chief of Safety and declared the range 
go for launch despite a less than fully certified Command Destruct System, was un-
precedented.  To  verify  that  this  situation  did  in  fact  occur,  a  total  of  9  witnesses 
were interviewed who were present on console for the launch. We also reviewed var-
ious launch-related records. Since the NASA firing room and the range control cen-
ter  are  not  co-located,  the  NASA  Launch  Director  and  Mission  Management  Team 
Chair  at  the  time  relied  solely  on  the  Go  recommendation  of  the  Eastern  Range 
Commander  without  any  NASA  independent  verification.  Both  of  these  individuals 
also  stated  that  they  would  not  have  launched  had  they  known  that  the  Air  Force 
MFCO and Chief of Safety were ‘‘No-Go’’ for launch. 

Upon  completion  of  our  preliminary  work,  my  staff  and  I  arranged  to  brief  Mr. 
Cobb on February 23, 2005 on the results of our review to include the work remain-
ing  to  complete  the  review  and  what  our  preliminary  recommendations  to  NASA 
would  be.  The  staff  and  I  had  previously  met  with  Safety  Officials  at  Kennedy  in 
January  2005  and  had  obtained  their  agreement  with  our  proposed  recommenda-
tions.  We  received  complete  concurrence  with  our  primary  recommendation  that 
NASA  Safety  must  positively  verify  the  Eastern  Range  status  and  range  configura-
tion  prior  to  every  launch.  At  the  briefing  on  February  23,  2005,  I  was  promptly 
told  by  Mr.  Cobb  at  the  completion  of  the  briefing  that  this  situation  ‘‘was  the  Air 
Force’s problem.’’ While reporting of this situation would have been controversial to 
the  agency,  it  was  not  a  surprise  to  me  that  Mr.  Cobb  would  not  allow  any  further 
work on this assignment to be performed. I am unaware whether this situation con-
cerning launches has ever been addressed or corrected. 
Other Instances 

While  I  have  discussed  the  above  two  instances  where  my  directorate  was  either 
interfered  with  by  Mr.  Cobb,  not  allowed  to  complete  work,  or  not  allowed  to  issue 
reports,  there  were  numerous  other  examples  of  this  type  of  behavior  throughout 
my  directorate  or  throughout  the  Office  of  Audits.  For  example,  despite  allegations 
of the possible NASA misuse of funds appropriated by Congress for security at Fed-
eral  Agencies  subsequent  to  September  11,  I  was  told  by  the  Assistant  Inspector 
General  for  Audits  that  Mr.  Cobb  would  not  allow  an  audit  of  that  area  because  it 
would  only  serve  as  an  ‘‘archaeological  dig’’  and  would  be  embarrassing  to  NASA. 
In  another  instance,  an  audit  report  was  drafted  by  my  Directorate  addressing 
noncompliance  at  Kennedy  Space  Center  with  the  Occupational  Safety  and  Health 
Administration’s (OSHA) Process Safety Management (PSM) standard. The draft re-
port  discussed  the  lack  of  PSM  procedures  for  the  transportation  of  highly  haz-
ardous  chemicals  via  the  Kennedy  railroad.  Specifically,  neither  the  United  Space 
Alliance  (USA)  nor  Space  Gateway  Services  (SGS)  had  developed  PSM  procedures 
for the railroad transportation of Space Shuttle solid rocket motor segments (which 
contain  ammonium  perchlorate)  and  nitrogen  tetroxide  (which  was  transported  on 
behalf of the U.S. Air Force). Neither contractor believed that they were responsible 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

for  the  PSM  program  of  the  railroad  and  neither  believed  that  the  PSM  standard 
applied to Kennedy railroad operations. The report illustrated the need for PSM pro-
cedures  related  to  the  railroad  by  discussing  several  railroad  mishaps  that  had  oc-
curred  over  the  previous  3  years.  After  reviewing  the  report,  Mr.  Cobb  stated  that 
the  report  was  ‘‘based  on  a  flawed  premise’’  and  directed  that  the  report  be  rewrit-
ten  to  address  the  need  for  improved  oversight  and  safety  procedures  for  the  KSC 
railroad  itself,  including  inspections  and  maintenance  of  the  railcars  and  the  track. 
This direction required additional work by the audit team despite the fact that suffi-
cient  work  related  to  the  PSM  issued  had  already  been  performed.  Due  to  the 
change  in  direction  of  the  assignment  by  Mr.  Cobb,  the  OIG  was  not  involved  in 
any further actions related to PSM as it applies to the Kennedy railroad. 
Conclusion 

In  summary,  by  constantly  writing  and  re-writing  audit  reports,  not  allowing  au-
dits of potentially controversial issues to be performed or reports of completed audits 
to be publicly issued, constantly denigrating the audit staff in public and in private, 
intimidating auditors and staff through the use of verbal threats, foul language and 
intimidating  gestures,  Mr.  Cobb  showed  that  he  lacked  independence  from  agency 
officials  and  was  willing  to  go  to  any  length  not  to  issue  audit  reports  that  would 
embarrass  the  agency.  In  my  opinion,  he  clearly  created  and  endorsed  a  hostile 
work environment. Thank you, and I would be pleased to answer any questions. 

Senator NELSON. Ms. Herzog? 

STATEMENT  OF  DEBRA  HERZOG,  SENIOR  ATTORNEY,  OFFICE 
OF  THE  INSPECTOR  GENERAL,  U.S.  POSTAL  SERVICE  AND 
FORMER  DEPUTY  ASSISTANT  INSPECTOR  GENERAL  FOR 
INVESTIGATIONS, NASA 
Ms. HERZOG. Good afternoon. Messrs. Chairmen and Members of 
the  Committees,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  here  today  to 
share  my  experiences  on—as  former  Deputy  Assistant  Inspector 
General for Investigations under Inspector General Robert Cobb. 

I  began  my  Federal  career  20  years  ago—over  20  years  ago,  in 
1983, as an assistant U.S. Attorney. I served in U.S. Attorneys’ of-
fices in such positions as chief of the narcotics section, regional co-
ordinator  of  the  Organized  Crime  Drug  Enforcement  Task  Force, 
public corruption and white-collar crime chief, chief of major inves-
tigations.  I  also  served  on  details  with  the  Department  of  Justice 
and with the United States Customs Service. In the 4 years before 
joining NASA, I was Senior Advisor to the Assistant Commissioner 
in the Office of Internal Affairs at the United States Customs Serv-
ice. 

In  November  2004,  I  was  selected  by  Inspector  General  Robert 
Cobb  as  the  Deputy  Assistant  Inspector  General  for  Investigations 
at the NASA OIG. I served in that position until December of 2005, 
when  I  joined  the  U.S.  Postal  Service  Office  of  Inspector  General 
as a senior attorney. 

My  testimony  today  summarizes  my  experiences  and  observa-
tions  during  my  tenure  at  the  Office  of  the  Inspector  General  at 
NASA. 

During  my  pre-employment  interview  with  Mr.  Cobb,  he  ex-
pressed  his  unhappiness  with  management  in  the  Office  of  Inves-
tigations,  stating,  ‘‘The  investigators  needed  a  grownup  to  super-
vise.’’  I  accepted  the  position,  with  the  impression  that  Mr.  Cobb 
wished  to  improve  the  quality  of  work  at  the  NASA  OIG,  and  be-
lieved that I would be instrumental in that effort. 

One  of  my  early  experiences  with  Mr.  Cobb  was  so  disturbing 
that  I  considered  leaving  the  OIG  almost  immediately  afterwards. 
At  a  scheduled  weekly  meeting,  Mr.  Cobb,  in  front  of  his  deputy 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

and  my  supervisor,  berated  me  concerning  a  word  in  a  letter.  In 
an  ensuing  monologue,  loudly  peppered  with  profanities,  Mr.  Cobb 
insulted and ridiculed me. After the meeting, I told Mr. Cobb, one- 
on-one, that I did not expect my superior to use profanity, that the 
use  of  profanity  was  unacceptable,  and  I  would  not  tolerate  pro-
fanity.  Mr.  Cobb  listened  and  gave  me  no  indication  if  he  agreed 
or disagreed. In the months to come, however, I regularly observed 
and  heard  of  Mr.  Cobb  using  profanity  to  berate  and  demean  em-
ployees. 

Mr.  Cobb  also  exhibited  a  consistent  lack  of  understanding  of 
Federal  law  enforcement.  In  two  cases  approximately  6  months 
apart,  Mr.  Cobb  was  notified  several  hours  before  NASA  OIG 
agents  and  FBI  agents  were  to  execute  search  warrants  at  NASA 
properties.  Mr.  Cobb  said  he  would  not  allow  the  warrants  to  pro-
ceed before reading the affidavits, despite the fact that the respon-
sible  OIG  supervisor  had  approved  the  warrants.  The  assistant 
United  States  Attorney  assigned  to  the  case  thought  the  warrants 
were  fine,  and  the  warrants  were  signed  by  a  United  States  mag-
istrate  judge.  After  reading  the  warrants,  Mr.  Cobb’s  opinions  in-
cluded:  there  was  no  probable  cause,  the  assistant  U.S.  Attorney 
was stupid, and the NASA agents must have hoodwinked the mag-
istrate. Mr. Cobb was also overly concerned about the possible reac-
tion  of  NASA  senior  management.  Finally,  after  much  discussion, 
Mr.  Cobb  reluctantly  allowed  the  agents  to  execute  the  warrants. 
During  my  short  tenure  at  NASA,  at  least  five  other  warrants 
were issued and executed in locations other than NASA properties. 
Mr.  Cobb  did  not  express  any  interest  in  those  affidavits  or  war-
rants. 

The incident that convinced me that I could no longer be effective 
in  my  job  occurred  in  August  2005.  Mr.  Cobb  directed  a  case  ac-
cepted  for  civil  prosecution  by  the  United  States  Attorneys  Office 
in the Central District of California be withdrawn pending a review 
of the investigation at OIG headquarters. In my 17 years as a Fed-
eral  prosecutor,  I  had  never  seen  that  done.  Mr.  Cobb  claimed  he 
was  not  aware  that  the  case  had  even  been  presented  to  the  U.S. 
Attorneys Office; however, a biweekly reporting document provided 
to Mr. Cobb in June proves otherwise. 

Subsequently,  Mr.  Cobb  claimed  that  the  NASA  special  agent  in 
charge  of  the  case  who  wrote  the  withdrawal  letter  was  trying  to 
‘‘set  him  up.’’  The  assistant  U.S.  attorney,  however,  had  endorsed 
the work of the case agent, the case preparation, and the investiga-
tive report. Yet, in a subsequent meeting about the case, Mr. Cobb 
leaned  over  his  desk,  just  feet  from  my  face,  his  face  red,  his  fists 
clenched, and screamed, at the same time slamming his hand down 
on the desk so hard that I jumped. ‘‘You know as well as I do that 
this report is a blanking piece of blank.’’ 

In closing, Mr. Cobb’s arrogance, bullying style, and questionable 
independence limit his ability to lead the NASA OIG, and, in turn, 
has  demoralized  the  NASA  workforce.  As  an  example,  a  recently 
hired  employee,  after  only  2  days  at  the  NASA  OIG,  called  the 
agency  she  left,  requesting  her  old  job  back,  because  most  of  her 
staff spent a good portion of the workday looking for a way out. 

I would be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Herzog follows:] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DEBRA HERZOG, SENIOR ATTORNEY, OFFICE OF INSPECTOR 
GENERAL, U.S. POSTAL SERVICE AND FORMER DEPUTY ASSISTANT INSPECTOR GEN-
ERAL FOR INVESTIGATIONS, NASA 
My  testimony  relates  to  my  experiences  and  observations  while  in  the  employ  of 
the NASA Office of the Inspector General (NASA OIG). I was the Deputy Assistant 
Inspector  General  (DAIGI)  for  Investigations  at  the  NASA  OIG  from  November  29, 
2004 through December 11, 2005. For more than half that period, I was Acting As-
sistant Inspector General (DAIGI) for Investigations. 

I  began  my  Federal  career  in  1983  at  the  U.S.  Attorney’s  Office  in  the  Eastern 
District  of  Missouri.  In  1986,  the  U.S.  Attorney  appointed  me  to  the  position  of 
Chief  of  the  Narcotics  Section  and  Regional  Coordinator  for  the  Organized  Crime 
Drug  Enforcement  Task  Force;  one  of  thirteen  regional  coordinators  nationwide.  I 
held that dual position until my transfer to the Southern District of Florida in July 
1990. 

I transferred into the Southern District of Florida as a Supervisory Assistant U.S. 
Attorney.  During  my  8  years  there,  I  held  several  supervisory  positions  in  the  Ft. 
Lauderdale  Branch  Office,  including  White  Collar  Crime/Public  Corruption  Chief, 
Chief  of  Major  Investigations  and  Acting  Managing  Assistant  U.S.  Attorney.  I  su-
pervised  anywhere  from  6  to  12  attorneys  as  a  section  chief,  and  approximately  40 
attorneys and 20 support staff personnel while Managing Assistant. 

In  1998,  I  accepted  a  one-year  detail  to  the  Department  of  Justice  Campaign  Fi-
nancing  Task  Force  in  Washington,  and  then  another  year’s  detail  to  the  Office  of 
Internal Affairs at the United States Customs Service. At the conclusion of that de-
tail, I accepted the position of Senior Advisor to the Assistant Commissioner, Office 
of  Internal  Affairs.  As  such,  I  assisted  in  supervising  investigative  activity  of  over 
120 Federal agents in up to twenty field offices. The agents investigated allegations 
of  criminal  conduct  and  serious  administrative  misconduct  by  Customs  employees. 
I  am  currently  a  Senior  Attorney  at  the  U.S.  Postal  Service  Office  of  Inspector 

General. 

Mr.  Cobb  selected  me  as  the  Deputy  Assistant  Inspector  General  (DAIGI)  for  In-
vestigations  in  late  2004.  When  I  began  working  at  the  NASA  OIG,  Lance 
Carrington  was  Assistant  Inspector  General  (AIGI)  and  my  immediate  supervisor. 
During  my  pre-employment  interview  Mr.  Cobb,  the  Inspector  General  (IG)  ex-
pressed his unhappiness with management in the Office of Investigations (OI), stat-
ing, ‘‘They need a grown-up back there.’’ I accepted the position with the impression 
that  Mr.  Cobb  wished  to  improve  the  quality  of  the  work  and  believed  I  would  be 
instrumental to that effort. 

During my first weeks at the NASA OIG, I endured an episode so disturbing that 
I  considered  leaving  the  OIG.  At  a  regularly  scheduled  weekly  meeting  among  Mr. 
Cobb,  his  deputy  and  my  supervisor,  Mr.  Cobb  berated  me,  reacting  to  a  word  in 
a  letter  I’d  edited.  In  the  ensuing  monologue,  which  was  loudly  peppered  with  pro-
fanities,  he  insulted  and  ridiculed  me.  I  advised  him  after  the  meeting  that  I  had 
never been spoken to like that in the workplace, that it was unacceptable, and that 
I did not expect my boss to use profanity, and I would not tolerate profanity in the 
workplace.  I  told  him  I  could  not  continue  to  work  there  if  it  persisted.  During  the 
following months, I observed or learned that Mr. Cobb directed profanity at and hu-
miliated and demeaned other employees. Gradually, I and many other employees as 
well as others involved in law enforcement lost all respect for Mr. Cobb. 

Mr. Cobb exhibited a consistent lack of understanding concerning Federal law en-
forcement. This became most apparent in two cases, approximately 6 months apart, 
in  which  he  clearly  failed  to  recognize  the  propriety  and  value  of  Federal  search 
warrants. 

In the first case, Mr. Cobb was notified that search warrants were to be executed 
by  NASA  OIG  agents  and  FBI  agents  at  NASA’s  Stennis  Space  Center.  I  was  not 
involved  in  the  matter  in  anyway  until  I  was  called  into  a  meeting  regarding  the 
warrant.  Mr.  Cobb  apparently  received  the  information  that  a  warrant  was  to  be 
executed  at  the  Stennis  Space  Center  within  hours  of  the  planned  execution.  Mr. 
Cobb  said  he  would  not  allow  the  warrants  to  proceed  before  he  read  the  warrant, 
despite  the  fact  that  NASA  OIG  agents  and  FBI  agents  were  poised  to  execute  the 
warrant,  a  NASA  OIG  supervisor  approved  the  warrant  and  it  was  signed  by  a 
United  States  Magistrate  Judge.  Yet,  after  reading  the  affidavit  in  support  of  the 
warrant,  Mr.  Cobb  opined  that  there  was  no  probable  cause  established  and  main-
tained his position that the NASA agents should not execute the warrant. When re-
minded  that  an  Assistant  United  States  Attorney  believed  the  warrant  was  suffi-
cient  and  that  a  United  States  Magistrate  Judge  signed  the  warrant—his  response 
was  essentially  that:  (1)  the  Assistant  United  States  Attorney  involved  was  stupid, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

and (2) that the assigned NASA agents must have ‘‘hoodwinked’’ the Magistrate. He 
actually said, ‘‘Who knows what our guys (the investigating agents) told the judge.’’ 
After  much  discussion,  Mr.  Cobb  reluctantly  allowed  the  agents  to  execute  the 
warrant.  However,  his  arrogance  appeared  to  have  interfered  with  any  possibility 
of educating him in the matter. Six months later, the scenario was repeated. 

On  Monday,  June  27,  2005,  while  I  was  Acting  Assistant  Inspector  General  for 
Investigations,  the  Resident  Agent  in  Charge  (RAC)  at  NASA’s  Marshall  Space 
Flight Center e-mailed me. His e-mail informed that agents in his office were work-
ing with an Assistant United States Attorney on a search warrant for an NASA em-
ployee’s  office  at  the  Marshall  Center.  The  e-mail  noted  that  the  agents  wanted  to 
execute  the  warrant  by  Thursday,  June  30,  as  the  employee  was  about  to  be  reas-
signed and they were concerned about losing evidence. 

On  Wednesday,  June  29,  the  RAC  called  and  advised  that  the  Assistant  United 
States  Attorney  approved  the  warrant  and  wanted  to  take  it  to  the  Magistrate 
Judge  forthwith.  I  hadn’t  finished  reading  the  affidavit,  but  as  I  am  intimately  fa-
miliar  with  the  warrant  review  process  in  U.S.  Attorneys  offices  and  the  in  the 
courts, I advised the agents to proceed to the Magistrate as requested by the AUSA. 
After  the  warrant  was  signed  by  the  U.S.  Magistrate  Judge,  I  e-mailed  Mr.  Cobb 
(who was out of town) advising that a warrant would be executed the following day 
at  Marshall.  I  advised  the  Deputy  Inspector  General  by  e-mail  and  in  person  and 
provided a copy of the warrant and affidavit to him. 

Mr. Cobb asked that I call him that evening. I did, and was greeted by his loudly- 
voiced accusations that there was no probable cause for the warrant; an interesting 
position  as  he  had  yet  to  see  the  affidavit  in  support  of  the  warrant.  I  had  sent  it 
to  him  in  encrypted  form  as  required  by  agency  policy  and  he  was  unable  to  open 
it on his Blackberry. As with the earlier warrant, Mr. Cobb was primarily concerned 
with first, why he I did not tell him about it earlier, and second, with the fact that 
it  was  a  warrant  at  a  NASA  Center.  He  directed  me  to  tell  the  agents  they  could 
not  to  execute  the  warrant  (despite  the  fact  he  had  not  seen  the  warrant  or  affi-
davit).  They  in  turn,  had  to  advise  the  FBI  agents  working  with  them  that  they 
could not participate in the warrant execution the following day. The warrant allows 
for  execution  within  10  days  of  the  date  the  U.S.  Magistrate  Judge  signs  it.  I  ad-
vised  the  agents  not  to  tell  the  U.S.  Attorney’s  Office,  of  Mr.  Cobb’s  decision  as  I 
hoped to persuade Mr. Cobb to change his mind when I had an opportunity to speak 
with  him  in  person.  The  FBI  agents,  however,  said  they  would  proceed  with  the 
warrant alone if the NASA OIG agents were not permitted to participate. 
———Original Message——— 
From: Herzog, Debra (HQ–WRH10) 
To: Cobb, Robert W. (HQ–WAH10) 
CC: Howard, Thomas J. (HQ–WAH10) 
Sent: Wed Jun 29 19:21:18 2005 
Subject: Search warrant 

Moose: 
If, after reading the affidavit you still believe that the warrant should not be exe-
cuted,  Jim  Haughton  is  prepared  to  walk  you  through  the  case  in  D.C.  on  Friday. 
I  want  to  reiterate,  however,  that  I  am  fully  responsible  for  authorizing  this  war-
rant. 

I  believe  that  using  criminal  processes  in  a  criminal  investigation,  particularly 
this  one,  is  appropriate  and  acted  accordingly.  I  also  believe  that  everyone  else  in-
volved acted with the same sincere belief. 

Jim  had  the  affidavit  faxed  this  evening  so  it  should  be  at  KSC  in  the  morning. 
My  Palm  is  not  receiving/sending  mail  again,  so  I  am  working  from  my  laptop. 
I  have  a  medical  appointment  tomorrow  afternoon  so  will  be  out  of  the  office  after 
2. You can reach me on my cell. Feel free to call me at home if you need to. 

Debbie 
When  Mr.  Cobb  arrived  back  in  the  office  on  July  1,  2007,  I  met  with  him  and 
the  Deputy  Inspector  General  for  several  hours.  The  meeting  was  lengthy,  and  at 
times,  Mr.  Cobb  called  in  his  counsel.  Mr.  Cobb’s  expressed  concerns  were:  (1)  the 
NASA  Center  Director’s  reaction  to  OIG  executing  a  warrant  and  what  he  would 
say when the Center Director called asking why the OIG was at his center. (2) that 
the Assistant United States Attorney didn’t know what he was doing and by impli-
cation,  as  the  warrant  was  signed  by  a  U.S.  Magistrate  Judge,  that  he  did  not  ei-
ther, and (3) the agents were only undertaking this warrant because they were ‘‘out 
to get him.’’ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

In both of these search warrant matters, it was Mr. Cobb’s position that everyone 
supporting the warrant—the agents, the prosecutor, me, the U.S. Magistrate—were 
either  wrong,  out  to  get  him,  stupid,  or  all  of  the  above.  Throughout  this  episode, 
Mr.  Cobb  kept  referring  back  to  the  first  warrant  and  its  issues  and  accused  me 
and the agents of pursuing this warrant ‘‘to rub his face in it.’’ 

In my short tenure at NASA, at least 5 other warrants were issued and executed 
at  locations  other  than  NASA  property.  Mr.  Cobb  did  not  express  any  interest  in 
those affidavits or warrants. 

The  last  incident  and  the  one  that  convinced  me  I  could  no  longer  be  effective  in 
my  job,  occurred  just  2  months  later.  In  June  2005,  agents  in  the  field  office  pre-
sented a case to the Civil Frauds Division of the U.S. Attorneys Office for the Cen-
tral  District  of  California.  The  case  was  accepted  for  civil  prosecution.  A  letter  out-
lining the case and containing a number of attachments was provided to the Assist-
ant U.S. Attorney assigned to the matter. 

On  Tuesday,  August  23,  2005,  en  route  to  conduct  in-service  training  for  the 
NASA  OIG  Western  Field  Office,  I  received  an  e-mail  from  Mr.  Cobb  regarding  a 
case. The e-mail began: 

I would like [the Western Field Office Special Agent in Charge] to send (ASAP) 
a  letter  to  the  U.S.  Attorney  withdrawing  the  August  1  report  on  the  Genesis 
investigation pending a review of the investigation at OIG headquarters. 

I  took  the  opportunity  to  consult  with  the  Western  Field  Office  Special  Agent  in 
Charge  and  Counsel  to  the  Inspector  General  the  next  morning  as  we  were  all  at 
the same training. I wanted to see if they knew of any reason why Mr. Cobb would 
direct  this  withdrawal.  When  I  determined  they  did  not,  I  e-mailed  Mr.  Cobb.  In 
my e-mail I asked Mr. Cobb if there was any urgency to the request as the Western 
Field Office Special Agent in Charge and I wished to speak with him or in the alter-
native,  have  him  speak  with  the  AUSA  before  this  ‘‘withdrawal’’  was  undertaken. 
He  directed  me  to  do  as  previously  instructed.  The  Western  Field  Office  Special 
Agent in Charge wrote the letter and delivered it to the U.S. Attorney’s Office. 

After reviewing the letter, Mr. Cobb told me he thought the Western Field Office 
Special Agent in Charge was trying to ‘‘set him up.’’ He said he only meant to with-
draw  the  document,  not  the  case.  That  was  simply  not  true.  His  e-mails  made  it 
quite clear that he thought the case should be re-evaluated to determine if it should 
have  been  referred  to  the  U.S.  Attorneys  Office  in  the  first  place.  He  also  claimed 
he was not advised the case had been presented, but a bi-weekly case reporting doc-
ument provided to Mr. Cobb in June unmistakably contradicts his claim. 

The  Assistant  United  States  Attorney  assigned  to  the  matter,  a  10-year  veteran 
of her office and Deputy Chief of the Civil Frauds Division, wrote a letter applaud-
ing the efforts of the agents on the case, expressed her support for the case and out-
lined potential legal theories. At a meeting between the two of us, Mr. Cobb insinu-
ated  to  me  that  we  ‘‘had’’  the  AUSA  write  the  letter.  He  leaned  over  his  desk,  just 
feet  from  my  face,  his  face  red,  and  his  fists  clenched  and  screamed  at  the  same 
time  slamming  his  hand  on  his  on  desk  so  hard  I  jumped.  ‘‘. . .  you  know  as  well 
as I do that this report is a fucking piece of shit’’ (or ‘‘crap’’).1 

Mr.  Cobb’s  arrogance,  his  abusive,  bullying  style,  absence  of  managerial  experi-
ence, limited understanding of investigative processes, egotism and misplaced sense 
of  self-importance  make  it  impossible  for  him  to  successfully  manage  and  lead  an 
organization. 

Many employees left, many are trying to. As recently as last week, a newly-hired 
employee  who  took  the  job  because  it  was  a  promotion,  called  the  agency  she  left 
requesting  her  old  job  back  after  only  2  days  at  the  NASA  OIG.  The  new  hire  said 
that  much  of  the  staff  spent  a  good  portion  of  the  workday  looking  for  a  way  out. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Carrington? 

STATEMENT  OF  LANCE  CARRINGTON,  DEPUTY  ASSISTANT 
INSPECTOR  GENERAL  INVESTIGATIONS,  OFFICE  OF  THE 
INSPECTOR  GENERAL,  U.S.  POSTAL  SERVICE;  AND  FORMER 
ASSISTANT  INSPECTOR  GENERAL  FOR  INVESTIGATIONS, 
NASA 
Mr.  CARRINGTON.  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Commit-
tees,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  today  to  share  my  ex-

1 I am unsure which at this time which of these words he used. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

perience  as  the  former  NASA  Assistant  Inspector  General  for  In-
vestigations. 

Senator NELSON. Pull that microphone a little closer. 
Mr. CARRINGTON. Yes, sir. 
My  professional  life  is  one  of  public  service,  starting  with  over  6 
years of active duty in the United States Army and 12 years in the 
Army Reserve. I spent 17 years with the NASA Office of Inspector 
General,  and  the  last  2  years  with  the  Postal  Service  Office  of  In-
spector  General.  In  25  years  of  public  service,  I  have  served  as  a 
Federal law enforcement officer, manager, and executive. 

When  I  became  the  NASA  OIG  Assistant  Inspector  General  for 
Investigations,  in  September  2002,  Mr.  Cobb  told  me  his  expecta-
tions  of  my  performance  included  being  responsible  for  everything 
that  happened  in  the  Office  of  Investigations,  and  he  further  ex-
pected me to know every detail on every case at all times. We had 
over  400  open  cases.  It  was  an  impossible  expectation  for  anyone. 
Mr. Cobb complained that agents couldn’t write, and he referred 
to  their  work  as  ‘‘crap,’’  regardless  of  case  successes.  He  also  re-
ferred  to  the  agents  as  ‘‘knuckle-draggers.’’  He  would  disparage 
agents in front of the rest of the office. To help mitigate Mr. Cobb’s 
negative attitude about the agents, I personally reviewed and edit-
ed every investigative report or document that Mr. Cobb would see. 
I  repeatedly  asked  Mr.  Cobb  what  his  expectations  were  and 
what  we  could  do  better.  He  always  replied  that  he  didn’t  know, 
but, when he saw it, he would tell me. 

Other  than  Mr.  Cobb  telling  me  to  keep  him  informed  of  any-
thing  and  everything,  he  never  told  me  what  he  wanted,  in  the  3 
years I was there. 

Mr.  Cobb  became  upset  because  the  agents  worked  criminal  and 
civil  cases  under  the  direction  of  the  U.S.  Attorneys  Office.  He 
would  tell  me,  and  other  senior  managers,  that  agents  don’t  work 
for  the  U.S.  Attorney,  and  for  us  to  make  sure  the  agents  knew 
their boss was the IG. 

Mr. Cobb’s personal interaction with the staff consisted of yelling 
and demeaning. And the more it affected them, the more he did it. 
In  one  instance,  Mr.  Cobb  had  asked  an  attorney  for  a  legal  opin-
ion,  but,  after  he  heard  her  opinion,  he  told  her  her  legal  opinion 
didn’t  count,  that  his  legal  opinion  was  the  only  one  that  counted. 
He  then  proceeded  to  demean  and  ridicule  her  in  front  of  the 
group. 

Mr.  Cobb  routinely  used  profanity  when  he  spoke  to  me  and 
other  employees,  stating,  ‘‘F  them’’  and  ‘‘GD  them.’’  It  was  a  reg-
ular occurrence that offended many people in the office. On one oc-
casion,  Ms.  Debra  Herzog,  my  deputy,  was  trying  to  make  a  legal 
point with Mr. Cobb from her perspective as a former Federal pros-
ecutor. Mr. Cobb did not agree with her, so he leaned forward and 
yelled  and  cussed  at  her.  As  tears  began  welling  in  her  eyes,  I 
changed the subject so we could leave the room. 

At  my  performance  review  sessions,  Mr.  Cobb  would  say  he 
wasn’t happy. When I asked him for details, he would say that ev-
erything was wrong, and I had better fix it. He never provided me 
with any specific examples. 

Once,  I  showed  Mr.  Cobb  a  $3.94  million  settlement  check  pay-
able  to  NASA,  we  had  just  received.  Mr.  Cobb’s  response  was,  it 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

didn’t  mean  anything  to  him.  I  asked  him  why,  and  he  said,  ‘‘Be-
cause  I  had  nothing  to  do  with  it.’’  I  explained  that  it  was  rep-
resentative  of  our  office.  He  told  me  it  didn’t  matter,  because  he 
didn’t have anything to do with it. 

Mr.  Cobb  appeared  to  have  a  lack  of  independence  when  NASA 
officials  were  the  subjects  of  investigation  or  if  arrests  or  search 
warrants  were  obtained  for  NASA  facilities.  Mr.  Cobb  would  ques-
tion  every  aspect  of  these  cases,  much  more  than  the  non-NASA- 
subject  cases.  It  gave  us  the  appearance  that  he  wanted  to  derail 
them before the agents were given adequate time to investigate the 
allegations. There were cases where search warrants were obtained 
for  NASA  offices  and  computers,  but  Mr.  Cobb  declared  that  there 
was  no  probable  cause,  and  he  didn’t  want  the  NASA  agents  exe-
cuting  the  warrants.  I  explained  to  Mr.  Cobb  that  the  cases  were 
joint with the FBI, and the searches would be executed anyway. He 
then allowed us to participate. 

Our  Houston  office  was  asked  by  the  NASA—the  Johnson  Space 
Center Legal Office to assist the Texas Rangers with their ongoing 
investigation into an alleged missing ring, property of one of the fe-
male  Columbia  astronauts.  The  Rangers  had  exhausted  all  leads 
attempting to determine if the ring existed and whether it was sto-
len.  As  a  last  resort,  the  Rangers  drafted  a  Crime  Stoppers  Alert 
they  planned  to  distribute  to  the  media,  and,  as  a  courtesy,  asked 
the OIG to review it. I provided Mr. Cobb a copy of the draft alert. 
Mr.  Cobb  became  very  upset,  lost  his  temper,  and  yelled  and 
cussed  at  me,  saying  that  if  the  media  got  a  hold  of  it,  he  would 
have  to  resign.  I  reminded  him  that  it  was  not  our  case,  and  that 
we  were  merely  assisting  the  Rangers,  at  the  request  of  NASA. 
Later  that  evening,  Mr.  Cobb  called  me  at  home  and  proceeded  to 
yell  and  use  profanities  at  me  again.  Mr.  Cobb  was  so  loud,  I  had 
to  go  into  the  garage  so  my  family  would  not  hear  him.  Mr.  Cobb 
would  not  listen  or  try  to  understand  it  was  the  Rangers  decision. 
He continued to yell and use profanities, saying that he would have 
to resign if the alert was released. 

I  didn’t  understand  why  Mr.  Cobb  was  so  upset  about  the  alert, 
until  weeks  later,  at  an  OIG  senior  staff  meeting.  Mr.  Cobb  men-
tioned the NASA Administrator had previously ordered him and all 
NASA  senior  staff  not  to  speak  or  do  anything  with  the  Columbia 
astronaut  families.  I  then  realized  that  if  the  OIG  was  associated 
with the Rangers’ Crime Stoppers Alert, Mr. Cobb considered him-
self  to  be  in  direct  violation  of  the  order  from  the  NASA  Adminis-
trator. 

Mr.  Cobb  told  me  he  didn’t  like  the  special  agent  in  charge  at 
Goddard  Space  Flight  Center,  and  directed  me  to  get  rid  of  him. 
I asked Mr. Cobb why, because he was doing a good job. Mr. Cobb 
said  he  didn’t  want  him  around.  I  told  the  special  agent  in  charge 
if  he  was  offered  an  opportunity  elsewhere,  he  should  take  it,  be-
cause Mr. Cobb did not want him around. About a month later, he 
left to take a job with the Transportation Security Administration. 
A  short  while  after  the  special  agent  in  charge  departed,  Mr. 
Cobb told me he wasn’t happy with me, but this time he threatened 
to  make  me  the  special  agent  in  charge  at  Goddard.  I  asked  Mr. 
Cobb for specific reasons, and he said he was just not happy. I told 
him I had done everything he had asked me to do. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Mr.  Cobb  was  never  happy  with  anything  we  did  in  the  Office 
of Investigations. I finally asked him if he even wanted us working 
cases.  He  told  me,  ‘‘No.’’  And  I  said  if  that  was  the  situation,  then 
he  didn’t  need  me  around.  He  agreed.  So,  I  told  him  I  would  seek 
employment  elsewhere.  Two  weeks  later,  I  gave  him  my  2-weeks 
notice. 

I will be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 
Senator NELSON. Dr. Light? 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  PAUL  C.  LIGHT,  PAULETTE  GODDARD 
PROFESSOR  OF  PUBLIC  SERVICE,  ROBERT  F.  WAGNER 
SCHOOL OF PUBLIC SERVICE, NEW YORK UNIVERSITY 
Dr. LIGHT. It’s a pleasure to be here today. I’m not going to talk 
about  this  particular  case.  What  I’d  like  to  do  is  give  you  a  little 
background  on  the  expectations  of  Congress  in  enacting  the  1978 
Act regarding the kind of person they hoped would serve as Inspec-
tor General. 

I  should  note  that  Congress,  in  passing  the  1978  Act,  had  many 
options for creating a much closer relationship between the Inspec-
tor  General  and  the  head  of  the  establishment,  be  it  a  Secretary 
or  an  Administrator.  Congress  did  not  accept  that  alternative  vi-
sion  of  the  Inspector  General,  despite  uniform  opposition  from  the 
Executive  Branch  and  from  the  President  of  the  United  States; 
they  eventually  worked  toward  an  agreement  to  create  a  quasi- 
independent  Inspector  General  in  order  to  assure  the  kind  of  safe 
harbor,  if  you  will,  for  investigations  and  auditing  that  we  see  in 
the statute now. 

In  terms  of  expectations  from  the  Inspector  General  in  behavior 

and operations, I’m going to highlight five specific areas. 

The  first  is  that  Congress  expected,  and  demanded  in  statute, 
that  there  be  expertise  in  the  Inspector  General,  that  the  indi-
vidual  appointed  as  Inspector  General  have  specific  skills  that 
would  allow  him  or  her  to  effectively  discharge  their  duties.  The 
primary  focus  of  this  list  of  expertise  was  on  auditing  investiga-
tions, a set of skills that would allow the Inspector General to dis-
charge his or her duties effectively. 

In  reading  through  the  legislative  record  on  the  history  of  the 
statute,  and  also  the  precedent  set  in  the  early  appointments,  we 
see that there is also an expectation that the Inspector General be 
a strong manager of the office. Congress understood that the Office 
of  Inspectors  General  would—Offices  of  Inspectors  General  would 
be  small,  that  they  would  have  relatively  meager  resources  in  the 
grand scheme of things, and that they would have to be well man-
aged  to  produce  the  highest  level  of  productivity  possible.  There-
fore,  Congress  expected  that  the  individuals  would  be  of  the  high-
est caliber possible, including expertise in management. 

They also expected, for a second characteristic, that the Inspector 
General be a leader who was a wise steward of the resources at his 
or  her  disposal.  The  Offices  of  Inspectors  General  are  fragile  enti-
ties.  They  are  not  particularly  popular  within  their  agencies.  It’s 
not  that  individuals  run  from  them,  but  it  is  rare  that  the  Office 
of  Inspector  General  employees  are  greeted  with  great  friendship 
and  glory  when  they  enter  to  make  their  investigation  or  audit 
presence known. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Number three, Congress expected that the Inspectors General be 
assertive.  The  mandate  in  the  statute  is  actually  extremely  broad, 
in terms of what the Inspector General—Inspectors General are al-
lowed to do. They’re to inspect and audit and examine, for the pur-
pose  of  improving  the  economy  and  efficiency  of  government,  not 
just  piling  up  statistics  about  small-caliber  fraud,  waste,  and 
abuse.  They’re  to  reach  toward  the  broadest  agenda  possible  and 
maximize  their  impact  through—their  activities  through  the  pow-
ers that they were given in the statute, which are significant. 

Number  four,  the  Congressional  designers  expected  maximum 
independence.  This  is,  in  fact,  a  lonely  job.  The  individual  who 
serves  as  Inspector  General  must,  at  the—on  the  one  hand,  have 
a  strong  relationship  with  the  Administrator,  but  it  must  be  inde-
pendent.  Sad  to  say,  there  are  very  few  ways  in  which  the  Inspec-
tor  General  can  forge  the  kind  of  close  friendships  that  we  some-
times  see  envisioned  without  compromising  the  appearance  and/or 
substance  of  his  or  her  behavior.  And  we  have  to  be  careful  about 
that.  You  might  wish  to  play  golf  with  the  Administrator,  but  you 
create the appearance, in doing so, of a compromised freedom of in-
vestigation. And once that compromise occurs, you can never get it 
back. 

Number  five  expectation  is  integrity,  that  the  individual  who 
serves  has  an  impeccable  reputation,  that  he  or  she  is  the  source 
of  strong  morale,  a  sense  of  esprit  de  corps  within  the  office,  and 
a  strong  commitment  to  the  most  effective  operation  possible. 
Through the exercise of independence, through the assertiveness in 
using  the  wide  range  of  responsibilities  embedded  in  the  statute, 
this  integrity  becomes  the  essential  coin  of  the  realm  in  the  IG’s 
performance. 

I’d be delighted to talk with you further about these expectations 
and  how  we  get  them  through  the  appointments  process,  or  not, 
and will look forward to receiving your questions. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Light follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  PAUL C.  LIGHT,  PAULETTE GODDARD PROFESSOR OF 
PUBLIC SERVICE, ROBERT F. WAGNER SCHOOL OF PUBLIC SERVICE, NEW YORK UNI-
VERSITY 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  this  joint  hearing  on  the  con-
troversies surrounding the National Space and Aeronautics Administration’s Inspec-
tor General (IG), Robert Cobb. I am not an expert on his case, but have studied the 
IG concept for twenty years, and hope to provide a brief overview of the authorities 
and expectations embedded in the 1978 Inspector General Act. 

The current controversy surrounding Robert Cobb stems from authorities and ex-
pectations  embedded  in  that  act.  Passed  against  nearly  uniform  Executive  Branch 
opposition,  the  bill  created  Offices  of  Inspector  General  (OIGs)  in  12  departments 
and agencies, adding to the two statutory OIGs that already existed—one in Health, 
Education,  and  Welfare  (about  to  be  divided  into  the  departments  of  Health  and 
Human Services and Education) and the other in Energy. By 1988, the concept had 
been  expanded  to  include  the  rest  of  the  Federal  Government,  including  33  small- 
entities.  Subsequent  expansions  have  created  either  OIGs  in  57  Federal  establish-
ments,  some  headed  by  Senate-confirmed  IGs  and  others  led  by  Presidentially-ap-
pointed IGs. 

The  basic  thrust  of  the  IG  Act,  under  which  Mr.  Cobb  serves  as  a  Senate-con-
firmed  appointee,  was  remarkably  simple.  On  one  level,  it  consolidated  what  were 
then dozens of separate, often scattered audit and investigation units into single op-
erations headed by a Presidential appointee. On another level, it created new expec-
tations  for  economy  and  efficiency  in  government  through  the  appointment  of  IGs 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

with impeccable integrity and thoughtful leadership. Being an IG was always to be 
an exceedingly difficult post, placing the occupant in the sometimes precarious posi-
tion  of  speaking  truth  to  power  at  both  ends  of  Pennsylvania  Avenue.  But  given 
enough  resources  and  integrity,  the  OIGs  were  to  help  rebuild  trust  in  government 
through  their  aggressive  pursuit  of  accountability  in  all  corners  of  their  establish-
ment. 
Authorities 

Compared to most of the bills that passed in 1978, the Inspector General Act was 
almost  invisible.  Reorganizing  the  varied  audit  and  investigation  units  into  single- 
headed  Offices  of  Inspector  General  was  hardly  the  stuff  of  which  major  controver-
sies are made. Nor was the IG statute particularly complex—it lays out the respon-
sibilities and authorities of each OIG with clarity. 

Yet,  whatever  its  legislative  history  or  complexity,  there  is  no  question  Congress 
gave  the  IGs  unmistakably  broad  authorities.  Under  statute,  the  IGs  to  provide  di-
rection  for  conducting  audits  and  investigations  both  including  and  relating  to  the 
programs  and  operations  of  their  establishments,  they  had  a  long  list  of  ancillary 
duties: review existing and proposed legislation and regulations for impacts on econ-
omy and efficiency, coordinate relationships between the department or agency and 
other Federal agencies, state and local governments, and non-governmental entities, 
and,  most  importantly,  promote  the  general  economy,  efficiency,  and  effectiveness  of 
their establishments. 

Broad as this invitation is, what made the IG concept much more significant was 

the decision to protect those new units through at least three devices. 

First,  even  though  each  IG  was  to  be  a  Presidential  appointee  and  removable 
without  cause,  each  was  to  be  selected  ‘‘without  regard  to  political  affiliation  and 
solely on the basis of integrity and demonstrated ability in accounting, auditing, fi-
nancial  analysis,  law,  management  analysis,  public  administration,  or  investiga-
tions.’’  Further,  each  IG,  not  the  President  nor  the  head  of  the  establishment,  was 
to  appoint  an  Assistant  IG  for  Audit  and  an  Assistant  IG  for  Investigations,  and 
each  IG  was  given  full  authority  to  undertake  whatever  audits  and  investigations 
he  or  she  each  deemed  necessary  to  improve  economy  and  efficiency.  There  was  to 
be no interference from Congress or the President on the OIG’s workplan or agenda. 
Second,  every  IG  was  to  have  access  to  all  ‘‘information,  documents,  reports,  an-
swers, records, accounts, papers, and other data and documentary evidence’’ needed 
for an audit or investigation, the right to request assistance from within the agency 
and information from across government, the authority to subpoena documents (but 
not witnesses or testimony), the right to hire and fire staff, and ‘‘direct and prompt’’ 
access to the Secretary or Administrator whenever necessary for any purpose. More-
over, neither the head of the establishment nor the second in command was to pre-
vent  or  prohibit  the  IG  from  ‘‘initiating,  carrying  out,  or  completing  any  audit  or 
investigation, or from issuing any subpoena during the course of any audit or inves-
tigation.’’ 

Third,  every  IG  was  bound  by  a  two-fold,  dual-channel  reporting  requirement. 
One  was  a  relatively  simple  semi-annual  report  to  the  head  of  the  department  or 
agency. Automatically forwarded unchanged to Congress within 30 days, each report 
was  to  include  a  description  of  every  significant  problem,  abuse,  and  deficiency  the 
IG  encountered  in  the  previous  6  months,  as  well  as  lists  of  recommendations  and 
results.  The  other  was  a  so-called  ‘‘7  day  letter’’  report  to  the  head  of  the  depart-
ment or agency to be used only in the event of ‘‘particularly serious or flagrant prob-
lems,  abuses,  or  deficiencies.’’  This  much  shorter  report  was  also  to  be  transmitted 
unchanged to Congress, but within 7 days. 
Expectations 

As  one  might  expect,  Congress  did  not  give  these  substantial  authorities  without 
a  strong  sense  that  the  IGs  would  be  above  reproach  in  using  them.  Members  of 
Congress  spoke  frequently  about  the  need  for  the  highest  commitment  to  faithful 
execution of the IG mandate, and the hope that Presidents would take that faithful 
execution  seriously  in  the  appointment  of  each  IG,  whether  subject  to  Senate  con-
firmation or Presidential appointment without confirmation. 

Reading through the record accompanying the Act and its twenty-five years of im-
plementation, one can discern at least five qualities that Congress expected the IGs 
to meet: 

1.  Expertise:  Congress  clearly  expected  each  IG  to  have  substantial  knowledge 
of  auditing  and  investigations,  and  made  that  expectation  clear  in  the  demand 
for  significant  experience  in  these  areas.  Although  the  list  of  qualifications  al-
lows for the appointment of individuals who clearly share the President’s philo-
sophical  agenda,  the  focus  was  to  be  on  expertise  in  actually  executing  the  du-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

ties  of  the  office.  Simply  put,  Congress  expected  the  IGs  to  be  experts  in  their 
field.  For  the  most  part,  it  is  an  expectation  well  met  over  the  years,  in  part 
due  to  consultation  with  leading  IGs  on  potential  replacements.  Under  no  cir-
cumstances  was  the  IG  post  to  be  a  destination  for  the  hard-to-place  or  under- 
qualified.  Although  Congress  did  not  expect  the  IGs  to  be  rocket  scientists, 
whether  literally  or  figuratively,  it  did  expect  the  IGs  to  be  above  reproach  in 
their ability to direct the high-impact work of their offices. 
2.  Leadership:  Despite  the  substantial  authorities  for  audit  and  investigation, 
Congress  understood  that  the  OIGs  would  not  be  the  largest  units  in  their  es-
tablishments. Therefore, Congress expected that the IG would provide the kind 
of  managerial  leadership  to  generate  the  highest  productivity  and  esprit  de 
corps  from  what  would,  and  have  been,  relatively  small  units.  Under  no  cir-
cumstances  would  Congress  have  embraced  the  appointment  of  an  IG  who 
would  undermine  the  productivity  of  his  or  her  unit  through  employee  abuse 
or  practices  that  in  any  way  created  a  hostile  work  environment.  Members 
wanted  the  IGs  to  strengthen  their  offices,  create  healthy  working  conditions, 
and  build  units  stronger  than  the  sum  of  their  parts.  If  the  IGs  encountered 
employees who were under-performing, Congress expected the IGs to take direct 
action  to  remove  them  from  their  posts.  But  above  all,  the  IGs  were  to  leave 
their  units  stronger  when  they  moved  on  to  other  assignments.  A  hostile  work 
environment was not just anathema to effectiveness in the search for improved 
performance, it would set an example for other units in the establishment. The 
IG  simply  cannot  create  a  situation  in  which  his  or  her  employees  lost  faith  in 
their leadership due to managerial practices that undermine productivity. 
3.  Assertiveness:  Congress  clearly  wanted  the  IGs  to  have  substantial  freedom 
to  follow  their  instincts  in  developing  an  independent  audit  and  investigation 
agenda. Toward that end, they expected the OIGs to pursue any and every lead 
they wish, allocate personnel where they felt the greatest returns would be har-
vested,  and  be  aggressive  in  tackling  problems  from  the  top  to  the  bottom  of 
the establishment. Hence, they gave the IG substantial authority to launch any 
audit or investigation deemed responsible, and expected the IG to use his or her 
judgment, and his or her judgment alone, to determine the OIGs agenda. 
These  authorities  were  to  be  used  to  build  an  agenda  that  would  improve  the 
economy  and  efficiency  of  the  establishment.  Although  the  IGs  must  make 
tough choices about how to deploy their OIG resources, they were to create the 
broadest impact possible, including programmatic evaluations if necessary. They 
were  not  to  be  mere  fraud  busters,  though  attacking  fraud,  waste,  and  abuse 
was to be part of their agenda. They were also to ask tough questions that oth-
ers could or would not. Under all circumstances, the OIGs were to be a safe har-
bor for speaking truth to power on the broadest possible agenda. They were not 
to be lapdogs, but watchdogs. 
4.  Independence:  The  IGs  are  not  just  any  Presidential  appointees.  Although 
they do serve at the pleasure of the President, they are given substantial inde-
pendence in their work. Congress expected this independence to be guarded ag-
gressively.  Under  no  circumstances  was  the  IG  to  compromise  his  or  her  inde-
pendence  by  giving  others  in  the  establishment,  Congress,  or  the  White  House 
a  determining  voice  in  setting  the  audit  and  investigation  agenda.  Thus,  Con-
gress  expected  the  IGs  and  their  offices  to  be  astutely  independent.  Although 
the  OIGs  would  clearly  need  the  cooperation  of  the  senior  leadership  of  their 
establishments  to  implement  their  recommendations  for  improvement,  they 
were  not  to  create  the  appearance  or  reality  that  the  head  of  their  establish-
ment was somehow altering or setting the course of the OIGs workplan. 
Although  this  expectation  clearly  has  costs  to  the  IGs,  not  the  least  of  which 
is  a  degree  of  isolation  from  the  senior  leadership  team,  most  IGs  have  been 
able  to  handle  the  expectation  with  ease.  This  has  meant  that  the  IGs  must 
maintain  a  sense  of  distance  from  any  hint  that  the  head  of  the  establishment 
has  a  direct  say  in  the  OIGs  workplan—no  golf  games,  intimate  lunches,  even 
team-building retreats. And, in the same spirit of independence, the senior lead-
ership  team  must  maintain  its  distance  from  the  OIG—no  all-staff  meetings  to 
scold  the  office,  no  memoranda  outlining  what  the  head  of  the  establishment 
wants  in  or  out  of  the  workplan,  no  sense  that  the  OIG  is  somehow  beholden 
to  the  head  of  the  establishment  or  that  it  will  be  punished  through  staff  and 
budget cuts if it adopts a particular audit or investigation strategy. 
In  a  very  real  sense,  IGs  must  isolate  themselves  from  the  senior  leadership 
team  even  as  they  try  to  cultivate  a  working  relationship  that  will  allow  them 
access when needed to assure that the senior leadership team follows their rec-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

ommendations for action. After all, the vast majority of IG recommendations in-
volve  administrative,  not  legislative  action.  Hence,  the  job  has  been  described 
as  like  straddling  a  barbed  wire  fence.  But  this  access  cannot  be  distorted  in 
such  a  way  as  to  create  the  appearance  that  the  head  of  the  establishment  is 
somehow  ‘‘the  boss’’  of  the  OIG,  especially,  but  not  exclusively,  in  setting  the 
OIGs agenda. That responsibility belongs to the IG, whose ultimate boss is the 
taxpayer. 
Presidents can remove IGs without cause, of course, implying that Congress ex-
pected them to always remove IGs with cause, including instances when the IG 
cedes his or her independence to another actor. IGs are free to listen to all opin-
ions regarding their agenda perhaps, but not to create the impression or reality 
that they are taking direction. To do so would create an impossible dependence 
and  cooptation  that  would  undermine  their  presence  as  an  independent  source 
of recommendations to Congress and the President. It would also severely com-
promise the IG’s ability to investigate upward into the executive suite of the es-
tablishment. 
5. Integrity: Congress expected the IGs to be men and women of impeccable in-
tegrity  and  honesty.  Along  with  the  exhortation  to  maintain  full  independence, 
Congress  hoped  that  the  President  would  make  every  effort  to  find  individuals 
for appointment who could be trusted with the authorities and mandate embed-
ded in statute. Although Congress did not create a special appointment mecha-
nism (such as the one used for the appointment of the Comptroller General) or 
term of office (such as the fifteen year term also governing the Comptroller Gen-
eral), it merely assumed that Presidents would understand that the IGs had to 
bring  both  the  reputation  and  substance  of  integrity  to  their  posts.  After  all, 
they  would  be  under  constant  watch  by  the  establishments  they  would  audit 
and  investigation,  and  could  not  tolerate  even  the  hint  that  they  played  favor-
ites  or  curried  favor  in  their  work.  They  had  to  be  more  than  just  experts  in 
auditing  and  investigation,  they  had  be  exemplars  in  their  behavior.  Under  no 
circumstances did Congress expect that the IGs could be effective under a cloud 
of suspicion regarding their integrity. 
6.  Courage:  Finally,  Congress  expected  the  IGs  and  their  offices  to  be  coura-
geous in their work. The IGs and OIGs were never going to be the most popular 
employees in their establishment—Congress knew that many in their establish-
ments  would  oppose  them,  fear  them,  and  work  to  undermine  them.  They  also 
knew that many in their establishments would fashion arguments against OIG 
findings  using  every  tool  at  their  disposal,  sometimes  stonewalling  the  OIG, 
other  times  using  gossip  to  undermine  the  IG  as  somehow  less  than  effective 
or independence. 
Thus,  the  IGs  had  to  show  the  courage  of  their  convictions  in  stating  their  in-
tention  to  use  their  authorities  to  take  any  course  in  meeting  their  mandate, 
even if that course led upward to the highest levels of the agencies. Toward this 
end,  the  IGs  and  their  offices  had  to  draw  a  bright  line  between  informing  the 
head  of  the  establishment  of  their  workplan  and  letting  the  head  of  the  estab-
lishment  determine  their  workplan.  Under  no  circumstances  was  the  IG  to  cre-
ate even the slightest appearance that he or she had somehow delegated their au-
thorities upward for any reason. 

As  with  so  much  that  occurs  in  organizations,  appearance  is  often  just  as  impor-
tant  as  reality  in  affecting  these  kinds  of  expectations.  It  may  be  that  an  IG  can 
be best friends with the head of the establishment, and still maintain independence, 
but the appearance is created that the head of the establishment has a special voice 
in setting the workplan. It may also be that the head of the establishment can have 
a brass-tacks meeting with the OIG staff to explain what he or she wants in or out 
of the workplan, and not intimate the office into a cowering compliance, but the ap-
pearance  is  created  that  the  head  of  the  establishment  again  has  a  special  voice  in 
determining the workplan. 

In  this  regard,  Congress  clearly  understood  that  the  IG’s  effectiveness  would  be 
determined  in  part  by  the  head  of  the  establishment  who  could  bully,  intimate,  ca-
jole,  and  otherwise  attempt  to  influence  the  IG  into  following  some  leads  and  not 
others.  Congress  also  understood  that  some  IGs  might  be  tempted  by  the  oppor-
tunity  to  socialize  with  the  head  of  the  establishment  as  part  of  the  normal  give 
and  take  of  life  in  a  highly  stressful  environment.  But  by  NOT  insulating  the  ap-
pointments  process  with  a  special  appointment  mechanism  or  term  of  office,  Con-
gress  seemed  to  be  saying  that  such  behavior  would  never  occur  if  the  basic  quali-
fications for IG appointment were meant. After all, what kind of auditor or investi-
gator  would  curry  favor  or  socialize  with  those  who  might  be  committing  fraud, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

waste,  and  abuse?  Not  one  who  would  be  given  the  enormous  authorities  and  inde-
pendence embedded in a statute such as the 1978 Inspector General Act. 

Later  Congresses  also  understood  that  the  IG’s  effectiveness  would  also  depend 
on  the  protection  of  the  Deputy  Director  for  Management  at  the  Office  of  Manage-
ment and Budget. This individual would act as a buffer during moments of intense 
conflict  between  the  IG  and  his  or  her  establishment,  assure  that  appointments 
were the highest quality, coordinate the IG community, protect budgets and employ-
ment,  and  serve  as  a  ‘‘court  of  last  resort’’  in  particularly  difficult  cases  involving 
questions  regarding  the  competence  and  behavior  of  individual  IGs.  As  long  as  the 
Deputy Director for Management took these assignments seriously, Congress saw no 
need for a government-wide inspector general or new appointment mechanism. But, 
to  the  extent  that  the  Deputy  Director  of  Management  might  be  conflicted  in  this 
role—for  example,  by  playing  a  significant  role  in  the  selection  of  an  IG  in  a  pre-
vious post—or ignore the role altogether, Congress may yet have to revisit its earlier 
decisions. 

Ultimately,  however,  the  quality  of  an  IG’s  work  depends  on  his  or  her  own  will-
ingness  to  stand  independent  and  courageous  in  the  face  of  inevitable  opposition. 
Each  IG  must  be  willing  to  accept  responsibility  for  her  or  her  behavior,  and  ac-
knowledge  when  their  independence  has  been  compromised,  fairly  or  unfairly,  and 
exit  office  gracefully,  even  if  the  President  of  the  United  States  has  expressed  sup-
port.  It  is  up  to  the  IG  to  be  a  wise  steward  of  the  mandate  and  office  he  or  she 
oversees,  and  a  wise  steward  of  the  tremendous  authority  he  or  she  wields.  Absent 
a  sense  of  personal  integrity  that  might  eventually  lead  to  his  or  her  resignation, 
an IG cannot provide the leadership needed to make the IG concept a success. Integ-
rity simply cannot be legislated or demanded through executive order. It must come 
from  the  individual  IG  in  those  quiet  moments  of  self  reflection  about  duty.  That 
is  the  ultimate  protection  of  the  independence  that  is  so  essential  for  the  faithful 
execution of the 1978 Act. 

Senator NELSON. Ms. Brian? 
STATEMENT OF DANIELLE BRIAN, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

PROJECT ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT (POGO) 

Ms.  BRIAN.  Chairmen  Nelson,  Gordon,  and  Miller,  thank  you  so 

much for inviting me to testify today. 

My name is Danielle Brian, Executive Director of the Project On 

Government Oversight, or POGO. 

POGO  is  an  independent  nonprofit  that  has,  for  25  years,  inves-
tigated  and  exposed  corruption  and  misconduct  in  order  to  achieve 
a more accountable Federal Government. 

The subject of this hearing raises a number of very timely issues. 
Inspector General offices play a tremendously important role in ad-
vancing good government practices, but only if they’re led by inde-
pendent and qualified IGs. 

Next  year  will  be  the  30th  anniversary  of  the  1978  Inspector 
General Act. This is the perfect time to demonstrate—to determine 
the strengths, and possible weaknesses, of the IG system, given the 
current investigations into several IGs. 

It is the independence from the agency the IG is overseeing that 
gives  the  office  its  credibility.  Not  only  the  actual  independence, 
but  also  the  appearance  of  independence,  allows  the  IG’s  stake-
holders,  including  the  Administrator,  Congress,  the  IGs,  auditors 
and investigators themselves, and potential whistleblowers, to have 
faith in the office. In this case, it appears Inspector General Robert 
Cobb  no  longer  enjoys  that  credibility  with  any  of  the  constitu-
encies, other than the Administrator’s office. 

Mr.  Cobb  disputes  the  basic  facts  in  both  cases  that  are  focused 
on  by  the  PCIE.  However,  even  if  one  were  to  discount  the  two 
cases as inconclusive, there remains indisputable evidence that Mr. 
Cobb  simply  does  not  understand  the  need  to,  or  even  how  to,  re-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

main at arm’s-length from NASA’s Administrator. For example, he 
defends  himself  in  his  testimony  for  today’s  hearing  against  these 
findings  by,  incredibly,  citing  NASA  Administrator  Michael  Grif-
fin’s approval of his work as proof he should remain the NASA IG. 
That,  in  itself,  indicates  how  insensitive  Mr.  Cobb  is  to  the  prob-
lem.  In  fact,  Administrator  Griffin  should  be  the  very  last  person 
he cites as evidence of his independence. 

Much  has  been  made  in  the  press  of  Mr.  Cobb’s  golfing  and 
lunches with former NASA Administrator Sean O’Keefe, which are 
disturbing,  but  are  really  just  atmospherics  if  they  are,  by  them-
selves,  the  only  instances  of  possible  lack  of  independence.  But 
what  you  see,  given  the  testimony  you’ve  heard  today  and  all  the 
other  pattern  of  behavior,  is  simply  breathtaking.  It’s  untenable 
that,  according  to  the  PCIE  report,  that  Mr.  Cobb  has  conferred 
with NASA’s Administrator and General Counsel on the scope and 
finding of his audits, that he has, at least twice, delayed the execu-
tion of search warrants, expressing concerns that NASA managers, 
or  the  staff  or  vendors  who  were  the  targets,  would  be  unhappy. 
He’s even asked, ‘‘Are we going to be apologizing to them?’’ 

In addition, while quantity does not equal quality, a reduction of 
nearly  50  percent  in  the  number  of  reports,  audit  reports,  means 
many topics are not receiving the attention they would have under 
past  NASA  IGs.  One  possible  reason  for  this  drop  is  the  fact  that 
Mr. Cobb disbanded the IG’s Safety Audit Team in the fall of 2005, 
only  2  years  after  the  Columbia  Space  Shuttle  tragedy.  The  PCIE 
report  indicates,  and  we  heard  further  testimony  today  to  confirm 
this, that Mr. Cobb made it clear to his staff he didn’t believe they 
had the technical knowhow to challenge NASA’s engineers, despite 
the  fact  that  engineers  were  members  of  his  staff.  Given  that  the 
Columbia Accident Board concluded that NASA’s safety culture has 
eroded,  there  may  be  no  more  important  task  for  NASA’s  IG  than 
safety audits to prevent future tragedies. 

A  final  example  of  Mr.  Cobb’s  inability  to  protect  the  NASA  IG 
office from the appearance of a lack of independence is the now-in-
famous  all-hands  meeting  of  all-IG  staff  held  by  Administrator 
Griffin.  Not  only  should  the  head  of  an  agency  play  no  role  in  de-
termining  the  work  scope  of  the  IG,  but  the  fact  that  the  IG  him-
self  did  nothing  to  stop  him  is  further  evidence  that  Mr.  Cobb 
clearly  does  not  understand  what  it  means  to  be  an  IG.  I  can  only 
imagine the impact on the morale of the IG staff, and in particular 
on those whistleblowers who were sitting in the room. 

With  this  atmosphere,  you  can  imagine  the  reception  NASA 
whistleblowers met when they go to the IG for help. Now, as nearly 
half  of  the  IG  staff  have  left  or  were  removed  from  office,  those 
whistleblowers, as well as staff leaving, have come forward to Sen-
ator  Nelson  and  the  PCIE,  revealing  the  deeply  troubled  inner 
workings  of  their  office,  and  alleging  that  Mr.  Cobb  was  turning  a 
blind  eye  to  the  concerns  of  external  whistleblowers,  as  well  as  in-
ternal staff. Senator Nelson should be congratulated for stepping in 
to assist these insiders. 

So,  what  should  be  done?  The  record  reflects  Mr.  Cobb’s  over-
riding  sense  of  loyalty  to  NASA’s  image  above  a  sense  of  duty  to 
the public and the Congress. POGO agrees with Chairmen Nelson, 
Gordon,  and  Miller,  as  well  as  the  PCIE,  that  Inspector  General 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Cobb  has  clearly  demonstrated  an  appearance  of  a  lack  of  inde-
pendence  from  NASA.  It  is  because  of  this  behavior  that  I  believe 
Mr. Cobb is unable to fulfill his role as an Inspector General. 

An  opportunity  will  be  missed,  however,  if  Congress  does  not 
look at this case in the broader context. During the Reagan Admin-
istration,  a  small  group  of  IGs  from  the  PCIE  recruited  and 
screened  IG  nominees.  They  then  supplied  lists  of  candidates  from 
which  the  White  House  could  select.  This  peer  review  was  an  im-
portant way to ensure that unqualified or partisan people were not 
placed  in  the  role  of  IG.  The  Congress  should  consider  recreating 
that model. Ultimately, however, it is essential that Congress play 
a more active role in overseeing the IGs the way these two commit-
tees are doing today. 

POGO  is  also  beginning  an  investigation  into  the  IG  system  to 
determine if there are other ways to ensure these important offices 
can meet their mission, and we look forward to providing you with 
our findings when our investigation is complete. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Brian follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIELLE BRIAN, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, PROJECT ON 

GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT (POGO) 

Chairmen Nelson and Miller, thank you for inviting me to testify today. My name 
is  Danielle  Brian,  Executive  Director  of  the  Project  On  Government  Oversight 
(POGO). POGO is an independent nonprofit that has, for over 25 years, investigated 
and exposed corruption and misconduct in order to achieve a more accountable Fed-
eral Government. 

The  subject  of  this  hearing  raises  a  number  of  timely  issues.  Inspector  General 
(IG) offices play a tremendously important role in advancing good government prac-
tices,  but  only  if  they  are  led  by  independent  and  qualified  IGs.  Next  year  will  be 
the  30th  anniversary  of  the  1978  Inspector  General  Act.  This  is  the  perfect  time  to 
determine the strengths and possible weaknesses of the IG system given the current 
investigations into several IGs. 

The  intent  of  Congress  in  creating  these  watchdogs  was  to  have  an  office  within 
agencies that would balance the natural inclinations of agency or department heads 
to minimize bad news, and instead give Congress a more complete picture of agency 
operations. That intention is clearly shown by Congress’ decision to break with tra-
dition, and create a dual-reporting structure where IGs would report not only to the 
agency head but also directly to Congress itself. 

It  is  this  independence  from  the  agency  the  IG  is  overseeing  that  gives  the  office 
its  credibility.  Not  only  the  actual  independence,  but  also  the  appearance  of  inde-
pendence  allows  the  IG’s  stakeholders,  including  the  Administrator,  Congress,  the 
IG’s  auditors  and  investigators,  and  potential  whistleblowers,  to  have  faith  in  the 
office.  In  this  case,  it  appears  Inspector  General  Robert  W.  Cobb  no  longer  enjoys 
that credibility with any of the constituencies other than the Administrator’s office. 
Over  the  past  year,  POGO  has  held  monthly  bipartisan  Congressional  Oversight 
Training  Sessions  for  Capitol  Hill  staff.  We  regularly  tell  participants  that  the  IGs 
at  agencies  within  their  jurisdiction  can  be  important  allies  and  sources  of  honest 
assessments. Unfortunately, we also have to point out that not all IGs are qualified 
and independent. 

In  the  case  of  NASA  IG  Cobb,  current  and  former  IG  staff  allege,  and  the  Presi-
dent’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (PCIE)  confirms,  an  abuse  of  power  and 
the appearance of a lack of independence. Mr. Cobb disputes the basic facts in both 
cases  cited  by  the  PCIE.1 However,  even  if  one  were  to  discount  the  two  cases  as 
inconclusive, there remains indisputable evidence that Mr. Cobb simply does not un-
derstand the need to, or even how to, remain at arms length from NASA’s Adminis-

1 One  of  the  cases  Mr.  Cobb  disputes  involves  the  hacking  of  sensitive  computer  data  regard-
ing  NASA  rocket  engines,  know  as  the  ITAR  case.  It  is  worth  noting  that,  whether  or  not  he 
was  required  to  report  to  the  State  Department  in  the  ITAR  case,  numerous  IG  staff  stated  he 
aggressively undermined the issuance of a report on it. Their impression was that Mr. Cobb did 
not  want  to  embarrass  NASA.  As  a  point  of  comparison,  the  Department  of  Energy’s  Inspector 
General  has  issued  numerous  reports  about  cases  similar  to  the  NASA  computer  hacking  case. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

trator.  For  example,  he  defends  himself  against  these  findings  by  citing  NASA  Ad-
ministrator  Michael  Griffin’s  approval  of  his  work  as  proof  he  should  remain  the 
NASA  IG.  That,  in  itself,  indicates  how  insensitive  Mr.  Cobb  is  to  the  problem.  In 
fact, Administrator Griffin should be the last person he cites as evidence of his inde-
pendence. 

Much  has  been  made  in  the  press  of  Mr.  Cobb’s  golfing  and  lunches  with  former 
NASA  Administrator  Sean  O’Keefe,  which  are  somewhat  disturbing.  But  those  are 
really  just  atmospherics.  From  POGO’s  perspective,  there  are  far  more  troubling 
problems. It is untenable that, according to the PCIE report, Mr. Cobb has on occa-
sion conferred with NASA’s Administrator and General Counsel regarding the scope 
and findings of his audits. Furthermore, Mr. Cobb at least twice delayed the execu-
tion  of  search  warrants  approved  by  law  enforcement,  expressing  concerns  that  the 
NASA  managers  whose  staff  or  vendors  were  the  targets  would  be  unhappy.  Mr. 
Cobb  reportedly  even  asked,  ‘‘Are  we  going  to  apologize  to  them?’’  In  response  to 
questions from investigators, Mr. Cobb confirmed that he would give the NASA Ad-
ministrator  a  heads  up  regarding  impending  search  warrants.  There  is  no  way  of 
knowing what impact the disclosure of secret warrants had on investigations. 

Another  problem  is  that,  although  IGs  are  given  a  wide  latitude  to  staff  their  of-
fices,  Mr.  Cobb’s  frequent  reorganization  of  the  audit  section  has  made  his  office 
anything but more productive. Since he took office, the number of audit reports has 
plummeted from an average of 51 reports annually to only 26 annually. While quan-
tity  does  not  equal  quality,  a  nearly  50  percent  reduction  in  the  number  of  reports 
means many topics are not receiving the attention they would have in the past. One 
possible reason for this drop is that Mr. Cobb disbanded the IG’s safety audit team 
in  the  fall  of  2005—only  2  years  after  the  Columbia  Space  Shuttle  tragedy.  The 
PCIE  report  indicates  that  Mr.  Cobb  made  it  clear  to  his  staff  that  he  did  not  be-
lieve  they  had  the  technical  know-how  to  challenge  NASA’s  engineers,  despite  the 
fact  that  engineers  were  members  of  his  staff.  Given  that  the  Columbia  Accident 
Board  concluded  that  NASA’s  safety  culture  has  eroded,  there  may  be  no  more  im-
portant task for NASA’s IG than safety audits to prevent future tragedies. 

A  final  example  of  Mr.  Cobb’s  inability  to  protect  the  NASA  IG  Office  from  the 
appearance of a lack of independence is the infamous all-hands meeting held by Ad-
ministrator  Griffin.  At  this  meeting,  Administrator  Griffin  spoke  to  IG  employees, 
with  Mr.  Cobb  present,  and  allegedly  rebutted  the  findings  of  the  PCIE  report— 
findings based on the allegations made by numerous IG employees. NASA Assistant 
IG  for  Investigations  Evelyn  Klemstine  testified  before  the  House  Science  Com-
mittee that Administrator Griffin’s inappropriate directions to the IG staff regarding 
the types of investigations and audits they should be performing was in no way pro-
tested  by  Mr.  Cobb.  Administrator  Griffin  allegedly  went  on  to  inform  the  IG  staff 
that  they  shouldn’t  bother  with  work  that  involved  less  than  $1  billion  in  NASA 
funds—an  extraordinary  threshold  under  any  circumstances.  Not  only  should  the 
head  of  an  agency  play  no  role  in  determining  the  work  scope  of  the  IG,  but  the 
fact  that  the  IG  himself  did  nothing  to  stop  him  is  further  evidence  that  Mr.  Cobb 
clearly  does  not  understand  what  it  means  to  be  an  IG—independence  and  the  ap-
pearance of independence are everything. I can only imagine the impact on the mo-
rale  on  the  IG  staff,  and  in  particular  on  those  whistleblowers  who  were  sitting  in 
the room. 

With  this  atmosphere,  you  can  imagine  the  reception  NASA  whistleblowers  meet 
when they go to the IG for help. One whistleblower, a NASA research pilot, refused 
to  fly  what  he  believed  was  an  unsafe  aircraft,  and  was  then  was  reassigned  and 
grounded  in  apparent  retaliation.  He  reported  his  experience  to  the  IG,  only  to  be 
met  with  inaction.  Others  found  the  same  lack  of  action,  or  were  simply  forwarded 
without  investigation  by  the  IG  to  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel  to  be  sentenced  to 
a bureaucratic black hole.2 As nearly half of the NASA IG staff left or were removed 
from the office, some of them came forward to Senator Nelson and the PCIE reveal-
ing  the  deeply  troubled  inner  workings  of  their  office,  and  alleging  that  Mr.  Cobb 
was  turning  a  blind  eye  to  their  concerns.  Senator  Nelson  should  be  congratulated 
for stepping in to assist these insiders. 

So what should be done? The record reflects Mr. Cobb’s overriding sense of loyalty 
to  NASA’s  image  above  a  sense  of  duty  to  the  public  and  Congress.  POGO  agrees 
with Chairmen Nelson and Miller, as well as with the President’s Council on Integ-
rity  and  Efficiency  (PCIE),  that  Inspector  General  Cobb  has  clearly  demonstrated 

2 While  it  may  be  appropriate  to  refer  a  whistleblower  case  to  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel 
to  determine  whether  a  prohibited  personnel  practice  has  occurred,  it  is  also  necessary  for  an 
IG  themselves  to  investigate  whether  there  is  a  need  for  corrective  action  regarding  the  under-
lying problem at the agency. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

an  appearance  of  a  lack  of  independence  from  NASA.  It  is  because  of  this  behavior 
that I believe Mr. Cobb is unable to fulfill his role as an Inspector General. 

An  opportunity  will  be  missed,  however,  if  Congress  does  not  look  at  this  case  in 
the  broader  context.  During  the  Reagan  Administration,  a  small  group  of  IGs  from 
the  PCIE  recruited  and  screened  IG  nominees.  They  then  supplied  lists  of  can-
didates  from  which  the  White  House  could  select.  This  peer  review  was  an  impor-
tant  way  to  ensure  that  unqualified  or  partisan  people  were  not  placed  in  the  role 
of  IG.  The  Congress  should  consider  recreating  that  model.  Ultimately,  however,  it 
is essential that the Congress play a more active role in overseeing the IGs. 

POGO  is  beginning  an  investigation  into  the  IG  system  to  determine  if  there  are 
other  ways  to  ensure  those  important  offices  can  meet  their  mission.  We  look  for-
ward to providing you with our findings when our investigation is completed. 

Senator NELSON. Thank all of you for your testimony. 
The House has a vote in progress. So, we’re going to be switching 
out. I want to call on Chairman Gordon, so that he can ask a cou-
ple of questions, and then run to vote. 

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  It’ll  only  be  one. 
Ms. Brian and Mr. Light, we appreciate you being here, and your 

good testimony. I have but one question for you. 

One of the facts that’s clear from the sworn testimony taken dur-
ing the investigation of Mr. Cobb is that Sean O’Keefe was allowed 
to  make  the  decision  to  get  rid  of  his  old  Inspector  General  and 
choose  his  new  one.  He  also  had  two  key  staffers,  including  his 
chief of staff, brief Mr. Cobb on the problems between his office and 
the Inspector General’s office that he wanted fixed. Mr. Cobb actu-
ally  testified  that  he  thought,  ‘‘Hey,  this  was  easy.  You  don’t  need 
to convince me.’’ 

Professor  Light  and  Ms.  Brian,  is  that  the  way  a  President 

should choose an Inspector General? 

Ms.  BRIAN.  Certainly  not.  The  entire  purpose  of  the  Inspector 
General  is  that  they  are  supposed  to  be  there  both  to  oversee  the 
agency  on  behalf  of  the  Congress,  and  to  make  the  place  honest 
and  more  accountable.  And  the  fact  that  they’re,  sort  of,  hand-
picked, and with those kinds of criteria, is utterly unacceptable. 

Chairman  GORDON.  It  was  widely  understood,  at  the  time,  that 
the decision to remove the incumbent Inspector General was driven 
by  a  desire  for  more  compliance  among  the  future  Inspector  Gen-
eral. The incumbent, at that time, was removed summarily from of-
fice,  which  sent  a  signal  that  the  Administrator  was  looking  for 
somebody  more  compliant.  That  signal  was  well  sent.  Whether  or 
not that signal was followed is a subject for this group to examine, 
this  combination  of  committees  to  examine.  But  the  way  in  which 
the  outgoing  IG  was  fired,  and  the  new  IG  was  hired,  create,  in 
part, a sense that this was all about getting somebody into the job 
who was compliant. And that starts the appearance ball rolling. 

Representative  FEENEY.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’ll  probably  be  leaving 
in a moment or two, but—I don’t have any pressing questions, but 
if it pleases the Chairman, I’d be happy to ask one or two. 

Senator NELSON. Please go ahead. 
Representative  FEENEY.  Well,  thank  you  very  much.  And  I  ap-

preciate your hospitality, as my senior Senator. 

Mr.  Carrington,  one  of  the  incidents  that  is  referred  to  is  the 
Texas  Rangers’  investigation  into  a  missing  ring.  In  his  testi-
mony—in  his  written  testimony,  Mr.  Cobb  suggests  that,  after 
some  investigation,  it  turns  out  that  there  was  never  a  ring  to  be 
missing  in  the  first  place.  Were  you  aware  that—is  that  the  case, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

to  your  knowledge?  Were  you  aware  of  this  investigation,  about 
whether or not there was a ring that, in fact, was missing? 

Mr.  CARRINGTON.  Yes,  sir,  I’m  aware  of  it.  The  ring  was  never 
conclusively established to not exist. I mean, there were medical re-
ports  that  determined—made  a—made  an  assumption  that  the 
item  on  the  hand  was  not  a  ring.  However,  there  were  witnesses 
that gave sworn statements to the Rangers that reported that they 
found  the—or  they  observed  a  ring  on  the  hand.  How—so,  it  was 
never conclusive, either one way or the other. But, again, it wasn’t 
our  investigation.  We  were  assisting  them  with  coordinating  with 
NASA  and  assisting  them  with  other  matters.  So,  I  was  never—I 
felt at—based on what I had seen, I wasn’t sure whether or not it— 
they did or did not have a ring. 

Representative FEENEY. You—so, you—to this day, based on your 
review of the facts, you don’t know whether there was a ring in the 
first place, one way or the other. 

Dr.  Light,  both  you  and  Ms.  Brian  have  been  very  consistent  in 
describing the appropriate role of the IGs, and how they should be 
appointed,  and  how  they  should  conduct  themselves.  One  thing 
that  we  haven’t  talked  a  lot  about  here  is  that  in  your  testimony 
you  indicate  that  the  IG  should  be  independent  of  influence—‘‘any 
influence  from  above,’’  is  the  way  Ms.  Brian  talks  about,  but  you 
also talk about independent of any pressure from the White House 
or,  for  that  matter,  from  Congress.  And  I  guess  the  question  is, 
What’s the appropriate role in Congress’s oversight? Ms. Brian sug-
gests we need to be a lot stronger in overseeing all sorts of Inspec-
tor  General  issues  throughout  the  Government.  Is  there  a  danger, 
in  your  opinion,  that  Congressional  oversight  of  IGs,  in  and  of 
itself, if it’s overzealous, could put some inappropriate pressures on 
IGs in their role, and, in essence, sacrifice their independence? 

Dr.  LIGHT.  It  depends  on  the  nature  of  the  investigation.  An  in-
vestigation  of  this  nature,  where  you’re  examining  the  independ-
ence  of  the  IG,  can  only  reinforce  and  strengthen  IG  timber  in 
making recommendations to you and the Administration for action. 
There’s  intimidation  of  all  kinds.  If  Congress  were  to  bring  an  IG 
in front of a subcommittee or a committee to berate that IG for un-
dertaking  an  audit  or  investigation,  that  would  have  a  chilling  ef-
fect on the IG’s independence. But I don’t see a history of that hav-
ing been done. 

Representative FEENEY. Thank you. 
And,  with  that,  I  really  appreciate  the  Chairman’s  indulgence, 

and, again, his hospitality. Thank you. 

Ms.  BRIAN.  Sir,  could  I  also—could  I  respond  to  the  point  you 

were making there? I just wanted to make the point—— 

Senator NELSON. Please. 
Ms.  BRIAN.—of  course,  if  there  were  overzealous  oversight,  that 
would be a problem. I don’t know that—I was not suggesting over-
zealous oversight at all. And I do think it’s important—as Dr. Light 
was  just  suggesting,  there’s  a  big  difference  between  oversight  of 
the  quality  of  the  work  of  an  office,  rather  than  trying  to  direct  a 
particular finding by an IG, which, I think, of course, would be to-
tally inappropriate interference on the part of the Congress. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  I  recall  that  one  of  you  testified  that  you 
think  that  some  statutory  change  with  regard  to  the  initial  selec-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

tion, so that it’s a selection based on merit, as opposed to personal 
friendship, would be appropriate. That is your testimony. 

Ms. BRIAN. That’s right. That was the informal arrangement dur-
ing the Reagan Administration; and sometime, I think, in the early 
1990s, that fell out of practice, and I think that’s something impor-
tant for the Congress to reconsider. 

Dr. LIGHT. There has been a proposal pending, before the Home-
land Security and Government Affairs Committee, for a term of of-
fice  for  the  Inspectors  General,  which  would  be  mainly  hortatory. 
I  think  the  30-year  anniversary  is  an  opportunity  for  Congress  to 
take  a  look  at  this  concept  and  see  whether  we’ve  gone  too  far  in 
the  appointments  process,  politicized  it  too  much,  what  can  we  do 
to  reverse  it,  so  I  encourage  you  to  encourage  your  colleagues  on 
that committee to engage that issue. 

Senator  NELSON.  Ms.  Herzog,  you  described  two  occasions  when 
Mr.  Cobb  asked  you  to  delay  the  service  of  a  search  warrant,  once 
in  December  2004,  regarding  a  case  at  Stennis,  and  again  in  June 
2005,  in  a  case  at  Marshall.  Would  you  describe  those  two 
incidences? 

Ms. HERZOG. Certainly. 
In  the  instance  in  December  2004,  I  had  just  been  at  NASA  for 
a  matter  of  weeks,  if  not  days,  and  was  more  of  an  observer  than 
a participant until the discussion arose about whether or not there 
was probable cause contained in the warrant. I came into the situa-
tion  at  a  time  when  Mr.  Cobb  had  decided  that  the  agents  should 
hold off on executing the warrant. He read the affidavit, and, even 
after  reading  the  affidavit,  said,  ‘‘I  don’t  think  there’s  a  crime 
here.’’ At that point, based on my past experience—I have handled 
and litigated literally countless search warrants—I tried to explain 
to  Mr.  Cobb  that  an  assistant  U.S.  Attorney,  who  was  going  to  be 
responsible for the prosecution of the case and litigating the search 
warrant,  reviewed  the  warrant,  seemed—clearly  was  happy  with 
the  warrant,  and  a  magistrate  judge  signed  it.  I  mean,  a  mag-
istrate  judge  found  there  was  probable  cause.  And  he  asked  his 
counsel  whether  or  not  he  thought  there  was  probable  cause,  and 
his  counsel  said,  ‘‘No,  I  don’t  think  so.’’  And,  with  all  due  respect 
to  his  counsel—he’s  a  very  smart  and  learned  man—he  has  never 
litigated  a  search  warrant  or  prepared  a  criminal  case  in  his  life. 
It’s  kind  of  like  asking  an  eye  doctor  to  do  heart  surgery.  I  mean, 
I  don’t  answer  questions  I  don’t  know  anything  about.  I  believed, 
at  the  time,  that  I  was  the  expert  in  the  room  on  criminal  process 
and  procedure.  I  thought  that’s  why  I  was  hired,  to  deliver  that— 
those skills to the office. And, after a lot of conversation, Mr. Cobb 
finally allowed the agents to go ahead. 

It  was  embarrassing  for  the  agents,  because  they  were  con-
ducting  this  investigation  in  concert  with  the  FBI,  and  there  they 
were,  you  know,  standing  literally  with  a  foot  out  the  door,  ready 
to  go  execute  the  warrant,  and  they  had  to  tell  the  FBI  agents, 
‘‘Our boss says we can’t do this.’’ 

The second instance was much more troubling. That search war-
rant came in several days before Mr. Cobb saw it. At the time that 
I finally had an opportunity to review it, he was out of town. I had 
not  even  quite  finished  reviewing  the  warrant  when  I  got  a  call 
from the agent assigned to the case, saying that the Assistant U.S. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Attorney  wanted  to  bring  it  to  the  magistrate  right  then.  There 
was an issue of timeliness in that warrant, because the fellow’s of-
fice  that  was  going  to  be  searched  was  going  to  be  changing  jobs, 
and the agents wanted to get into the office before he started pack-
ing up boxes and perhaps destroying documents. 

I  personally  delivered  a  copy  of  the  warrant  and  affidavit  to  the 
Deputy  Inspector  General,  who  was  in  town,  and  e-mailed  a  copy 
to both he and Mr. Cobb. Mr. Cobb was out of town, and could not 
open the warrant on his BlackBerry, because it was sent encrypted. 
He and his deputy apparently had a rather lengthy telephone con-
versation,  and  I  was  advised  by  his  deputy  to  expect  a  phone  call 
at  home  that  evening.  I  did—or,  actually,  to  call  Mr.  Cobb,  which 
I  did.  And  we  had  a  rather  contentious  telephone  conversation 
about  whether  or  not  there  was  probable  cause  for  that  warrant. 
In  both  cases,  one  of  his  concerns  was—and  it’s  almost  a  direct 
quote,  ‘‘What  am  I  going  to  tell  the  center  director  when  he  asks 
me  what  our  guys  are  doing  down  there?’’  And  my  response  is, 
‘‘How  about,  ‘Our  job—we’re  doing  our  job,’  and  it’s  really  none  of 
their business what we’re doing there. It’s an enforcement activity.’’ 
I  asked  if  he  was  concerned  that  these  guys—you  know,  going  in, 
in  raid  jackets  and  big  guns.  It  was  clear  he  didn’t  know  how 
search  warrants  were  executed  when  they  were  done  on  business 
premises  in  offices.  I  said,  ‘‘These  guys  are  going  to  be  going  in 
plain clothes, maybe even suits and ties, knocking on a door, ‘Here 
we  are.  We’ve  got  a  warrant  to  execute.  Please  remain  outside 
while  we  do  that.’ ’’  I  mean,  it  was—it  was,  kind  of,  you  know, 
Search Warrant 101. 

The  second  instance,  it  appeared,  in  addition  to  Mr.  Cobb’s  con-
cern  that,  you  know,  the  agency  might  have  trouble  with  the  war-
rant, ‘‘Well, what if he’s innocent?’’ Well, that happens. That’s what 
happens  in  the  criminal  justice  system.  That’s  why  we  have  all  of 
the  safety  and  the  controls  that  we  have  over  the  system.  It  hap-
pens.  ‘‘Are  we  going  to  apologize  to  this  man?’’  Well,  no,  we  don’t 
do that. Do U.S. Attorneys offices apologize to people when they’re 
acquitted? I don’t think so. 

At  one  point,  I  said  to  Mr.  Cobb,  ‘‘Listen,  this  search  warrant 
doesn’t  say  you  can  do  this  if  you  want  to,  do  this  if  you  feel  like 
it.  It  says,  ‘You  are  commanded  to  execute  this  warrant.  This  is  a 
court order.’ ’’ 

Senator NELSON. Signed by a Federal magistrate judge. 
Ms.  HERZOG.  Signed  by  a  Federal  magistrate  judge.  At  which 
point, he said to me, ‘‘You’re telling me that there is never an occa-
sion when a warrant is not executed?’’ And I said, ‘‘Absolutely not.’’ 
I  mean,  there  are  times—I’ve  been  involved  in  cases,  for  example, 
when  an  informant  has  popped  up  at  the  last  minute,  and  the  in-
vestigators have decided to stay covert, so they go and explain that 
to  the  magistrate,  and  they  say,  ‘‘Listen,  you  know,  we’ve  decided 
to  stay  covert,  we’re  not  going  to  execute  the  warrant.’’  Short  of  a 
situation like that, I’m not aware of an agency just, you know, willy 
nilly yanking a warrant. 

When I described that process, Mr. Cobb said, ‘‘Well, then I want 
you to call the assistant U.S. Attorney and have the assistant U.S. 
Attorney  get  that  warrant  pulled.’’  He  left  the  room  to  go  into  his 
office.  I  don’t  know  for  what.  When  he  came  back,  he  was  off  that 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

topic,  luckily  for  me,  because  that  would  have  been  my  last  act 
there. 

It  was  one  of  the  most  exhausting  and  painful  conversations  I 
have  had  in  my  professional  life.  It  was  just  a  horrifying  exercise, 
and—— 

Senator NELSON. In your experience, as a prosecutor or in an of-
fice of an inspector general, is it a practice that you’ve seen before 
for management to delay action on a search warrant after the war-
rant has been signed by a judge? 

Ms. HERZOG. I have personally never known that to happen, at— 

you know, other than the exceptions I’ve described. 

Senator NELSON. Is it common practice for search warrants to re-

quire approval by the IG himself? Is that a common practice? 

Ms.  HERZOG.  It’s  not  a  practice  at  the  agency  I  currently  work 
at, which is an Inspector General’s office, and I don’t know whether 
it’s  a  practice  at  other  IGs.  And,  up  until  these  two  instances,  it 
was not a practice at the NASA Inspector General’s office. 

Senator NELSON. Putting on your prosecutorial hat, as an assist-
ant  U.S.  Attorney  do  you  think  that  Mr.  Cobb’s  actions  could  be 
construed as obstruction of justice? 

Ms. HERZOG. I think, particularly with regard to the second war-
rant,  but  for  my  involvement  in  the  case,  the  warrant  would  not 
have proceeded, and that would have been an obstruction of justice. 
Senator  NELSON.  Did  the  delay  in  serving  those  warrants  affect 

either of the cases being investigated? 

Ms.  HERZOG.  It  definitely  did  not  affect  the  first  case,  and  I  do 

not believe it affected the second case, but I’m not sure. 

Senator  NELSON.  In  one  of  the  incidences,  someone  was  moving 
out of their office, that search warrant, if it had been delivered im-
mediately,  would  have  prevented  those  records  from  being  packed 
up? 

Ms.  HERZOG.  Yes.  Well,  because  we  don’t  know  what—if  any-
thing else was there 3 days earlier, when the warrant should have 
been executed, we really don’t know whether we lost anything. It’s 
a possibility, but I don’t think the agents ever determined whether 
or not they actually missed anything. 

Senator  NELSON.  Do  you  have  an  opinion  as  to  why  Mr.  Cobb 

wanted to block those search warrants? 

Ms. HERZOG. I think primarily—he was primarily concerned with 
the reaction of the center directors at the centers where those war-
rant were to be executed. That was an overriding concern. He also, 
with  the  second  warrant,  believed  that  somehow  this  was  an  exer-
cise  wherein  people  were  out  to  get  him,  ‘‘They’re  rubbing  this  in 
my  face,’’  he  said,  ‘‘They’re’’—you  know,  ‘‘They’re  doing  this  again 
to  rub  it  in  my  face.’’  And  he  thought  that  I  delayed  telling  him 
about the search warrant for the same reason. 

Chairman  Miller?  And  then  I  will  go  to  you,  Senator  McCaskill. 
Representative MILLER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  House  is  having  two  votes,  and  I  believe  that  they  will  be 
the  first  two.  They’re  both  procedural  issues.  I  think  they’ll  be  the 
first  two  that  I  will  have  missed,  this  Congress,  but  I  wanted  to 
stay  here  for  this.  I  may  need  you  to  sign  a  note  to  my  constitu-
ents, however. 
[Laughter.] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

Representative  MILLER.  I  do  ask  unanimous  consent  to  enter  a 

packet of documents into the record. 

Senator NELSON. Without objection. 
Representative MILLER. OK. 
[The information previously referred to follows:] 
The following documents are in the Appendix of this Hearing: 
1.  August  15,  2003,  letter  from  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb  to  Hon.  Sean  O’Keefe  enti-
tled  ‘‘Subject:  Observations  on  the  Independence  of  the  Columbia  Accident  Inves-
tigation Board.’’ 

2.  Policy  and  Procedures  for  Exercising  the  Authority  of  the  Integrity  Committee 

of the President’s Council on Integrity and Efficiency, April 24, 1997. 

3. Quality Standards for Federal Offices of Inspector General, dated October 2003. 
4.  Excerpts  from  Semiannual  Report,  Office  of  Inspector  General,  NASA,  Sep-

tember 30, 2004 (pp. 1–5). 

5. Excerpts from transcript of interview of Hon. Robert W. Cobb, conducted by Of-
fice of Inspector General, Department of Housing and Urban Development, June 27, 
2006 (pp. 40, 44, 54, 78, 94, 98, 104, 106, 114, 125). 

6. Excerpts from Record of Investigation of Hon. Robert W. Cobb, Office of Inspec-
tor  General,  NASA,  August  30,  2006  (pp.  49–54,  59,  140–142,  195–197,  206–217, 
222–225, 231, 266–271). 

7.  Report  in  the  form  of  a  letter  dated  January  22,  2007,  from  James  H.  Burrus, 
Jr., Chair, Integrity Committee to Hon. Clay Johnson III, Chairman, Integrity Com-
mittee, President’s Council on Integrity and Efficiency. 

Representative  MILLER.  They  have  been  reviewed  by  both  the 

majority and the minority staff. 

First,  Ms.  Herzog,  Mr.  Carson,  Mr.  Carrington,  Mr.  Cobb  has 
said in his testimony that the HUD Inspector General invited any-
one to come forward who had anything bad to say about Mr. Cobb. 
He complained bitterly about the procedures of the HUD Inspector 
General, and the PCIE report, generally. Were you invited to come 
forward  and  make  complaints,  or  did  you  step  forward  on  your 
own? 

Mr.  CARSON.  I  was  contacted  by  the  HUD  OIG,  and  mentioned 
that  they  wanted  to  interview  me  as  part  of—that  my  name  had 
come  up  in  several  conversations  with  other  people  that  had  been 
interviewed, and they wanted to talk to me as part of the investiga-
tion. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr. Harrington—Carrington? Excuse me. 
Mr. CARRINGTON. Yes. No, sir, I was not invited. I was contacted 

and asked to speak. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
How about you, Ms. Herzog? 
Ms. HERZOG. The HUD investigators contacted me. 
Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr. Cobb also says that the staff was unhappy with him because 
he was insisting upon higher standards for the Office of the Inspec-
tor General. Do you agree with that? Do you agree that the stand-
ards set by Mr. Cobb were higher? 

Ms. Herzog? 
Ms.  HERZOG.  No.  I  don’t  think  they  were  higher  at  all,  and  I’m 
not sure what the standards were. In fact, whenever reports or doc-
uments  were  prepared,  and  Mr.  Cobb  was  unhappy  with  them,  if 
any  of  us  tried  to  get  from  him  what  it  was  he  was  looking  for— 
you  know,  ‘‘What  is  it  you  want?’’—his  response  was,  ‘‘I’ll  know  it 
when I see it.’’ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr.  Carson  and  Mr.  Carrington,  did  you  think  the  standards  in 
the  OIG’s  office  were  higher  under  Mr.  Cobb,  or  lower  under  Mr. 
Cobb? 

Mr.  CARSON.  Having  spent  almost  16  years  there  in  a  very—the 
organization was very professional, very responsive to the concerns 
of the Congress when we had special requests—I believe the stand-
ards were lowered. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr. CARRINGTON. Yes, sir. 
Representative MILLER. Mr. Carrington? 
Mr.  CARRINGTON.  I  think  that—I  recall  that  he  did  have  high 
standards.  I  won’t  doubt  him  there.  He—but  the  standards—the 
bar was set so high, it was impossible to reach, to the point where 
things  didn’t  happen.  I  recall  him  saying,  ‘‘I  don’t  go  into  a—any 
type of issue without four aces in my hand.’’ And so, we were never 
going to reach the standard that he had set for me. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
A  lot  of  the  testimony  from  the  three  of  you  in  particular  has 
been  with—going  to  the  personal  abusive  relationship  that  Mr. 
Cobb  had  with  his  staff.  There  are  people  like  that  in  the  world. 
Some  of  them  become  bosses.  Many  people  have  worked  for  bosses 
who  appear  to  go  through  life  on  full  flame,  as  appears  to  be  the 
case  with  Mr.  Cobb,  but  are  still  able  to  get  their  work  done.  Was 
this different? Were you able to get your work done, or did his con-
duct interfere with getting the work done? And how? 

Ms. Herzog, you can start. 
Ms.  HERZOG.  I  think,  at  least,  I  was  able  to  get  my  work  done 
eventually.  I  did  find  those  occurrences  disturbing,  and,  at  times, 
particularly  on  the  last  occasion,  when  he  practically  came  across 
the  table  at  me,  I  took  the  next  day  off  of  work.  I  mean,  I  was 
shaking when I walked out of his office. It was horrible. And I have 
to  say,  I’ve  been  yelled  at  by  the  best  of  them.  You  know,  I  have 
appeared  in  Federal  court  before  judges  who,  lawyers  like  to  com-
monly say, think they’re the closest thing next to God, maybe other 
than Congresspeople. 

[Laughter.] 
Representative MILLER. We don’t hold a candle to judges. 
[Laughter.] 
Ms.  HERZOG.  And,  you  know,  I’ve  had  my  life  threatened,  I’ve 
been in protective custody, I’ve been stalked by a man that I pros-
ecuted. I have been under all kinds of stress and in stressful situa-
tions.  I  have  never  experienced  anything  like  what  I  experienced 
when  Mr.  Cobb  went  on  one  of  his—I  hesitate  to  call  them  ‘‘ram-
pages,’’ but—— 

Representative  MILLER.  OK.  I  know  my  time  is  about  to  expire, 
but  Mr.  Cobb  apparently  told  the  staff,  and  told  the  HUD  IG,  and 
has told our staff, in looking into this matter, that he wanted a col-
laborative relationship with the management of NASA, that he be-
lieved  he  would  get  the  recommendations  of  the  IG’s  office  imple-
mented—he’d  be  more  likely  to  get  them  implemented  if  he  had  a 
cooperative,  collaborative  relationship,  if  he  were  a  part  of  the 
team. Then that seems to be very much contrary to what Ms. Brian 
and Dr. Light have said is what Congress intended in the Inspector 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

General  Act  of  1978,  but  was  it  your  experience  that  the  rec-
ommendations  of  the  IG’s  office  got  implemented  more  readily  be-
cause  of  Mr.  Cobb’s  good  relationship  with  Mr.  O’Keefe  or  others? 
Mr.  CARSON.  In  my  case,  in  the  safety  directorate,  our  reports 
were being rewritten, changed, revised; rewritten, changed, revised. 
The process was to the point of being insane. We couldn’t even get 
recommendations  or  reports  out  the  door  that  we  had  previously 
never  had  an  issue  with,  as  I  mentioned  in  my  statement.  Two 
times,  Report  of  the  Year,  special  requests  from  the  Safety  and 
Mission  Assurance  Associate  Administrator,  from  this  committee, 
from  the  House  Science  Committee,  and  we  couldn’t  even  get  re-
ports out the door. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr. Carrington? 
Mr.  CARRINGTON.  The—ours  was  a  little  different,  and  I  used  a 
different  process  when  getting  reports  out.  The  IG  Act  required  us 
to  notify  the  Department  of  Justice,  the  Attorney  General.  So, 
when  allegations  came  in,  we  immediately  started  working  with 
them and in joint cases with the FBI. And so, our cases took a little 
different—our reports took a little different road. So, anything that 
did  come  through,  you  know,  the—it  was  very  difficult  to  get  the 
report out in any possible timeframe. 

Representative MILLER. Ms. Herzog? 
Ms.  HERZOG.  I,  for  most  of  the  time  I  was  there,  worked  for  Mr. 
Carrington. And, at the time he left and I was acting, I tried to im-
plement some procedures that made it a little easier and may—ac-
tually  ended  up  over-complicating  things,  because  they  were  not 
quite  accepted  at  face  value.  I  really  don’t  have  an  answer  to  that 
question. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Just  one  more—Mr.  Carson,  in  your  testimony  before  the  HUD 
IG, you described the relationship with Mr. Cobb, Mr. O’Keefe, and 
Mr. Pastorek—— 

Mr. CARSON. Yes. 
Representative MILLER.—as the ‘‘Holy Trinity.’’ What was the or-

igin of that phrase? Was that your phrase? 

Mr. CARSON. No, it wasn’t my phrase. It was a phrase that I had 
heard  used  by  various  officials  and  employees  in  NASA  head-
quarters that referred to those three as the ‘‘Holy Trinity.’’ 

Representative MILLER. What—— 
Mr.  CARSON.  No,  I  did  not  originate  that.  That  was  just  some-

thing I had heard numerous times. 

Representative MILLER. What did it mean? 
Mr.  CARSON.  What  did  it—it  meant  that  basically  everything  in 

the agency went through those three individuals. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr. CARSON. The—you know, that the—it was inferred that they 

Representative  MILLER.  Mr.  Herzog,  did  you  hear  that  phrase? 

And what did you understand it to mean? 

Ms. HERZOG. Well, I never actually knew what the ‘‘Holy Trinity’’ 

ran the agency. 

was. I’m Jewish. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Ms.  HERZOG.  It  wasn’t  in  my  repertoire.  But  I  did  understand 
that it meant—I believed it meant the people in power, and aligned 
in power. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr. Carrington? 
Mr. CARRINGTON. Yes. I’m Catholic, so I—— 
[Laughter.] 
Representative MILLER. You know very well what it means. 
Mr.  CARRINGTON.—I  know  what  it  means.  And  it  was  a—I  had 
heard the reference before, and it was not by our people at the IG’s 
office.  I  heard  it  from  NASA  employees.  I  had  a  large  source  net-
work  of  NASA  employees,  and  they  would  refer  to  the  group,  the 
three, as the ‘‘Holy Trinity,’’ because they had such a close relation-
ship that if you talked—if one said something, the other one would 
know immediately. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Mr.  Carrington,  you  mentioned  frequently  working  with  the  FBI 
and U.S. Attorneys office as part of your role in the IG’s office. Did 
the  assistant  U.S.  attorneys  that  you  were  working  with  come  to 
different  conclusions  about  the  same  information  in  the  course  of 
those investigations? 

Mr.  CARRINGTON.  Different  conclusions  than  the  Inspector  Gen-

eral—than Mr. Cobb? 

Representative MILLER. Right. 
Mr.  CARRINGTON.  Yes.  Mr.  Cobb  had—has  a  lot  of  experience  in 
the area of conflict of interest and ethics, from his background, and 
so,  he  knows  that  pretty  well,  and  probably  better  than  a  lot  of 
prosecutors,  because  those  cases  don’t  really  get  prosecuted  that 
often.  And  I  recall  one  instance  in  Norfolk,  down  there,  where  Mr. 
Cobb actually felt that there was a violation—a technical violation, 
and  the  U.S.  Attorney’s  office  didn’t  agree  with  him,  and—because 
they  were  looking  at  it  from  a  prosecutor  perspective.  So,  in  that 
instance,  there  were  disagreements.  He—on  other  areas,  where  he 
didn’t  have  that  background  or  expertise,  he  didn’t  see  things  the 
same  way  as  the  prosecutors,  so  there  were  a  lot  of  differences. 
And,  in  some  instances,  he  would  say,  ‘‘Get  him  on  the  phone,  let 
me  talk  to  him  right  now.’’  And—which,  you  know,  my  experience 
with IGs, is not a normal thing that happens. 

Representative MILLER. Did he ever say he could, or did, go over 

their heads? 

Mr. CARRINGTON. Yes, sir. He—in particular, the one in Norfolk, 
he  told  the  senior  prosecutor  there,  the  supervisor,  that  he  could 
go  over  his  head,  he  could  go  to  the  U.S.  Attorney  in  the  Eastern 
District  of  Virginia.  And  the  prosecutor  said,  ‘‘Yes,  you  can.  And 
what’s going to happen is, the U.S. Attorney’s going to call me, and 
I’m going to tell him the same thing, and that’s going to be the end 
of it.’’ 

Representative MILLER. How about to Mr. Gonzales? Did he ever 

say he could call Alberto Gonzales? 

Mr.  CARRINGTON.  He  would  just  make  references,  that  I  recall, 
that,  you  know,  he  had  worked  for  Mr.  Gonzales,  and  then  this— 
Mr. Gonzales was a friend of his, and that he could call—you know, 
go all the way to the top in the Department of Justice. 

Senator NELSON. Senator McCaskill? 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

Senator  McCaskill  is  the  former  elected  auditor  of  the  State  of 

Missouri. 

Senator McCaskill? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CLAIRE MCCASKILL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSOURI 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  thank  you 

for calling this hearing today. 

I  just  don’t  know  where  to  start.  I’ve  spent  all  of  my  adult  life 
as  either  a  prosecutor  or  an  auditor,  and  I  understand  the  dif-
ference  between  the  two  roles.  It  doesn’t  appear  to  me  that  Mr. 
Cobb understood the difference between the two roles, and that an 
auditor’s  job—I  just  can’t  fathom  an  auditor  second-guessing  a 
court  order  of  a  search  warrant.  You  cooperate  with  law  enforce-
ment.  Your  job  is  to  provide  them  information.  Your  job  is  never 
to try to second-guess professional law enforcement work. 

In  the  time  I  have  with  this  panel,  there  are  so  many  questions 
I  would  like  to  ask  all  of  you,  but  I’d  like  to  focus  for  a  minute  on 
Mr.  Carson.  You  remind  me  of  some  of  the  career  auditors  that  I 
was  fortunate  enough  to  encounter  when  I  took  the  job  as  State 
Auditor. You’ve been—27 years, you’ve been doing this, under a va-
riety  of  different  administrations,  and  I’m  willing  to  bet,  knowing 
auditors  like  I  know  auditors,  that  you  saw  your  job  as  your  job, 
regardless  of  who  is  in  charge  in  Washington,  at  that  given  mo-
ment in time. 

I  want  to  congratulate  you  on  the  work  you  did  as  it  related  to 
safety.  I  can  imagine  no  higher  calling  as  an  auditor  than  to  be 
tasked  with  the  responsibility  of  safety  audits  as  it  relates  to  the 
NASA  program.  I  have  such  respect  for  the  Chairman  because  of 
the work he’s done in this area, and the heart of this Nation breaks 
when we lose people in the NASA program because of safety issues. 
And so, I congratulate you on that work. 

And I would like to specifically ask you that, in your testimony— 
and  I’m  sorry  I  missed  it;  I  was  on  the  floor,  on  the  immigration 
bill—but  you  quote,  several  times,  some  things,  and  I’m  curious  if 
these  are  your  recollections  or  if  you  took  notes,  as  it  related  to 
some of the things that Mr. Cobb said to you, relating to his refusal 
to issue audit reports that you had done in this important area. 

Mr. CARSON. Personal notes—I had notes, but when I left NASA, 
I basically left everything in my office. I wasn’t about to take any-
thing  out  of  there,  except  for  some  copies  of  documents  that,  you 
know, I thought may come in handy one day. 

The  workpaper  files  for  these  audits,  I  believe  the  staff  of—my 
staff papered the files with reports that weren’t issued, review com-
ments,  you  know,  information  like  that,  that  would  support  every-
thing I’ve said, as far as not issuing reports. 

Now, some of the comments, no, they’re just things I’ll never for-

get. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Well,  obviously,  ‘‘Anybody  can  perform  an 

audit’’ is one that would stick in my mind. 

Mr.  CARSON.  Right.  And  that  was  a  common—that  was  a  com-

mon statement. And—— 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  ‘‘Something  for  auditors’’—I  mean,  calling 

the Yellow Book ‘‘something that auditors can hide behind’’—— 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Mr. CARSON. Right. 
Senator MCCASKILL.—is jaw-dropping, from an IG. 
Mr. CARSON. And we were—— 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  That,  in  and  of  itself,  is  absolutely  com-
pletely incomprehensible, that an IG in the U.S. Government would 
call the Yellow Book something for auditors to hide behind. Are you 
confident that that is what he said, Mr.—— 

Mr. CARSON. Oh, absolutely. 
Senator MCCASKILL.—Carson? 
Mr. CARSON. Absolutely. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  him  saying  that,  ‘‘Your  safety  audits 
had produced nothing of value to the agency’’—I look forward to re-
viewing  those  audits  in  detail.  I  have  not.  And,  you  know,  one  of 
the  frustrating  things  for  auditors  is  when  they  do  good  work,  is 
worrying  if  anybody  ever  reads  the  whole  thing.  And  I  know  you 
all relate to that. 

I’m  particularly  concerned  by  his  unilateral  decision  to  not  issue 
audit  product.  That  is  a  huge  decision  for  the  head  of  an  audit 
agency  to  make.  First  of  all,  it  wastes  taxpayer  dollars,  because 
when  the  audit  work  has  been  done,  the  taxpayers  have  spent  a 
lot of money. So, if in fact, there is some reason for an audit report 
not to be issued, there should be some documentation of that by the 
head  of  that  audit  agency  as  to  why  that  audit  was  not  issued. 
Were you ever given, or, to your knowledge, did Mr. Cobb ever pre-
pare,  a  written  document  that  laid  out  why  an  audit  report  that 
had been completed was not issued by your agency? 

Mr.  CARSON.  No.  But  there  is—there  would  be  evidence  in  the 
working-paper files of what—like in my written testimony, I talked 
about the audit reports that became e-mails or unofficial e-mails to 
NASA  officials  late  at  night.  We  do  have  that.  But,  no,  never  any 
written  reason  why.  That’s  why,  in  my—in  my  testimony,  when  I 
talk  about,  a  year  into  the  review  of  the  organizational  rec-
ommendations  of  the  Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board,  my 
staff  had  written  three  reports  addressing  the  way  NASA  was 
going  about  implementing  straight-line  safety  and  mission  assur-
ance,  straight-line  funding,  and  independent  technical  engineering 
authority, and I go to a monthly directorate update with Mr. Cobb, 
and  he  says  to  me,  ‘‘You’ve  worked  on  this  for  over  a  year,  and 
you’ve  got  nothing  to  show  for  it.’’  And,  I’m  sorry,  but,  at  that 
point, I had to defend the work done by my staff, and I said, ‘‘We’ve 
issued’’—or,  ‘‘We’ve  written  three  different  reports,  talking—mak-
ing recommendations about that, and they were never issued.’’ 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  let  me  also  follow  up  on  that,  because 
I  understand,  from  your  testimony,  that  you  believe,  or  you  have 
knowledge,  that  he  was  calling  the  administrators  of  your  agency 
prior  to  a  draft  of  the  report?  So,  this  wasn’t  a  review  of  a  draft, 
but  that  he  was  checking  in  with  the  top  management  of  the—— 

Mr. CARSON. Well, that—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—agency—— 
Mr. CARSON.—was the general counsel, yes. 
Senator MCCASKILL.—with the general counsel. 
Mr. CARSON. Yes. On—— 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  In  your  27  years  of  working  as  an  auditor, 
have  you  ever  known  of  the  head  of  an  audit  agency  to  call  the 
auditee with feedback prior to a draft of the audit? 

Mr. CARSON. No. No, absolutely not. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  I  mean,  that  is  a  violation  of  Yellow  Book 

government auditing standards, isn’t it? 

Mr.  CARSON.  Well,  it’s  definitely  a  violation  of  the  independence 

standard, I would say. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  Absolutely.  Absolutely.  Was  there  ever  any 
attempt on the part of Mr. Cobb to understand that he was, should 
be subjected to the Yellow Book standards part of an audit organi-
zation? Did he understand that, in his role as head of the audit or-
ganization, that he was, in fact, an auditor, himself? 

Mr. CARSON. Early on, we did try to—and I know my boss at the 
time  did  try  to  bring  up—you  know,  in  our  senior  staff  meetings 
on  the  audit  side,  he  would  talk  about  expressing  concern  about 
Yellow  Book  and  professional  audit  standards.  And,  you  know,  it 
was  relayed  to  all  the  managers  in  the  organization,  that  we  ‘‘use 
that as a crutch to hide behind.’’ 

Senator MCCASKILL. Dr. Light, is there anything specific that ex-
empts  IGs  from  Yellow  Book?  For  people  who  don’t  know  the  Yel-
low Book is, in fact, like the Code of Professional Responsibility for 
government auditors. Is there anything that exempts IGs from hav-
ing  to  respect  the  provisions  of  the  Yellow  Book  standards  of  gov-
ernment auditing? 

Dr. LIGHT. Nothing whatsoever. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  is  there  anything  that  specifically  di-
rects  them  to  be  subject  to  the  Yellow  Book  standards  of  profes-
sional government auditing? 

Dr.  LIGHT.  Highest  professionalism  possible.  It’s  embedded  in, 
and applied in, the statement of qualifications in the IG Act itself. 
I  don’t  think  Congress  felt,  at  the  time,  that  it  had  to  say  ‘‘abide 
by the Yellow Book.’’ 

Senator MCCASKILL. Right. 
Dr. LIGHT. That’s just—you know, beyond required. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Kinda like brushing your teeth. 
Dr. LIGHT. Yes. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Yes. 
Dr. LIGHT. ‘‘The sun will come up in the morning’’ kind of—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. All right. Thank you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Light,  in  Exhibit  Number  2,  which  is  the 
Integrity  Committee’s  finding  with  respect  to  the  abuse  of  author-
ity,  what  effect  does  such  conduct  have  on  the  effectiveness  of  an 
Inspector General? 

Dr. LIGHT. You know, I’ve been thinking about this as we’ve been 
going  through  the—this  conversation  today.  The  most  powerful 
product of an IG and the OIG is the deterrence effect of their work. 
That’s  where  the  independence  and  the  integrity  really  works  its 
will  so  that  people  understand  that  there  is  an  independent  place 
to  go,  a  safe  harbor  for  whistleblowers,  and  that  there  is  a  con-
sequence for malfeasance and misfeasance. This is where this kind 
of behavior would have had its most pernicious impact, in reducing 
the  sense,  among  NASA  employees  and  contractors—and  if  you 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

have to decide what that exposure is, in terms of risk—their sense 
that  they  would  be  held  accountable  for  what  they  did  or  did  not 
do. I think that’s where the effect is most pronounced. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Carson, I have a series of questions for you. 
On  the  Space  Shuttle,  there  is  a  Destruct  System  that  is  redun-
dant,  so  there  are  two.  And  it  is  the  awesome  responsibility  of  an 
Air  Force  officer  at  the  Cape  Canaveral  Air  Force  Station,  should 
that Space Shuttle go off of its intended trajectory and head toward 
a  populated  area,  such  as  very  nearby  Cocoa  Beach  or  Titusville, 
Daytona Beach, that that safety officer has the responsibility of de-
structing.  The  launch  criteria  is,  both  the  primary  and  the  backup 
have to be working. That’s the launch criteria. 

Now,  you  handled  an  investigation  into  the  status  of  the  Range 
Safety Systems during the June 5, 2002, launch of the Space Shut-
tle. What did your inquiry determine? 

Mr.  CARSON.  Senator,  I  received  the—it  was  actually  a  referral. 
The  Air  Force  had  looked  into  it,  and  then  had  referred  it  to  the 
NASA  OIG,  our  Office  of  Investigations,  and  it  was  a  potpourri  of 
issues  about  the  Command  Destruct  System,  the  procurement  of 
the Command Destruct System, but they referred it over to us after 
closing  it  out.  They  gave  it  to  our  Office  of  Investigations,  who  de-
termined  there  was  no  criminal  activity.  And  Lance—Mr. 
Carrington’s  group  referred  it  to  me  as  a  safety  issue,  because  of 
the—the Command Destruct System was nonoperational. 

I  had  an  Air  Force  officer  assigned  to  my  safety  group  who  had 
been  an  investigator  on  the  Columbia  Accident  Investigation 
Board,  came  to  work  for  me  after  the  Board  had  released  its  final 
report,  and  spent  a  2-year  detail.  We  got  the  referral  in  2004,  and 
the officer who worked for me started doing some interviews, inves-
tigating  down  at  the  Cape.  He  and  I  went  down  in  January  2005; 
we met with NASA, determined that everything we heard, that the 
mission  flight  control  officer  and  the  chief  of  safety  for  the  Air 
Force  were  both  no-go  for  that  launch,  and  were  overruled  by  the 
range commander. 

Senator  NELSON.  That  was  as  a  result  of  a  2-year  investigation, 

and that’s what the report stated. 

Mr. CARSON. No, the 2-year—no. We only had it for a couple of— 
we  got  it  2  years  after—NASA  OIG  got  involved  with  it  2  years 
after  the  actual  incident  itself.  But  nothing  had  been  done,  appar-
ently, to that point. The Air Force gave it to us and said, ‘‘You may 
want to look at the launch safety issues.’’ 

Senator NELSON. OK. So, what happened? 
Mr.  CARSON.  We  investigated.  The  Air  Force  officer  working  for 
me and I went down to Cape in—to the Cape in January 2005. We 
met  with  NASA  safety  officials,  we—everyone  we  talked  to,  it  was 
unprecedented that a chief of safety and a mission flight control of-
ficer  would  be—were  no-go  for  launch,  but  were  overruled.  So,  we 
talked  to  the  NASA  folks.  NASA  folks  had  a  representative  in  the 
range. The NASA firing room and the range are two different facili-
ties. NASA had a safety official, knew something was going on, but 
never communicated to the launch control center that there was an 
issue  with  the  go—the  Command  Destruct  System  on  the  range. 
When  it—when  the  final  poll  came  around,  the  range  commander 
said  they  were  go  for  launch,  overruling  the  two  safety  officials, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

and the launch took place, with an—with a nonoperational backup 
Command Destruct System. 

We  came  back.  We  met  with  NASA  officials.  We  told  them  what 
the issue was. They agreed. We said we were going to make a rec-
ommendation  that  NASA  put  a  safety  official  on  the  communica-
tion  link  in  the  range  operations  control  center.  That  was  going  to 
be  our  recommendation.  We  came  back—NASA  was  in  complete 
agreement  with  us,  the  safety  folks  down  at  Kennedy.  We  came 
back in February 2005, we briefed Mr. Cobb, and, at that meeting, 
he said, ‘‘Let the Air Force handle it.’’ 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  at  the  end  of  the  day,  did  NASA’s  Office  of 
the  Inspector  General  release  any  report  on  the  findings  to  NASA 
management? 

Mr.  CARSON.  Senator,  I  left  NASA  about  3  weeks  later,  and,  to 

my knowledge, I have never seen anything related to that issue. 

Senator  NELSON.  Did  your  organization  conduct  an  audit  of 
NASA’s compliance with the recommendations of the Columbia Ac-
cident Investigation Board report? 

Mr.  CARSON.  Yes,  we  did.  We  conducted  a  number  of  audits  and 
inspections related to all the recommendations in the Columbia ac-
cident report. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  what  was  the  ultimate  disposition  of  that 

case? 

Mr. CARSON. I’ve—I left the NASA—I left NASA before the final 

report was ever issued, if there was a final report ever issued. 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  we  don’t  know  if  the  findings  that  NASA 
was  not—you  do  not  have  personal  knowledge  that  NASA  was  not 
implementing  the  Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board’s  rec-
ommendations. 

Mr. CARSON. No, I don’t. 
Senator NELSON. OK. 
Let me flip it to you, Chairman Miller. 
Representative MILLER. Thank you, Chairman Nelson. 
Senator  McCaskill  asked  about  Yellow  Book  standards,  which 
I’m  not  sure  the  average  person  would  know  anything  about,  but 
Senator  McCaskill,  based  on  her  professional  background,  knows 
very  well,  and  is  shocked  by,  the  deviation—the  flagrant  deviation 
from those standards, and asked if the standards for the Inspector 
General  were  different  from  those  standards  expected  of  auditors, 
generally. 

Are  any  of  you  familiar  with  the  Quality  Standards  for  Federal 
Offices of Inspector General, which I held up before, in the opening 
statement? 

Ms. HERZOG. Yes, sir. 
Representative  MILLER.  OK.  And  these  standards  are  issued, 
pursuant  to  an  executive  order,  to  provide  professional  standards, 
standards of conduct, for an Inspector General. Is that correct? The 
statute  itself  has  the  purpose  of  establishing  independent  and  ob-
jective  units  within  each  agency,  the  Inspector  General’s  office. 
These  standards  say  that,  ‘‘objectivity  imposes  an  obligation  to  be 
impartial,  intellectually  honest,  and  free  of  conflicts  of  interest. 
Independence is a critical element of objectivity. Without independ-
ence,  both  in  fact  and  in  appearance,  objectivity  is  impaired.’’  Is 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

that your understanding, all of you, of the obligations of an Inspec-
tor General? 

Ms. BRIAN. Yes, sir. 
Mr. CARRINGTON. Yes, sir. 
Mr. CARSON. Yes, sir. 
Ms. HERZOG. Yes, sir. 
Representative MILLER. OK. Under the provisional independence, 
again,  it  says  that,  ‘‘the  opinions,  conclusions,  judgments,  and  rec-
ommendations of an Inspector General should be impartial, and be 
viewed  as  impartial,  by  knowledgeable  third  parties.’’  And  then  it 
discusses  impairments,  what  may  detract  from  the  independence, 
both  actual  and  apparent,  and  it  says  that,  ‘‘personal  impair-
ments—personal  impairments  of  staff  members  result  from  the  re-
lationships  and  beliefs  that  cause  OIG  staff  members  to  limit  the 
extent of an inquiry, limit disclosure, or weaken the—or slant their 
work in any way. OIG staff are responsible for notifying the appro-
priate  officials  within  the  organization  if  they  have  any  personal 
impairments to independence.’’ 

Now,  we’ve  heard  testimony  from  the  three  of  you  with  respect 
to  this  particular  case.  We’ve  got  a  voluminous  record  from  the  IG 
of  HUD.  We’ve  had  staff  interviews.  And  what  we  understand  is 
that Mr. Cobb met or played golf frequently with the NASA Admin-
istrator,  Sean  O’Keefe,  met  him  in  his  office  for  drinks,  went  to 
lunch  with  him  on  a  regular—on  a  weekly  basis,  frequently  in  the 
NASA  cafeteria,  so  other  employees  saw  them  there,  the  three  of 
them—Mr. O’Keefe, Mr. Pastorek, and Mr. Cobb—and that he sent 
audits,  reports,  to  Mr.  O’Keefe  and  others  for  their  review  before 
issuing them, and changed things that they didn’t like. 

Does  that  meet  the  requirement  of  independence?  Is  that  a  per-

sonal impairment? 

Ms. Brian? 
Ms. BRIAN. Yes, it certainly is an impairment. 
Representative  MILLER.  Does  it  violate  these  standards,  in  your 

judgment? 

Ms. BRIAN. I don’t think there’s any question that it does. 
Representative MILLER. Dr. Light? 
Dr.  LIGHT.  Same.  Same  answer.  It  is  an  impairment,  and  it  vio-

Representative  MILLER.  The  standards  of  professional  con-

lates those standards. 

duct—— 

Dr. LIGHT. Right. 
Representative MILLER. And these are issued by the PCIE which 
includes all the Inspectors General, themselves. So, this is the view 
of  Inspectors  General  of  what  their  professional  obligations  are.  Is 
that correct? 

Dr.  LIGHT.  That’s  correct.  I  mean,  you  know,  on  one  level  it 
seems so small. You know, lunch at the cafeteria, or maybe the Ad-
ministrator  gives  the  IG  a  couple  of  mulligans  on  the  golf  course, 
whatever. It seems so small. But the appearance effect in the agen-
cy  as  a  whole,  to  whistleblowers  and  others,  that  there  may  be 
some sort of clear relationship between the agenda for auditing and 
investigation and the personal relationship is enough to destroy the 
integrity  of  the  office,  in  terms  of  its  creating  the  deterrent  effect 
that it aims to create. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

Representative MILLER. Ms. Brian, you’re shaking your head. 
Ms.  BRIAN.  No,  and  I—and  I’m  just  thinking,  that,  certainly  in 
the context of all the other activities, of checking with them—if the 
staff were aware that he’s checking with them on the scope of what 
audits  should  be  even  before  they’re  begun,  I  mean,  those  kinds  of 
things are just unimaginable to professional staff at IGs. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
To the ordinary person without a professional background, there 
probably is a sense of, ‘‘What’s the problem with going to play golf 
with  someone?  What’s  the  problem  with  meeting  someone  from 
work  for  drinks?  What’s  the  problem  with  going  to  dinner  with 
someone, or lunch with someone, from work?’’ But that’s not the ex-
pectation of the Inspector General. 

Ms.  BRIAN.  That’s  correct.  And,  as  I  said  in  my  testimony,  those 
are, sort of, atmospherics. At one level, if that were the only thing 
happening, I think the golf may not have happened all that often— 
I think, a couple of times—but if that’s all that had happened, that 
may  not  merit  the  kind  of  concern  that  the  Congress  has,  at  this 
point. But, when you put it in the context of all the other activities, 
that’s when I think it becomes overwhelming. 

Dr.  LIGHT.  One  IG  once  described  this  job  as  being  like  strad-
dling a barbed-wire fence, it’s extremely difficult to do. And it does 
impose on the auditor or the IGs, you know, an isolation, a posture 
that is not comfortable at all in one’s day-to-day work, but that re-
quires  a  courage  and  perseverance  that  goes  beyond,  sort  of,  the 
personal  gratifications  of  socializing  and  so  forth.  You  just  have  to 
keep that in mind as you look at these things, as the effect on the 
professionalism of the staff. 

Representative  MILLER.  OK.  And  the  description  that  Mr.  Cobb 
made of wanting to have a good relationship, wanting to ingratiate 
himself with Mr. O’Keefe so that he could get his recommendations 
accepted and implemented, is that consistent with these standards 
and  your  understanding  of  what  the  professional  obligations  of  an 
Inspector General are? 

Dr.  LIGHT.  It  is  the  IG’s  ultimate  goal  to  see  the  recommenda-
tions of audits and investigations turned into action. That does not 
require ingratiation. That requires respect and integrity among all 
parties.  One  of  the  people  we’re  not  talking  about  at  depth  here  is 
the  Administrator  and  what  he  sought  to  accomplish  through  this 
relationship.  We  haven’t  talked  about  the  deputy  director  of  OMB 
for  management,  who  has  a  role,  governmentwide,  to  protect  the 
Inspectors  General  from  undue  influence.  So,  you  know,  there  is  a 
desire  to  have  your  recommendations  adopted,  and  you  want  to 
have  a  good  professional  relationship  with  the  leadership  team, 
but,  under  no  circumstances  do  you  give  away  your  independence. 
Your recommendations are adopted because they’re the right thing 
to do, not because you’re friends or pals with the Administrator. 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Ms.  BRIAN.  I  would  concur.  I  mean,  basically,  you  get  your  rec-
ommendations  implemented  because  of  the  strength,  the  power  of 
the information that you have, and the respect you have for it, not 
because of your friendship. 

Representative  MILLER.  In  these  standards,  there  is  also  a  dis-
cussion  of  external  impairments.  External  impairments  to  inde-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

pendence  occur  when  the  OIG  staff  is  deterred  from  acting  objec-
tively  and  exercising  professional  skepticism  by  pressures,  actual 
or perceived, from management and employees of the reviewed en-
tity or oversight organizations. 

Impairments include external interference or influence that could 
improperly  or  imprudently  limit  or  modify  the  scope  of  OIG  work, 
or  threaten  to  do  so,  including  pressure  to  reduce,  inappropriately, 
the extent of work performed in order to reduce costs or fees. 

Again,  asking  the  management  what  they  want  to  investigate, 
running  drafts  by  them  before  publishing  drafts,  editing  it  based 
upon their concerns, is that an external impairment? 

Ms.  BRIAN.  There’s  no  doubt.  And  the  fact  that,  even  after  the 
Congress has begun its investigation, to allow the Administrator to 
come in and speak to the—— 

Representative MILLER. Well—— 
Ms. BRIAN.—entire IG staff, and—— 
Representative MILLER. That was my—— 
Ms.  BRIAN.—during  that  conversation,  minimize  the  findings  of 
the  PCIE,  which  is  problematic  in  itself,  but  then  starts—tells 
them  what  he  thinks  they  should  do,  including  only  doing  inves-
tigations  that  involve  $1  billion  of  savings,  with  the  IG  sitting 
there,  and  allowing  it,  to  me,  is  absolute  evidence  that  he  simply 
doesn’t really understand the problem at all. 

Representative MILLER. OK. That was actually my next question, 

but that’s OK. 

erything here. 

Dr. Light, would you agree with Ms. Brian’s—— 
Dr.  LIGHT.  I  think  we’re  in  close  agreement  on  pretty  much  ev-

Representative  MILLER.  OK.  With  respect  both  to  asking  in  ad-

vance, exchanging e-mails—— 

Dr. LIGHT. You know—— 
Representative MILLER.—sending e-mails about—— 
Dr.  LIGHT.—you  develop  your  agenda  for  the  office  from  con-
versation and from observation. It’s not, you know, unacceptable to 
talk to the Administrator about what you intend to do, and to have 
the  Administrator  say  to  you,  ‘‘Well,  I’d  sure  like  you  to  focus  on 
X or Y.’’ But, at no point does the IG give the control of the agenda 
to  someone  other  than  him-  or  herself.  That  is  just  not  acceptable. 
It’s a bright line. So, can you have a conversation with the Admin-
istrator about what you’re going to do, you know, where things are 
going.  That’s  fine.  You  know,  can  you  use  that  information  to  cir-
cumscribe  or  to  somehow  curtail  your  activities?  Absolutely  not. 
You  have  to  follow  the  statute’s  direction,  which  is  extremely 
broad, broader than many people recognize, in its intent. 

Representative  MILLER.  I  don’t  think  you’ve  spoken  directly  to 
the  mandatory  meeting  that—as  Ms.  Brian  did—of  the  staff  of  the 
OIG, the Office of the Inspector General, and NASA with Dr. Grif-
fin,  in  which  he  addressed  the  PCIE  report  with  respect  to  Mr. 
Cobb and basically said, ‘‘Moose is my boy.’’ 

Dr.  LIGHT.  That  is  a  meeting  that  should  never  have  occurred, 
in  my  judgment.  It  reflects  a  lack  of  understanding  somewhere 
about the nature of the relationship between the Administrator and 
the  Office  of  Inspector  General.  Should  never  have  happened.  Tre-
mendous chilling effect on the independence of the OIG. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

Representative MILLER. OK. 
Thank you. 
Senator NELSON. Senator McCaskill? 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  I,  unfortunately,  am  going  to  have  to  pre-
side over the Armed Services hearing at 4:30, so I’m going to have 
to  leave  to  do  that  in  just  a  few  minutes,  so  I  will  not  be  here  for 
the next witness’s testimony. 

But  I  do  want  to  speak  to  the  auditors  on  the  panel  a  little  bit 
about  the  nature  of  audit  reports,  in  terms  of  how  conservative 
they  are.  And  I  notice  that  Mr.  Cobb,  in  his  testimony,  wants  to 
diminish the fact that this report that was issued by the HUD IG, 
by  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency.  Could  you 
speak  briefly  about  the  requirements  for  every  finding  an  in  audit 
to  be  referenced,  and  how  strict  the  requirements  are  in  govern-
ment  auditing,  in  terms  of  nothing  is  put  in  a  report  that  cannot 
be  documented  by  direct  reference.  And  that’s  when  you  refer  to 
your  ‘‘workpapers,’’  obviously,  that’s  the  guts  of  an  audit  that  is 
used  to  glean  the  information  that  is  reviewed  and  reviewed  and 
reviewed for references. You know his testimony about this report, 
and  the  fact  that  it  didn’t  show  any  illegality,  and  you  know  this 
is  a  bruising  report,  since  this  is  a  peer  review,  in  essence.  Am  I 
correct,  that,  for  Mr.  Cobb,  the  Integrity  Committee’s  report  is  his 
peers passing judgment on his ability to do this job? And could any 
of you reference the conservative nature of you guys? In my experi-
ence, it’s very hard to ever question an audit, because of your train-
ing and the way you view what you do, in terms of the documenta-
tion. 

Mr.  CARSON.  Well,  just  to  speak  for  audits—not  investigations, 
but  for  audits,  like  you  mentioned,  I  mean,  we  have  a  very  thor-
ough—every  organization  I’ve  ever  belonged  to,  we  have  a  very 
thorough—what  we  call  ‘‘referencing  process,’’  where  an  audit  re-
port  is  referenced  back  to  supporting  work,  supporting  documents, 
interviews, what have you, and then a third party, not even associ-
ated  with  the  audit,  will  usually  come  in  and  do  a—what  we  call 
an  ‘‘independent  referencing,’’  checking  the  facts  and  figures  in 
every  report,  someone  who  wasn’t  even  involved  with  the  job—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Clean read. 
Mr. CARSON. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator MCCASKILL. And when he took some of these reports and 
wanted to change findings, wanted you to change findings, did you 
explain  to  him  about  referencing,  and  that  this  was  not  a  matter 
of  him  waving  a  magic  wand  and  the  audit  report  changing,  that 
every  finding  has  to  be  referenced?  Did  he  understand  that  con-
cept? 

Mr.  CARSON.  We—the  auditors—we  auditors,  the  management 
team,  we  argued  those  things  constantly,  but—towards  the  end,  I 
mean—I  mean,  it  shows,  by  the  number  of  people  that  have  left, 
we just refused to go along with it, at some point. Yes, I mean, we 
only  tried  to  publish  what  we  could  support.  I  can’t  say  we  pub-
lished  anything  that  wasn’t  supportable,  but  mostly  it  was  things 
being taken out of reports. 

Senator  MCCASKILL.  How  many  auditors  have  left  NASA  OIG 

since Mr. Cobb has taken over? 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

Mr.  CARSON.  I  have  no  idea,  but  it’s  quite  a  few.  All  I  know  is, 
the  entire  senior  management  team  that  I  worked  with,  upon  his 
arrival, of probably 15 to 17 senior auditors, there may be one left. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  And  what  about  the  number  of  audits  that 
have been performed? I realize that in a couple of instances he took 
audits and made them e-mails to management, or he took an audit 
and  changed  it  into  a  letter,  so  there  was  never  any  public  docu-
ment issued—— 

Mr. CARSON. Right. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.—that  the  public  would  know  that  he  was 
doing his job as an independent IG on these operations. How many 
times  did  that  occur?  And  what  about  the  product,  in  terms  of  the 
number of audits that were issued under his tenure? 

Senator  NELSON.  Senator  McCaskill,  if  you’ll  look  at  that  chart, 
and  if  you  all  will  put  that  chart  up  on  the  easel,  you’ll  see  the 
number of audits and the terms of the two previous IGs—— 

Senator MCCASKILL. Yes. 
Senator NELSON.—in NASA. 
Senator MCCASKILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Did  you  have  a  severe  staff  shortage  that  occurred  under  Mr. 

Cobb that would have accounted for this kind of reduction—— 

Mr. CARSON. No, not at—— 
Senator MCCASKILL.—in the number of audits? 
Mr.  CARSON.—not  at  all.  I  can  attribute  it  to—I  think  we  were 
doing  just  as  much  work,  but  the  reporting  process  was  so—the 
process  was:  there  was  no  process.  We  couldn’t  get  anything  out. 
It was more painful—it was more painful to the audit teams to try 
to  issue  a  report  than  to  just  look  the  other  way  at  issues.  That’s 
how bad it got toward the end. 

Senator MCCASKILL. So, it was easier to start another audit even 
though  I’m  sure  it  took  a  lot  longer,  under  Mr.  Cobb,  to  complete 
audits, it was easier just to not fight it, and go on? I mean—— 

Mr. CARSON. Well, or not—or not—— 
Senator MCCASKILL. Fewer starts? 
Mr. CARSON. No. 
Senator  MCCASKILL.  Did  he  approve  the  starts?  Did  he  approve 

the initial starts? 

Mr.  CARSON.  Some,  yes.  I  mean,  we—it  was  talk—we  were  talk-
ing,  earlier,  about  planning  and  the  influence  of  the  agency  over 
planning. I mean, there were several—I had security as a responsi-
bility, also, and, after 9/11, the agency received quite a large appro-
priation for security—supplemental security funding. And that was 
my number-one security priority audit, and I was never allowed to 
start—and  I  had  allegations  from  sources  throughout  the  agency 
that some of that money may have been misspent, and I was never 
allowed to start that audit. 

Senator MCCASKILL. I noticed, also in his testimony, and I’ve got 
to get this in now, because I have to leave, I found a certain irony, 
Mr. Chairman, that Mr. Cobb, in one instance, defended himself by 
saying  that  he  had  done  something  better  than  the  Department  of 
Justice, which is a little ironic, in light of the current situation that 
we have at the Department of Justice. I thought that was an inter-
esting  defense  of  his  behavior,  that  he  would  draw  that  compari-
son. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

And,  I’ve  got  to  say,  before  I  leave,  and  thank  you,  to  all  of  you, 
for  being  here,  I  don’t  know  why  we’re  here,  because  it’s  obvious 
to  me  that  this  Inspector  General  doesn’t  ‘‘get  it.’’  And  it  seems  to 
me that his resignation should have occurred a long time ago. And 
the fact that he hasn’t resigned is an insult, I believe, to Inspectors 
General  throughout  government  that  are  doing  their  jobs  with 
independence  and  integrity  and  courage,  and  to  all  the  auditors 
that  are  out  there  working  in  the  Federal  Government,  doing  the 
best they can to hold our Government accountable. 

Our  job—your  job  is  not  to  make  the  people  you  work  for  look 
good.  Your  job  is  to  reassure  the  taxpayers  that  we’re  doing  our 
best. 

And clearly, this is an Inspector General that doesn’t understand 
that obligation. And, to me, it is a vaulted and honorable obligation 
that one should relish and embrace. And I want to go on record as 
saying I believe that if Mr. Cobb does not resign immediately, that 
I  certainly  hope  other  Senators  will  join  me  in  recommending  that 
he  be  removed  from  his  position.  And  I  thank  all  of  you  for  being 
here today. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Senator McCaskill. 
And if your Armed Services meeting concludes, if you would come 
back,  your  expertise  is  certainly  valuable  and  has  lent  great  credi-
bility  to  the  questioning  today,  from  the  depth  of  your  experience 
as a prosecutor and as an auditor. 

Dr.  Light,  I  wanted  to  clear  up  just  a  couple  of  little  loose 
threads  here,  and  then,  if  Chairman  Miller  doesn’t  have  any  more 
questions, we’ll proceed. 

Representative  MILLER.  I  don’t,  of  this  panel.  A  vote  has  just 
been  called  in  the  House  that  is  one  I  can’t  explain  missing,  back 
home.  In  fact,  it  has  to  do,  particularly,  with  North  Carolina,  and 
it’s  a  bill  that  I’ve  cosponsored  in  three  Congresses  now,  and  it’s 
going  to  a  vote  for  the  first  time.  So,  I  really  do  need  to  go  vote 
on that, but I will be right back. 

Senator NELSON. OK. 
All right. Dr. Light—— 
Representative  MILLER.  It  hasn’t  been  called  yet.  It’ll  be  called 

shortly. 

Senator NELSON. OK. 
In  this  case,  the  head  of  the  PCIE  elected  to  send  the  Integrity 
Committee’s  findings  to  the  NASA  Administrator,  which  we’ve  al-
ready  discussed,  for  him  to  take  corrective  action.  In  a  case  like 
this, where, the independence of the IG is at issue, how much sense 
does it make that the agency’s management would decide his pun-
ishment? 

Dr.  LIGHT.  I  think  the  finding  should  go  to  the  deputy  director 
for  management  of  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget.  How-
ever,  in  this  particular  case  there  is  a  conflict  of  interest,  in  that 
the current deputy director for management was the director of the 
Office  of  Presidential  Personnel,  which  selected  the  Inspector  Gen-
eral  for  appointment.  Therefore,  you  would  move  this  up  a  notch, 
and  the  findings  would  go  to  the  deputy  director  of  the  Office  of 
Management  and  Budget.  And  that’s  where  it  should  reside,  and 
then  be  discussed  in  the  councils  of  the  White  House  to  decide 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

what  to  do  with  this  particular  appointee;  but  not  to  the  head  of 
NASA, I’m afraid. 

Senator  NELSON.  At  NASA,  the  ultimate  disposition  of  the  Cobb 
case was determined after a review by NASA’s general counsel, and 
the  general  counsel  admits,  in  some  of  the  testimony  that  these 
committees  have  received,  to  a  sort  of  mentoring  relationship  with 
Mr.  Cobb,  and  that  he  had  discussed  the  investigation  with  Mr. 
Cobb  at  weekly  intervals  throughout.  How  credible  is  the  NASA 
general counsel’s review and recommendations in this case? 

Dr.  LIGHT.  Well,  I  don’t  think  they’re  particularly  credible,  are 
they?  You  have  the  substance  of  the  argument  in  the  cases,  as  I 
understand  it  through  brief  exposure,  that  the  IG  has  been  com-
promised  due  to  his  relationships  with  the  Administrator  and  sen-
ior leadership team, of which he is a part, and wants to be a part, 
wants  to  ingratiate  himself,  and  you  would  not  have  your  general 
counsel involved in that conversation. 

The instinct of the administrators and general counsels all across 
government are, to some extent, not to have a strong inspector gen-
eral.  It’s  an  uncomfortable  thing  to  have  in  your  midst.  And  you 
would not look to them to make the decision on whether a friendly 
inspector general would stay in office or not. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  thank  you,  Ms.  Herzog,  Mr.  Carson,  Mr. 

Carrington, Ms. Brian, Dr. Light. Thank you for your testimony. 

The  first  panel,  we  will  dismiss,  and  we  will  call  up  Mr.  Cobb. 
Representative MILLER. And, Chairman Nelson, I misunderstood. 
I  will  probably  have  a  vote  in  about  half  an  hour,  but,  when  I  get 
called, I will have to go to that. 

Senator NELSON. OK. All right. 
[Pause.] 
Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Cobb,  your  written  statement  has  been  re-
ceived.  It  is  a  part  of  the  official  record.  We  would  like  for  you  to 
summarize  it  for  us,  and  then  we  will  have  some  questions.  You 
may proceed. 

STATEMENT OF HON. ROBERT W. COBB, 

INSPECTOR GENERAL, NASA 

Mr. COBB. Thank you, Chairman. 
My  name  is  Robert  Cobb.  I  am  the  Inspector  General  at  NASA. 
Today,  I  respond  to  unjustified  allegations  against  me,  as  re-
ported by the Integrity Committee. The Integrity Committee found 
that I did not break any laws or act illegally. 

Senator NELSON. Pull it a little closer. 
Mr. COBB. Turning it on is helpful, also. Thank you. 
The  Integrity  Committee  found  that  I  did  not  break  any  laws  or 
act  illegally.  Moreover,  the  Integrity  Committee  did  not  suggest 
that any matter covered in the wide-ranging investigation was mis-
handled  by  the  NASA  OIG.  However,  the  Integrity  Committee  did 
reach certain other conclusions which are demonstrably invalid. 

Anyone  seeking  to  learn  the  truth  about  the  Integrity  Commit-
tee’s  finding  should  examine  my  written  statement,  which  makes 
clear that the findings are a travesty. 

Failing  to  find  actual  lack  of  independence,  the  Integrity  Com-
mittee  asserts  an  appearance  of  lack  of  independence  in,  specifi-
cally,  two  instances,  one  involving  a  proposed  Crime  Stoppers  no-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

tice,  and  the  other  relating  to  the  investigation  by  my  office  into 
the illegal copying of International Traffic in Arms Regulations des-
ignated  materials.  I  prove  in  my  written  statement  that  these  as-
sertions are utterly devoid of merit. 

As  regards  independence,  the  Inspector  General  Act,  its  legisla-
tive  history,  and  PCIE  guidance  mandate  a  good  working  relation-
ship  between  an  Inspector  General  and  the  agency  head.  The  In-
spector General Act states that the Inspector General is, ‘‘to report 
to, and be under the general supervision of, the agency head.’’ The 
agency  head,  under  the  Inspector  General  Act,  is  ‘‘required  to 
render  assistance  to  the  Inspector  General  in  the  Inspector  Gen-
eral’s  execution  of  his  responsibilities.’’  And  the  Inspector  General 
is, among other things, ‘‘required to keep the agency head currently 
informed  of  problems  and  to  recommend  policies  to  promote  the 
economy and efficiency of the agency.’’ 

The  legislative  history  of  the  Inspector  General  Act—in  par-
ticular, the report of the Committee on Governmental Affairs, U.S. 
Senate,  Report  Number  95–1071,  to  accompany  H.R.  8588,  which 
I  request  be  added  to  the  record,  states  emphatically,  quote,  ‘‘The 
Committee  believes  that  Inspector  General’s  efforts  will  be  signifi-
cantly  impaired  if  he  does  not  have  a  smooth  working  relationship 
with the Department head.’’ The Committee continued, quoting the 
ATW  Inspector  General,  ‘‘To  be  truly  effective,  the  Inspector  Gen-
eral  must  have  a  close  relationship  with  the  Secretary,  enjoy  his 
confidence  and  respect,  and  be  responsive  to  his  concerns,  both  as 
to his specific assignments and as to the Inspector General’s overall 
function in the agency.’’ 

The  Committee  continued,  ‘‘The  Inspector  General  can  be  the 
agency  head’s  strong  right  arm  in  rooting  out  fraud,  abuse,  and 
waste, while maintaining the independence needed to honor his re-
porting  obligations  to  Congress.  The  Committee  does  not—the 
Committee  does  not  doubt  that  some  tension  can  result  from  this 
relationship,  but  the  Committee  believes  that  the  potential  advan-
tages far outweigh the potential risks.’’ 

The  chair  of  the  PCIE  has  issued  guidance  in  2004,  and  again 
in  2006,  that  encourages  productive  and  respectful  working  rela-
tionships  between  agencies  and  Inspectors  General.  I  also  request 
that that guidance be submitted for the record. 

I gained the confidence of Administrator O’Keefe, and I have the 
confidence  of  Administrator  Griffin.  This  is  not  because  of  lack  of 
independence.  In  fact,  there’s  been  any  number  of  instances  when 
my  view  of  matters  differed  from  the  Administrator  or  his  senior 
staff,  or  when  OIG  investigations  have  related  to  the  most  senior 
officials  of  the  agency.  It  is  because  of  my  demonstration  of  inde-
pendence  that  these  Administrators  express  confidence  in  me,  so 
the relationship has been exactly as anticipated by Congress when 
it enacted the Inspector General Act. 

I’m proud of the management initiatives that have been executed 
during  my  tenure  as  Inspector  General  which  have  ensured  that 
those  matters  most  significant  to  NASA  are  well  resourced  and 
managed.  Our  investigation  into  improprieties  by  the  Boeing  Cor-
poration which resulted in the recovery to NASA of over $100 mil-
lion  last  summer  was  an  example  of  a  matter  that  benefited  from 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

substantial  OIG  management  involvement,  including  substantial 
attention from me. 

At NASA, I have taken the responsibilities of office under the In-
spector  General  Act  seriously  and  without  compromise  to  root  out 
and  prevent  fraud,  waste,  and  abuse,  and  to  promote  the  economy 
and  efficiency  of  the  agency.  I  have  worked  with  NASA  manage-
ment  in  the  manner  contemplated  by  the  Inspector  General  Act.  I 
have upheld my oath to support and defend the Constitution of the 
United  States.  My  staff  and  I  have  worked  very  hard  to  gain  re-
spect  by  building  expertise  in  the  areas  in  which  we  conduct  our 
work,  by  ensuring  that  our  work  is  performed  in  a  fair  and  bal-
anced  manner,  by  making  sure  that  the  work  is  supported  by  law 
and  relevant  facts,  and  by  making  sure  that  NASA  OIG  organiza-
tion  reflects  the  economy  and  efficiency  of  operations  that  we  de-
mand of the agency we oversee. As a result of this dedicated effort, 
I  proudly  stand  behind  the  work  of  the  NASA  OIG.  I  believe  the 
NASA  OIG  to  be  a  much  stronger  organization  today  than  when  I 
became the NASA Inspector General. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Cobb follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. ROBERT W. COBB, INSPECTOR GENERAL, NASA 
Chairmen, Members of the Subcommittees, my name is Robert W. Cobb. I am the 
Inspector  General  at  NASA,  having  been  appointed  to  that  position  by  President 
George  W.  Bush  on  April  16,  2002,  after  confirmation  by  the  U.S.  Senate.  Prior  to 
that, from January 2001, to April 2002, I was an Associate Counsel to the President, 
with  primary  responsibility  for  handling  ethics  program  matters  for  the  White 
House  and  the  financial  disclosure  process  for  nominees  to  Executive  Branch  posi-
tions  requiring  Senate  confirmation.  For  9  years,  from  1992  to  2001,  I  was  a  staff 
attorney at the Office of Government Ethics, and, from 1986 to 1992, I was an attor-
ney in private practice. 

Today,  for  the  first  time,  I  am  responding  publicly  to  unjustified  allegations 
against  me.  Until  now,  I  have  deferred  to  the  process  of  the  Integrity  Committee 
(IC)  of  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (PCIE);  that  process  is 
now concluded. 

The  IC  opened  an  administrative  investigation  of  my  activities  as  Inspector  Gen-
eral in December 2005, purportedly pursuant to its authority under Executive Order 
(EO) 12993, and closed the investigation in April of 2007. The Inspector General of 
the  Department  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development  (HUD  OIG)  conducted  the  in-
vestigation  at  the  request  of  the  IC.  The  results  of  the  investigation  reflect  that  I 
did not break any laws or act illegally. [Exhibit A] The IC did not suggest that any 
matter  covered  in  the  wide-ranging  investigation  was  mishandled  by  the  NASA 
OIG.  But  the  conclusions  the  IC  did  reach  were  as  flawed  as  the  investigation  on 
which  they  were  based,  and  are  demonstrably  invalid.  The  IC  acknowledged  the 
weakness of its own conclusions by not submitting any recommendation to the PCIE 
Chair,  even  though  EO  12993  mandates  such  a  submission.  I  attach  Exhibit  B,  an 
annotated  version  of  the  IC’s  January  22,  2007,  letter,  detailing  the  IC’s  false  and 
misleading recitation of facts and law and the broken and dysfunctional process pur-
suant to which the IC’s conclusions were reached. My concerns about the investiga-
tive  process  are  catalogued  in  my  correspondence  with  the  IC,  with  relevant  cor-
respondence being attached. [Exhibits C–R] For just one example, while I was noti-
fied  by  the  IC  that  the  investigation  concerned  safety  matters,  to  my  knowledge, 
none  of  the  witnesses  I  identified  at  the  outset  of  the  investigation  were  inter-
viewed. [Exhibit D] 

The  Chair  of  the  PCIE  decided  that  the  results  of  the  investigation  did  not  war-
rant  a  referral  to  the  White  House  for  further  action.  Instead,  the  PCIE  Chair  for-
warded  the  report  to  Michael  Griffin,  the  NASA  Administrator,  to  consider  ‘‘what 
actions, if any, you propose to take.’’ [Exhibit S] Upon review of the IC’s report, the 
NASA Administrator concluded that the Report of Investigation (ROI) ‘‘does not con-
tain  evidence  of  a  lack  of  integrity  on  the  part  of  Mr.  Cobb,  nor  is  there  support 
in  the  ROI  for  any  actual  conflict  of  interest  or  actual  lack  of  independence  on  his 
part.’’ [Exhibit T] The NASA Administrator has publicly stated that I did not abuse 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

the power of my office, that there has been no action on my part to compromise safe-
ty, and that my independence is not in question.1 Nevertheless, Administrator Grif-
fin  committed  to  arranging  for  me,  with  the  concurrence  of  the  PCIE  Chair,  man-
agement  training  and  coaching  to  address  management  concerns  raised  by  the  IC 
investigation. [Exhibit U] I have agreed to receive the executive training and coach-
ing, and I have already begun to implement these measures. 

In his review of the IC’s report, Administrator Griffin observed: 

In the 2-years that I have [been NASA Administrator], I have seen a high qual-
ity work product from the OIG reflective of a staff and its leadership dedicated 
to  carrying  out  the  mission  entrusted  by  law  to  the  IG.  IG  Cobb  is  technically 
sound,  highly  conscientious,  fully  engaged  in  his  work,  and  he  brings  rigorous 
analysis to the OIG work product. [Exhibit V] 

That the PCIE Chair determined the matter did not warrant referral to the White 
House and that NASA, in contemplating whether any action should be taken, would 
challenge  conclusions  of  the  IC  is  not  surprising  because  the  IC’s  negative  conclu-
sions  do  not  withstand  reasonable  examination.  This  is  fundamentally  because  the 
IC’s criticisms are not based on facts or law and are wrong. They are wrong as the 
result  of  an  investigation  flawed  in  design  and  execution  and  without  respect  for 
even  the  most  basic  notions  of  due  process  and  fairness—or  compliance  with  law 
and procedural requirements. [See Exhibit B for detail] 

Notwithstanding  thousands  of  hours  of  investigation  by  the  HUD  OIG,  including 
eleven  hours  of  my  interview,  neither  the  HUD  OIG  nor  the  IC  could  find  a  single 
instance  where  some  action  or  non-action  on  my  part  during  the  previous  5  years 
evidenced  lack  of  independence.  Indeed,  Alan  Li,  former  Director,  Acquisition  and 
Sourcing Management at the Government Accountability Office (GAO), who was re-
sponsible for handling NASA issues for GAO, stated before a group of Congressional 
staff  I  was  briefing  that  I  was  the  most  independent  IG  he  had  ever  seen.  (Despite 
being  advised  of  this,  the  IC  and  the  HUD  OIG  did  not  interview  Mr.  Li.)  Failing 
to  find  actual  lack  of  independence,  the  IC  asserts  an  appearance  of  lack  of  inde-
pendence in specifically two instances, one involving a proposed Crime Stoppers no-
tice  and  the  other  relating  to  the  illegal  copying  of  International  Traffic  in  Arms 
Regulation  (ITAR)  designated  materials,  which  I  will  prove  in  this  Statement  (and 
Exhibit B in greater detail) are utterly devoid of merit. In the Crime Stoppers mat-
ter,  the  IC  gets  the  facts  wrong,  and  any  action  other  than  that  I  took  would  have 
been  reprehensible.  In  the  ITAR  matter,  there  was  no  action  I  should  have  taken 
that  I  did  not,  and  the  actions  I  am  alleged  to  have  failed  to  take  were  not  nec-
essary,  not  required,  and  not  the  subject  of  any  serious  recommendation  or  discus-
sion.  Yet  the  IC  relies  on  this  house  of  sand  to  conclude  that  I  caused  a  perception 
of lack of independence. 

In connection with the Crime Stoppers notice, the IC first ignores the reality that 
by  virtue  of  NASA  OIG  senior  management  involvement,  a  serious  mistake  was 
averted. One year after the Space Shuttle Columbia accident, members of the NASA 
OIG  staff  had  proposed  that  the  OIG  join  the  Texas  Rangers  in  announcing  that 
the public’s help was needed in connection with the alleged theft of a ring from the 
finger  of  a  deceased  astronaut.  After  consultation  with  senior  OIG  staff,  I  directed 
that additional investigation be conducted to determine whether a ring actually had 
been on the astronaut’s finger at the time of the tragedy. It became clear that there 
was no ring on the finger of the astronaut, and, therefore, there was no credible evi-
dence of a theft. Public suggestion that persons involved in the recovery effort were 
involved in such a heinous crime would have been most inappropriate. Again, to be 
clear, there was no ring on the remains of the astronaut and, therefore, there could 
not have been a theft of a ring from those remains. 

In  its  review,  the  IC  misleadingly  omits  any  reference  to  the  compelling  photo-
graphic  evidence  that  belies  any  notion  that  issuing  a  Crime  Stopper  notice  might 
be  appropriate.  Compounding  the  unfairness  of  ignoring  critical  contrary  evidence, 
the  IC  overreaches  to  find  an  appearance  issue  where  there  was  none  by  relying 
on  nonsensical  HUD  OIG  reports  of  witness  testimony.  So,  for  example,  the  IC  re-
counts in its January 22 letter that: 

According  to  [redacted],  IG  Cobb  said  the  whole  NASA  Columbia  investigation 
was  not  going  well,  NASA  wanted  it  finished,  and  for  the  outcome  to  reveal 
nothing  that  would  make  NASA  look  bad  or  shake  the  public’s  trust  in  NASA. 
The relevant discussion from which this account derives took place in April 2004, 
8  months  after  the  NASA  Columbia  accident  investigation  had  been  concluded  (in 

1 Michael Griffin C-SPAN Newsmaker interview on April 8, 2007. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

August  2003).  The  idea  that  I  would  say  the  investigation  was  not  going  well  8 
months after it was finished is facially incredible. Yet the IC relies on this obviously 
mistaken  statement  to  reach  its  conclusion  on  appearance  of  lack  of  independence, 
notwithstanding  that  the  endorsement  of  the  proposed  Crime  Stopper  notice  would 
have been a dereliction of my duty. 

The IC recounts that: 

The  Texas  Ranger  involved  in  the  investigation  informed  [the]  HUD  OIG  that 
he  believed  someone  at  NASA  wanted  the  investigation  shut  down  because  if 
it  got  out  that  the  ring  was  stolen,  questions  would  be  asked  as  to  the  conduct 
of the whole NASA investigation into the Columbia accident. 

Reliance  on  this  statement  reflects  the  IC’s  stubborn  persistence  to  make  some-
thing  out  of  nothing.  As  there  was  no  stolen  ring,  the  premise  for  the  belief  stated 
is  nonsense.  Moreover,  the  statement  reflects  an  overall  ignorance  of  the  Columbia 
Accident Investigation Board’s report issued in August 2003, known for its thorough 
examination of both the immediate and root causes of the Columbia accident. Inclu-
sion  of  the  statement  and  presumptive  ratification  by  the  IC  of  its  relevance  to  the 
analysis  of  an  ‘‘appearance’’  issue  again  reflects  the  IC’s  own  total  lack  of  under-
standing  of  relevant  facts.  It  also  shows  that  the  IC’s  determination  in  this  matter 
is  based  more  on  whatever  anyone  would  say  rather  than  whether  there  was  any 
justification  or  credibility  to  his  or  her  statements.  The  IC’s  methodology  for  deter-
mining  an  ‘‘appearance’’  problem  allows  it  to  make  a  negative  finding  when  there 
are  no  facts  to  support  it  other  than  what  some  person,  not  in  a  position  to  know, 
says. 

The IC also recounts that: 

Another NASA employee . . . recalls IG Cobb saying, ‘‘Can you believe how em-
barrassing  that  would  have  looked  for  the  agency  [NASA]  if  that  [Crime  Stop-
pers report] went out?’’ 

Obviously, there would have been embarrassment if the OIG were to endorse pub-
lication  of  a  false  allegation  that  authorities  participating  in  the  recovery  process 
robbed  an  astronaut’s  remains  of  jewelry.  This  incident  should  have  resulted  in  a 
finding  that  senior  staff  properly  avoided  the  loss  of  public  confidence  that  would 
have  resulted  from  issuing  a  misguided  and  false  public  cry  for  help.  Instead,  the 
IC relies on this statement in finding lack of independence. Again, there was no ring 
on  the  remains,  and  therefore  no  theft.  Interestingly,  after  the  NASA  OIG  declined 
to participate in the Crime Stopper report, the Texas Rangers, who had been inves-
tigating  the  matter  for  a  year  without  the  help  of  the  NASA  OIG,  apparently  de-
cided themselves not to issue the Crime Stopper notice. 

The IC’s conclusion on the ITAR incident is similarly flawed. As a starting point, 
the  ITAR  matter  was  one  the  IC  had  previously  considered  and,  after  seeking  and 
obtaining  relevant  information  on  the  allegation,  determined  that  ‘‘IG  Cobb’s  re-
sponse  substantially  demonstrated  that  IG  Cobb  had  not  engaged  in  any  wrong-
doing . . . the IC will take no further action concerning this matter and has placed 
this file in a closed status.’’ [Exhibit W] EO 12993 specifically precludes further re-
view by the IC of a closed matter. 

The  IC  got  the  ITAR  complaint  right  the  first  time,  but  in  reopening  the  matter, 
the  IC  exhibits  the  same  illogical  approach  and  persistence  in  the  face  of  the  evi-
dence that led to its invalid Crime Stoppers conclusion. 

Again,  the  IC  repeats  allegations  and  treats  them  as  true  without  any  factual  or 
legal  analysis.  The  IC  states,  for  example,  ‘‘[t]he  theft  of  ITAR  matter  must  be  re-
ported to the Department of State.’’ No legal support is cited for this statement and, 
in fact, I believe that there is none. Once this initial legal pillar is taken away, the 
rest of the house of cards falls away. 

Moreover,  as  a  factual  matter,  the  theft  of  ITAR  from  the  Marshall  Space  Flight 
Center  was  indeed  informally  discussed  with  the  Department  of  State  very  soon 
after the illegal downloading of data occurred. The director of NASA’s export control 
office informed me that the Department of State told him when he notified it of the 
intrusion that it had already seen the press report about the intrusion and that no 
voluntary  disclosure  of  the  loss  was  required  because  NASA  had  not  violated  the 
ITAR.  Department  of  State  reporting  requirements  relating  to  violations  of  ITAR 
and those regulations do not address theft of ITAR information from a Government 
agency. For voluntary disclosure provisions, see ITAR at 22 CFR 127.12. 

Having overlooked the substantive rules that apply, the IC then goes on to ignore 
the  vast  bulk  of  the  factual  evidence  relevant  to  its  conclusion.  The  IC  states  that 
witnesses  questioned  my  decision  not  to  report  the  matter  to  the  Department  of 
State.  However,  all  of  the  contemporaneous  documentation  of  the  investigation  and 
related  matters  demonstrate  that  no  recommendation  to  report  was  made.  Docu-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

ments  in  the  investigative  file  consider  the  question  of  whether  there  may  be  a  re-
porting requirement, but then reflect that if there is, NASA will take care of it. Re-
garding  the  Department  of  State,  NASA  had  already  informed  them  of  the  illegal 
access to NASA’s systems at Marshall, even though no requirement to do so existed. 
After  the  intrusion  was  identified  in  the  press,  as  the  index  to  the  case  file  re-
flects,  the  NASA  OIG  worked  in  concert,  from  the  very  beginning  of  the  investiga-
tion,  with  the  Defense  Criminal  Investigative  Service.  Soon  thereafter,  the  Federal 
Bureau  of  Investigation  and  the  National  Infrastructure  Protection  Center  (NIPC) 
were aware of the matter. (Under Presidential Decision Directive 63, the NIPC was 
an  interagency  operation  located  at  the  FBI.  Created  in  1998,  the  NIPC  was  the 
focal point for the Government’s efforts to warn of and respond to cyber attacks and 
served  as  the  national  critical  infrastructure  threat  assessment,  warning,  vulner-
ability,  and  law  enforcement  investigation  and  response  entity.)  Appropriate  inter-
national  authorities  were  consulted.  The  Department  of  Justice  was  involved.  The 
ITAR investigation has been ongoing for more than 4 years and has involved a sub-
stantial amount of NASA OIG resources. The idea that the NASA OIG failed to re-
port  anything  or  mishandled  the  matter  is  simply  false,  yet  the  IC  restates  unsup-
ported  allegations  and  accepts  them  prima  facie  in  order  to  substantiate  its  notion 
of ‘‘appearance’’ of lack of independence. 

This  investigation  was  not  about  finding  the  truth.  The  investigators  contented 
themselves  with  collecting  isolated  allegations  from  disgruntled  persons  who  were 
invited  to  offer  personal  opinions  and  speculate  about  irrelevant  matters.  No  effort 
was made to discover the truth of the underlying facts upon which these allegations 
were  based—with  the  result  that  many  of  the  allegations  repeated  in  the  IC  letter 
are  based  on  false  premises  and  should  have  been  (as  was  in  the  ITAR  case)  dis-
missed long ago. 

The  failure  of  the  IC  to  follow  the  EO  and  its  procedures  in  this  case  inevitably 
led  to  an  investigation  conducted  without  any  applicable  legal  standards.  Without 
specific guidance from the IC, the investigators simply invited people to make com-
plaints,  without  regard  to  whether  the  complaints  were  a  proper  area  of  inquiry  or 
had any basis in fact. The result was that the vast bulk of the investigation is unus-
able  for  any  proper  purpose,  because  it  concerned  matters  outside  the  scope  of  the 
IC’s jurisdiction and involved matters that amounted to nothing more than idle gos-
sip.  In  the  end,  because  of  the  IC’s  departure  from  established  procedures,  a  great 
deal of time and money was utterly wasted. 

In stark contrast to the IC’s investigation, which proceeded without any apparent 
concern for due process, compliance with the controlling EO, and other legal require-
ments,  I  have  worked  very  hard  to  ensure  that  NASA  OIG  operations,  audits  and 
investigations have been conducted in accordance with the Constitution and laws of 
the  United  States.  For  this,  I  have  occasionally  met  resistance  from  a  few  staff 
members  and  now  have  been  investigated  for  these  same  acts.  In  one  instance,  I 
asked a question about the validity—the Constitutionality—of a search warrant and 
was  told  by  a  member  of  my  staff  that  my  very  asking  the  question  amounted  to 
an  obstruction  of  justice,  notwithstanding  that  counsel  to  the  IG  also  questioned 
whether  the  facts  on  which  the  warrant  were  based  constituted  a  crime.  And  it  is 
interchanges in which I displayed passionate insistence on compliance with the Con-
stitution and laws of the United States, in the face of unjustifiable recalcitrance on 
the  part  of  a  member  of  my  staff,  which  was  at  the  heart  of  the  IC  conclusion  that 
I  created  a  hostile  work  environment  as  to  one  employee.  Somehow,  by  taking  ap-
propriate  actions  pursuant  to  the  available  facts  and  law,  I  engaged  in  what 
amounts to the legal impossibility of interfering in investigations for which I am by 
law and position accountable. 

Just  one  example  of  my  ensuring  that  our  Office’s  operations  are  conducted  in 
strict conformity with the law occurred in March 2004. I was presented with a letter 
by my staff to use new Patriot Act authority to engage in computer monitoring that 
required my signature to proceed. After I inquired into the facts, I determined that 
the statute did not authorize the OIG to monitor activity in the instance presented. 
I  therefore  refused  to  sign  the  letter.  No  illegal  monitoring  occurred  as  a  result. 
Contrast  this  with  the  March  2007  audit  report  by  the  Department  of  Justice  IG 
concerning  the  FBI’s  issuance  of  National  Security  Letters.  That  audit  established 
that there was a systemic failure at the FBI to provide adequate assurance that the 
Patriot  Act  requirements  were  being  observed  in  connection  with  the  letters.  Mat-
ters  involving  the  use  of  investigative  power  require  management,  oversight,  and 
strict abidance with legal requirements, and they have at the NASA OIG under my 
leadership. 

The  road  to  producing  disciplined  work  at  the  high  standard  I  demand  has  re-
sulted  in  some  discord.  Some  employees  have  not  appreciated  having  their  work 
tested  inside  the  office  to  make  sure  it  is  founded  in  fact  and  law  rather  than  per-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

sonal  opinion.  Some  have  chafed  at  my  direction  that  when  we  conduct  investiga-
tions we have a clear understanding of possible wrongdoing based on law and regu-
lation rather than supposition and personal notions of right and wrong. This imposi-
tion  of  rigor  has  resulted  in  the  NASA  OIG  getting  the  work  right.  The  exhaustive 
investigation  of  the  IC  notwithstanding,  there  has  been  no  credible  suggestion  of 
any  defect  in  OIG  work  product.  As  a  result  of  the  NASA  OIG  work  product,  real 
attention  is  being  paid  at  NASA  to  perennial  challenges  in  financial  management, 
information  technology  security,  and  in  areas  relating  to  critical  mission  execution. 
Our investigative work product in administrative cases (where the benefit of an As-
sistant United States Attorney or other prosecutor is absent) is taken seriously and 
acted upon by NASA management. In contrast, when I began serving as the Inspec-
tor General at NASA, the agency’s record in taking appropriate disciplinary actions 
based on IG investigations was inconsistent, at best. As for audits, the agency faced 
an inventory of approximately 400–500 outstanding audit recommendations that the 
OIG had made but the agency had not implemented. [See Exhibit L, specifically at-
tachment 2 to Exhibit a, of that Exhibit]. While the OIG was making recommenda-
tions, they were not being implemented, in contrast to what has occurred during my 
tenure as IG. 

In  addition  to  the  discomfort  associated  with  the  high  standards  for  NASA  OIG 
work  that  some  employees  might  have  felt,  there  was  resistance  to  changes  I  di-
rected  to  address  what  I  perceived  to  be  weaknesses  in  the  organization  and  oper-
ations of the NASA OIG at the beginning of my tenure. Some of the most important 
changes  were  unpopular,  but  needed.  While  I  have  been  subjected  to  criticisms  re-
lating  to  management,  actually,  the  management  steps  taken  under  my  leadership 
have been necessary to execute the OIG mission more effectively and efficiently. At-
tached  as  Exhibit  X  is  a  list  of  some  of  the  management  initiatives  that  have  been 
executed during my tenure as IG. These initiatives have led to an organization that 
approaches issues systemically rather than ad hoc, with mature quality control, ac-
countability, and focus on the future as well as the present. The management strat-
egy  has  focused  on  ensuring  that  we  have  those  matters  that  are  most  significant 
to  NASA  well  resourced  and  managed.  Our  investigation  into  improprieties  by  the 
Boeing  Corporation,  which  resulted  in  the  recovery  to  NASA  of  over  $100  million 
last summer, was an example of a matter that benefited from substantial OIG man-
agement  attention,  including  from  myself.  I  believe  the  NASA  OIG  to  be  a  much 
stronger organization today than when I became the Inspector General. 

One  might  ask  why  the  IC  would  engage  in  the  type  of  far-flung,  undisciplined, 
proceeding  it  has  conducted.  When  investigations  are  not  conducted  with  due  proc-
ess  and  compliance  with  legal  and  procedural  requirements,  when  false  and  mis-
leading  information  is  leaked  from  the  investigation  to  the  press  to  try  to  create  a 
negative  perception  about  a  public  servant’s  integrity,  and  when  the  results  of  the 
investigation  are  characterized  in  a  manner  to  support  the  objective  of  elected  offi-
cials  and  those  making  the  complaints,  an  inference  may  be  drawn  that  the  inves-
tigation  is  not  being  conducted  with  independence.  Ironically,  the  IC  investigation 
is  exactly  the  type  of  gross  misuse  of  investigative  power  that  I  have  taken  careful 
steps to ensure does not occur at the NASA OIG. 

Complainants  and  persons  associated  with  the  investigation  have  used  the  press 
to  impugn  my  reputation.  Because  I  was  not  notified  until  April  26,  2007,  that  the 
IC  investigation  was  closed  [Exhibit  R],  because  the  press  is  not  the  proper  forum 
for  addressing  ongoing  investigative  matters  (and  because  releasing  information 
about  investigations  or  complainants  may  be  inappropriate),  I  have  not  publicly  of-
fered  any  rebuttal  to  the  allegations  against  me.  So  naturally,  news  reports  have 
been inherently one-sided. For example, The Washington Post, on February 3, 2006, 
in  a  front  page  story  reported  a  number  of  allegations  about  my  purported  failure 
to  investigate  a  number  of  safety  issues.  None  of  these  allegations  have  been  sub-
stantiated because no impropriety occurred.2 The Post issued no follow up article to 
its front page story. 

In  November  2006,  the  Orlando  Sentinel  published  information  leaked  from  the 
investigation.  (To  its  credit,  the  Sentinel  subsequently  reported  information  from 
NASA’s former Administrator and General Counsel substantially debunking certain 
aspects of the leaked information.) Defending oneself during the course of an inves-
tigation  invariably  leads  to  the  claim  of  interference  with  an  investigation,  and  I 

2 One  of  the  matters,  involving  pilots  at  the  Langley  Research  Center  who  claimed  they  had 
been retaliated against for raising issues about safety matters, led to an earlier call for an inves-
tigation.  [See  Exhibit  Y,  and  my  response  at  Exhibit  Z.]  Two  reviews  of  the  matter,  one  con-
ducted by a senior staff member at NASA Headquarters and one conducted under the auspices 
of the Aerospace Safety Advisory Panel, a statutory NASA advisory committee, agreed with the 
report of the NASA OIG. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

have avoided that by giving the investigation my full cooperation and by saying al-
most nothing to the press. Now I am told by a lead Congressional investigator that 
the  truth  of  matters  is  irrelevant  and  only  perception  matters:  a  perception  engi-
neered by those with agendas having nothing to do with truth. However, under the 
present  circumstances  and  my  steadfast  belief  that  investigations  should  be  con-
ducted fairly and legally, I am compelled to state my views publicly in the hope that 
greater  appreciation  for  the  principles  of  due  process  prevail  among  those  who  are 
charged with the responsibility to carry out investigative activities. 

Given  the  great  lengths  the  HUD  OIG  went  to  try  to  establish  a  suggestion  of 
wrongdoing and the extent of the overreaching of the IC to find, if not wrongdoing, 
appearance  of  it,  and  the  absolute  failure  of  both  of  them,  in  light  of  the  truth,  to 
show any wrongdoing or even appearance of it, the IC letter, with all its foibles and 
falsities  stands,  in  contrast  to  its  intent,  as  a  complete  and  de  facto  exoneration  of 
me and the NASA OIG. 

At  NASA,  I  have  taken  the  responsibilities  of  office  under  the  Inspector  General 
Act  seriously  and  without  compromise  to  root  out  and  prevent  fraud,  waste  and 
abuse  and  to  promote  the  economy  and  efficiency  of  the  agency.  I  have  upheld  my 
oath  to  support  and  defend  the  Constitution  of  the  United  States.  My  staff  and  I 
have worked very hard to gain respect by following the Constitution and laws of the 
United States, by ensuring that our work is performed in a fair and balanced man-
ner,  by  building  expertise  in  the  areas  in  which  we  conduct  our  work,  by  making 
sure  the  work  is  supported  by  law  and  relevant  facts,  and  by  making  sure  that 
NASA  OIG  organization  reflects  the  economy  and  efficiency  in  operations  that  we 
demand  of  the  agency  we  oversee.  As  a  result  of  this  dedicated  effort,  I  proudly 
stand behind the work of the NASA OIG. 

All  exhibits  are  in  the  Committee  files  of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce, 
Science, and Transportation and can be downloaded from the following URL: http:// 
oig.nasa.gov/congressional/Exhibits060707.pdf 
List of Exhibits 

A. Letter to James H. Burrus, Jr. from Clay Johnson, March 29, 2007 and Letter 

to Clay Johnson from James H. Burrus, March 29, 2007 

B. Annotated letter to Clay Johnson from James H. Burrus, Jr., January 22, 2007 
C. Letter to Hon. Robert W. Cobb from Chris Swecker, January 9, 2006 
D.  Letter  to  James  Burrus  from  Robert  W.  Cobb,  February  16,  2006,  with  Enclo-

sures 

sures 

E.  Letter  to  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb  from  James  H.  Burrus,  Jr.,  February  22,  2006 
F. Letter to James H. Burrus, Jr., from J. Sedwick Sollers, III, June 28, 2006 
G. Letter to Robert Mueller from Hon. Robert W. Cobb, July 17, 2006 
H. Letter to James Burrus from Hon. Robert W. Cobb, July 17, 2006, with Enclo-

I. Letter to Hon. Robert W. Cobb from James H. Burrus, Jr., August 8, 2006 
J.  Letter  to  James  H.  Burrus,  Jr.  from  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb,  August  23,  2006 
K.  Letter  to  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb  from  James  H.  Burrus,  Jr.,  August  30,  2006 
L.  Letter  to  Integrity  Committee  from  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb,  September  7,  2006, 

with Exhibits 

M. Letter to Robert Mueller from Hon. Robert W. Cobb, November 17, 2006 
N. Letter to James H. Burrus, Jr. from Hon. Robert W. Cobb, November 20, 2006 
O. Letter to Hon. Robert W. Cobb from James H. Burrus, Jr., November 21, 2006 
P. Letter to James H. Burrus, Jr. from Hon. Robert W. Cobb, December 18, 2006 
Q.  Letter  to  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb  from  James  H.  Burrus,  Jr.,  January  21,  2007 
R. Letter to Hon. Robert W. Cobb from James H. Burrus, Jr., April 26, 2007 
S. Letter to Michael D. Griffin from Clay Johnson, February 15, 2007 
T. Letter to Clay Johnson from Michael D. Griffin, March 14, 2007 
U. Memorandum to Hon. Robert W. Cobb from Administrator, March 30, 2007 
V. Letter to Clay Johnson, III from Michael D. Griffin, March 29, 2007 
W. Letter to Clay Johnson, III from Chris Swecker, October 29, 2004, with Enclo-

sures 

Enclosures 

X.  Examples  of  Management  and  Organizational  Changes  and  Initiatives  at  the 
NASA  OIG  (2002–2007),  and  Memorandum  to  the  AIG  for  Audits  and  AIG  for  In-
spections and Assessments from the Inspector General, January 17, 2003 
Y. Letter to Michael D. Griffin from Senator Bill Nelson, May 12, 2005 
Z.  Letter  to  Senator  Bill  Nelson  from  Hon.  Robert  W.  Cobb,  May  13,  2005,  with 

AA. Letter to Kenneth M. Donohue from Chris Swecker, January 6, 2006 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Cobb,  I’m  going  to  ask  you  the  questions 
that  Senator  Chuck  Grassley  had  stated  in  his  statement  that  has 
been  made  a  part  of  the  record  since  he  was  not  able  to  be  here. 
And I quote, ‘‘Mr. Cobb, do you believe that an Inspector General 
can  continue  to  serve  if  he  has  lost  the  confidence  of  his  staff  and 
of the Congress?’’ 

Mr.  COBB.  There  are  two  parts  to  that  question.  The  first  is  the 
confidence  of  his  staff.  I  do  not  believe  that  I  have  lost  the  con-
fidence of my staff. As to Congress, I believe if Congress, and those 
in  Congress,  review  the  work  of  the  Office  of  Inspector  General, 
and  take  that  work  that  that—that  the  work  is  credible,  and  it’s 
excellent work, and I stand behind all of it. 

Senator  NELSON.  His  second  question  is,  ‘‘Do  you  believe  an  In-
spector  General  can  continue  to  serve  who  has  been  found  by  an 
independent investigation to have abused his authority?’’ 

Mr.  COBB.  My  statement—my  written  statement  is  clear  on  my 
views  on  the  Integrity  Committee’s  findings.  I  stand  behind  my 
written  statement.  And  if  the  findings  of  the  Integrity  Committee 
are  falsely  based,  then  I  don’t  see  any  problem  with  continuing  to 
serve, under those circumstances. 

Senator NELSON. Well, now, are you disputing the findings of the 
Integrity  Commission  as  an  independent  investigation,  that  you 
have abused your authority? 

Mr. COBB. Yes. 
Senator NELSON. You’re disputing that. 
Mr. COBB. Yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  You  acknowledge  that  that’s  what  the  Com-

mittee report said. 

Mr.  COBB.  The  Committee  report  said  I  abused  my  authority  in-
sofar  as—and  I’m  not  quoting  it  exactly—that  I  created  a  hostile 
work environment as to one employee. 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  you  think  you  can  continue  to  serve,  even 
though  the  independent  investigation  says  that  you  abused  your 
authority. 

Mr. COBB. Yes. And I think the Integrity Committee itself recog-
nized that by not making a recommendation regarding its findings 
to the PCIE chair. 

Senator  NELSON.  Senator  Grassley’s  third  question  is,  ‘‘Do  you 
believe  an  Inspector  General  can  continue  to  serve  if  he  is  per-
ceived  as  in  the  pockets  of  the  people  he  is  supposed  to  inves-
tigate?’’ 

Mr.  COBB.  I  guess  it—from  my  perspective,  it  depends  on  whose 
perception that is. The reality, to me, is important, and there is no 
work  in  our  office  that  has  been  compromised  in  any  way,  shape, 
or  form.  So—I’d  be  interested  in  discussing  the  work  of  our  office, 
which I think has been outstanding during my tenure. 

Senator  NELSON.  The  next  question  from  Senator  Grassley  is, 
‘‘Do  you  believe  an  Inspector  General  can  continue  to  serve  if  he 
has  acknowledged  verbally  abusing  staff  on  numerous  occasions?’’ 
Mr.  COBB.  Again,  I  think  that  the  premise  of  the  question  is— 
I  don’t  accept  the  premise  of  the  question.  There  hasn’t  been  ‘‘nu-
merous  occasions  of  berating  of  staff.’’  There  are  a  few  instances. 
Senator NELSON. So, all of the testimony brought forth in the In-

tegrity Committee’s report, do you dispute that? 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Mr. COBB. I believe, as my statement indicates, that the HUD In-
spector General’s recitation of facts reflects a—an attempt to obtain 
the  opinions  of  many  persons  who  did  not  like  the  accountability 
that  I  brought  to  the  NASA  Office  of  Inspector  General  with  re-
spect to the work of that office, and there was no effort by the HUD 
Office  of  Inspector  General  to  produce  a  balanced  report  regarding 
relevant evidence. 

Senator NELSON. Well, let’s forget then, what the Integrity Com-
mission  report  has  stated,  and  let  me  ask  you,  Did  you  use  pro-
fanity in front of your employees? 

Mr. COBB. Yes, I have. 
Senator NELSON. Did you use profanity in front of women? 
Mr. COBB. Yes, I have. 
Senator NELSON. The statements that were made by the previous 
witnesses,  are  those  true  with  regard  to  the  use  of  profanity  and 
the gestures that you had made? 

Mr.  COBB.  There  were  many  statements  made.  Certainly  as  re-
gards to the testimony of Debra Herzog, there was at least one in-
stance  where  I  used  profanity  in  her  presence  in  an  aggressive 
way, and I pounded the table. And I regret that. 

Senator NELSON. Do you consider that verbally abusing staff? 
Mr.  COBB.  I  think  that  the  characterization  that  that  was  ver-
bally abusive is a fair characterization with respect to that one in-
cident. 

Senator NELSON. But no other times. 
Mr.  COBB.  No,  I  didn’t  say  that.  I  believe  that  there  were  three 
or four other times, in the 5 years that I’ve been the Inspector Gen-
eral, where, when I believed that either the activity of a particular 
person  as  regards  me  was  disrespectful  or  was—and  I  don’t  use 
this in a legal sense—insubordinate, but, nonetheless, where a dis-
regard  for  a  determination  or  a  decision  that  I  had  made  was 
shown, and that occurred with Ms. Herzog. 

Senator NELSON. I want to remind you of your obligations under 
the  United  States  Code,  number  18  U.S.C.  1001,  to  answer,  truth-
fully,  the  questions  propounded  in  a  Congressional  hearing.  And 
what  we’re  trying  to  do  is  to  get  your  perspective  with  regard  to 
a series of allegations that are quite serious, and are extensive. 

So,  Senator  Grassley’s  concluding  statement  in  his  testimony, 
‘‘The honest answering of these questions should lead you to make 
a  decision  as  to  what  is  best  for  NASA  and  the  American  people.’’ 
And  so,  your  conclusion  is  that  you  should  stay  as  the  Inspector 
General? 

Mr. COBB. My conclusion is that I should stand up against an in-
vestigation  that  disregards  the  Constitution  and  due-process  con-
cepts  that  are  built  into  it.  And  I  believe  that  when  our  Govern-
ment  operates  in  a  way  that  is  abusive,  that  people  should  stand 
up against it. 

Senator  NELSON.  And,  in  your  opinion,  for  you  to  remain  as  In-
spector General, that’s in the best interest of NASA and the Amer-
ican people? 

Mr. COBB. Yes. 
Senator NELSON. Chairman Miller? 
Representative MILLER. Thank you. My vote has begun, but I do 

want to get in a few questions. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Mr.  Cobb,  the  Inspector  General  Act  provides  that,  or  the  pur-
pose  of  the  Act  is  to  provide  a  means  for  keeping  the  head  of  the 
establishment—in  this  case,  NASA—and  Congress  fully  and  cur-
rently  informed  about  problems  and  deficiencies.  And  I’m  sure 
you’re  familiar  with  the  Quality  Standards  for  Federal  Offices  of 
Inspector General, which says that, ‘‘Inspectors General report both 
to  the  head  of  the  respective  agencies  and  to  the  Congress.  This 
dual reporting responsibility is the framework within which Inspec-
tors  General  perform  their  functions.  Unique  in  government,  dual 
reporting  is  the  legislative  safety  net  that  protects  the  Inspector 
General’s independence and objectivity.’’ 

Do you agree with that requirement, that you report both to the 

head of the agency and to Congress? 

Mr. COBB. Yes, I do. 
Representative  MILLER.  OK.  Now,  Senator  Grassley’s  question 
was,  ‘‘Can  an  Inspector  General  serve  effectively  if  the  Inspector 
General  has  lost  the  confidence  of  Congress?’’  And  your  response, 
basically,  was  that  you  didn’t  think  you  had  lost  the  confidence  of 
Congress.  Without  regard  to  your  personal  circumstances,  can  an 
Inspector  General  serve  effectively  if  Congress  has  concluded  that 
they cannot rely upon that Inspector General’s work? 

Mr.  COBB.  The  Inspector  General  can  continue  to  do  the  work, 
and  there  has  been—and  let  me  make  absolutely  clear  that  there 
has been no suggestion that the work of our office—— 

Representative MILLER. Well—— 
Mr. COBB.—is anything other than first-class. 
Representative MILLER. I really thought that—— 
Mr. COBB. So—— 
Representative  MILLER.—that  question  could  have  been  an-

swered ‘‘yes’’ or ‘‘no.’’ 

Mr. COBB. We’ve—we put out a first-class work product, and—— 
Representative MILLER. So, your—— 
Mr.  COBB.—will  continue  to  do  so  until  such  time—we  will  just 
continue  to  do—we  have—there  is  no  problem  with  the  credibility 
of the work. And whether Congress chooses and elects to pick it up 
and  read  it  is  really  up  to  Congress.  We  will  keep  Congressional 
staff  informed  of  our  activities,  as  we  have  throughout  my  ten-
ure—— 

Representative  MILLER.  But  your  answer  is,  if  we’ve  lost  con-

fidence in you, it’s our fault, not yours. 

Mr.  COBB.  It’s  your  decision.  It’s  not—that’s  not  anyone’s  fault. 

It may—if it’s your decision—— 

Representative MILLER. But—— 
Mr. COBB.—there’s not much I can do about that. 
Representative MILLER.—in your—— 
Mr. COBB. I can just do my job. 
Representative  MILLER.  In  your  written  testimony,  you  ques-
tioned  whether  the  PCIE  report  and  their  recommendations  were 
within  the  authority  of  the  PCIE.  And,  again,  the  PCIE  is  com-
posed of all the Inspectors General, I believe. This particular report 
was reviewed by six Inspectors General as informed—as we’ve been 
informed by the Inspector General of HUD. Is that correct? 

Mr.  COBB.  It’s  close.  It’s  not  exactly  right.  There’s  an  Integrity 
Committee.  It  has  several  members,  three  of  whom  are  Inspectors 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

General.  There  are  three  other  members.  One  of  the  head  of  the 
Office  of  Government  Ethics,  the  head  of—the  Office  of  Special 
Counsel.  There’s—the  chair  is  the  FBI  chief  of  the  Criminal  Divi-
sion. And there are others, ex officio members, who sit in it—in on 
committee meetings. 

Representative MILLER. Mr. Cobb, 2 weeks ago the Subcommittee 
on  Investigations  and  Oversight  in  the  House,  Science  and  Tech-
nology Committee, had a hearing about this, all-hands—mandatory 
all-hands  meeting  of  the  Inspector  General’s  Office.  Two  witnesses 
from  the  agency,  the  chief  of  staff  and  the  current  counsel,  Mr. 
Wholley.  Mr.  Wholley  testified  that  the  chief  of  staff  handed  him 
a  stack  of  DVDs  and  said,  ‘‘These  DVDs  should  never  have  been 
made. You decide what to do with them,’’ or some words to that ef-
fect. And he decided that he would destroy them, because, if he did 
destroy them, we would probably ask for them. 

Now,  in  ordinary  circumstances—and  this  was  the  meeting 
where  Administrator  Griffin  talked  to  the  OIG  staff,  to  your  staff, 
about  the  finding  of  the  PCIE  committee  with  respect  to  your  con-
duct and the recommendations of the PCIE Committee, and why he 
was  not  adopting  those  recommendations,  but  doing  something 
much less. 

Now,  in  ordinary  circumstances,  some  kind  of  conduct  like  that, 
we  would  turn  to  the  Inspector  General,  and  ask  the  Inspector 
General to look into it. Can we ask you to look into that? 

Mr. COBB. Well, you certainly can ask. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  COBB.  And  whether  we  would  undertake  an  investigation,  I 
have  staff  reviewing  our  role  and  what  role  we  might  have  in  con-
nection with that particular activity. But, as you say, under normal 
circumstances—that was a very unusual meeting. Part of the prob-
lem  that  we  would  have,  from  my  perspective  in  connection  with 
conducting  an  investigation  in  that  case,  is  all  of  the  witnesses 
with  respect  to  what  occurred  during  that  session  are  Office  of  In-
spector General employees. Furthermore, there were several Office 
of Inspector General employees who were in possession of copies of 
the  activity,  and  volunteered  to  give  them  back,  in  fact,  knowing 
that  they  were  going  to  be  destroyed.  And  so,  there  are  a  number 
of issues associated with whether or not it would be appropriate for 
our office to be involved in an investigation of that activity. 

Representative MILLER. All right—— 
Mr. COBB. But, the matter is under review. 
Representative  MILLER.  Mr.  Cobb,  you  heard  me  read  aloud,  to 
the  previous  panel,  from  the  Quality  Standards  for  the  Offices  of 
Inspector  General,  the  provisions  on  personal  impairments  and  ex-
ternal  impairments.  You  said  that  you  thought  you  were  supposed 
to  maintain  a  close  relationship  with  the  Administrator  of  NASA 
and the leadership of NASA. This provides, ‘‘Personal impairments 
to  staff  members  result  from  relationships  and  beliefs  that  might 
cause  OIG  staff  to  limit  the  extent  of  an  inquiry,  limit  disclosure, 
or weaken or slant their work in any way.’’ 

The  testimony,  which  I  think—some  of  which  you  have  not  dis-
puted,  or  some  of  it  is  written,  and  is  beyond  dispute—is  that  it 
was  frequently  the  case  that  you  would  ask  in  advance  what  you 
wanted the management to have you look at; you would send them 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

findings  before  you  issued  them;  you  would  edit,  based  upon  their 
recommendations; and that you met Mr. O’Keefe and Mr. Pastorek 
weekly  for  lunch,  frequently  in  the  dining  room  of  NASA,  where 
every  employee  in  the  place  could  see  you  there  together;  you  met 
Mr.  O’Keefe  for  drinks  in  his  office;  you  played  golf  with  him,  on 
and on. You heard both Ms. Brian and Dr. Light say that that was 
a  flagrant  violation  of  the  requirement  that  an  Inspector  General 
avoid  personal  impairments  to  their  objectivity  and  independence. 
But you disagree with their conclusion. 

Mr. COBB. I don’t disagree with the conclusion or the tenor of the 
guidance  that’s  in  the  Quality  Standards.  I  don’t  accept  all  of  the 
premises of the question that you asked. 

And I would like to say that glaringly absent from all of the tes-
timony  that  occurred  earlier  today  is  the  fact  that  I  do  work  with 
my  senior  staff  in  an  extraordinarily  collaborative  way.  So,  for  ex-
ample,  when  I  was  asked  whether  I  could  go  play—whether  I 
would  be  playing  golf  with  Mr.  O’Keefe,  I  ran  that  by  the  27-year 
counsel  to  the  Office  of—counsel  to  the  Inspector  General,  and  I 
discussed  it  at  great  length  with  my  deputy,  Tom  Howard.  Tom 
Howard’s  name  hasn’t  been  mentioned.  He’s  been  with  our  office 
for five years—for four and a half years, or four and three-quarters 
years—a  33-year  veteran  of  the  Government—or  24  years  at  Gov-
ernment Accountability Office, five years at the DOT IG, intimately 
familiar  with  all  the  Yellow  Book  standards.  He’s  been  in  the  au-
diting business for, now, 33 years. There wasn’t a decision that was 
discussed  earlier  today  that  I  didn’t  have  Tom  Howard  closely  in-
volved in, in terms of analyzing the issues that were present. 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Cobb,  doesn’t  all  of  this  testimony  bother 
you?  Doesn’t  the  Integrity  Committee,  made  up  of  other  profes-
sional IGs, doesn’t this bother you? Doesn’t it give you some pause 
to think that you might not be right all the time? 

Mr. COBB. There are a couple of questions you’ve asked. I’m cer-
tainly not right all the time. I make mistakes routinely. And that’s 
why  I  have  a  very  collaborative  method  of  dealing  with  issues  in 
our office involving, as I just mentioned, Tom Howard, very closely, 
and other members of the senior staff. 

As  for  pause,  as  you  know,  Senator,  you  have  sought  investiga-
tion  of  me  for  more  than  2  years  now.  And  I’ve  been  under  inves-
tigation,  investigation  that’s  been  extraordinarily  costly,  involving 
more  than  a  dozen  HUD  OIG  investigators,  looking  through  all  of 
my e-mail, basically looking for anything that can be used to stain 
my reputation. So, yes, I have had substantial pause in connection 
with that activity. 

Senator  NELSON.  Since  you  raise  the  issue,  I  want  the  record  to 
reflect  that  one  of  the  roles  of  an  elected  official  is,  when  constitu-
ents  refer  complaints,  to  have  those  complaints  referred  to  the 
proper authorities. You just made a statement that I had made an 
investigation  on  you.  That’s  not  true.  The  Integrity  Commission, 
which  is  a  lawfully  constituted  body,  is  the  one  who  made  the  in-
vestigation.  The  complaints  that  this  office  and  other  members  of 
this  committee  have  received  have  been  referred  to  them,  and 
that’s what started this whole process. 

Mr.  COBB.  May  I  address  my  comment  and  your  response  to  it? 
Senator NELSON. Please. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

Mr.  COBB.  What  I  referred  to  was  a  May  12,  2005,  letter  from 
you to Administrator Griffin asking for an investigation of work of 
the  NASA  Office  of  Inspector  General  in  connection  with  a  pilot 
matter down at the Langley Research Center. 

Senator NELSON. That’s correct. 
Mr. COBB. And—— 
Senator NELSON. And that was—— 
Mr. COBB. And that’s what I was referring to. 
Senator  NELSON.  OK.  Those  were  the  first  complaints  that  we 
were  getting.  And  then,  as  the  complaints  continued  to  come  in, 
then  it  was  clear  that  there  was  a  legally  constituted  authority  in 
order to do the investigation. The investigation hasn’t been done by 
this committee. 

Mr. COBB. No, I understand that. 
Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Let  me  go  over  a  number  of  issues. 
And,  at  the  end  of  the  day,  I  think  what  we’re  trying  to  get  here 
is  what’s  good  for  NASA.  NASA  is  this  little  agency  that’s  on  the 
cutting  edge,  that’s  running  a  high-risk  operation,  and  they  cer-
tainly  don’t  need  any  side  distractions,  like  what’s  been  going  on. 
So, let’s further explore. 

On December 8, 2004, a team of your investigators, working with 
the FBI and an assistant U.S. Attorney, obtained a search warrant 
that was signed by a U.S. magistrate, Federal judge. The next day, 
the  investigation  team  assembled  at  the  Stennis  Space  Center  as 
they  prepared  to  serve  the  search  warrant  in  this  criminal  inves-
tigation.  That  morning,  you  ordered  your  investigators  not  to  pro-
ceed with the search warrant. 

Would you share, for the committees, why you did that? 
Mr. COBB. Yes, sir. And from—and, as a background, and just in 
terms  of  philosophy,  I  think  this  is  an  example  of  how  you’ll  find 
that  when  Allen  Li  of  the  Government  Accountability  Office  said, 
‘‘I’m  the  most  independent  Inspector  General  that  he’s  ever  seen,’’ 
this is an instance where I reflect that independence. 

I  reviewed  an  affidavit,  I  believe,  in  support  of  the  search  war-
rant,  which  had  been  signed.  Upon  my  review—read  it—it  was 
brought  to  me,  I  looked  at  it—I  couldn’t  understand  what  crime 
had  been  committed  with  respect  to  the  facts  that  were  alleged  to 
have  occurred,  and  I  asked  whether  and  what  the  crime  was  that 
was occurred, and I did not get an answer. Nobody knew. I did not 
think  that  the  facts  that  were  alleged  in  that  affidavit  constituted 
a crime. 

I had a discussion with Ms. Herzog about that. She, as she testi-
fied earlier, indicated that that’s, in effect, a matter for the defend-
ant  in  a  criminal  case  to  litigate  whether  or  not  service  of  the 
search warrant is appropriate. 

I  asked  for  the  counsel  to  the  IG  to  come  in  and  join  us  in  the 
conversation  that  we  were  having.  My  recollection  of  these  cir-
cumstances  was  that  the  counsel  came  in,  I  asked  him  if  he  had 
seen the search warrant, and he said, ‘‘Yes, I was wondering what 
the crime was that underpinned that search warrant.’’ 

So,  what—and  I’ll  go  back,  because  there  was  something  that  I 
considered  offensive.  When  I  asked  Ms.  Herzog  what  the  crime 
was,  she  asked—or  she  told  me  that  I  couldn’t  ask  that  question, 
that  to  ask  that  question  was  interfering  with  an  investigation,  or 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

the  service  of  a  search  warrant,  and  intimating  what  she  said 
today, that it was an obstruction of justice. 

I  had  a  question  as  to  whether  or  not  a  search  warrant,  which 
was going to be served on a citizen of the United States—happened 
to  be  at  a  NASA  center—whether  it  was  a  legal  and  valid  search 
warrant,  and  I  was  told  that  I  couldn’t  ask  the  question.  I,  again, 
had  my  counsel  give  me  his  opinion.  He  also  questioned  whether 
or  not  there  had  been—whether  there  was  a  suggestion  of  a  crime 
in connection with that activity. 

We  had  a  vigorous  debate  as  to  what  we  should  do  under  those 
circumstances.  The  result  of  that  debate  was  that  my  counsel, 
counsel to the IG, would personally communicate with the assistant 
United  States  attorney.  He  did,  and  was  told  that  the  assistant 
United States attorney was very comfortable with the service of the 
search warrant, and we did not take the matter any further. 

Senator  NELSON.  How  many  days  was  the  search  warrant  de-

layed? 

Mr. COBB. I don’t believe it was delayed one day. 
Senator  NELSON.  So,  in  this  situation,  even  though  it  had  been 
investigated by the FBI, with the judgment of an assistant U.S. At-
torney,  and  a  Federal  judge,  you  rendered  their  decision  wrong, 
and yours right, to delay the process. 

Mr.  COBB.  I  wouldn’t  say  that  I—said  that  my  view  was  right. 
I had a question as to what the crime was that was alleged to have 
occurred  in  connection  with  this  activity,  and—and  I  think  that 
the—my  recollection  was  that  the  answer  was  theft  of  proprietary 
information,  and  the  problem  was—from  my  standpoint,  was  that 
the  information  had  been  created  by  a  government  employee  on 
government time, and my limited knowledge of that particular area 
was  that  information  produced  by  a  government  employee  on  gov-
ernment time is not proprietary information, so, if someone took it 
and  used  it  for  another  purpose,  that  would  not  be  theft  of  propri-
etary  information.  So,  I  asked  the  question  of  whether  or  not  this 
constitutes  a  crime.  And  that’s  the  basis  for  this  notion  that  I  was 
somehow improperly interfering with an investigation. 

But,  I  must  say,  this  is  reflective  of  my  independent  attitude 
when  it  comes  to  asking  questions  that  I  think  are  appropriate 
under the circumstances. 

Senator NELSON. If that were the only time, that would be inno-
cent enough. But that is just one of a pattern, because the situation 
repeated itself on June 30, 2005, in a criminal investigation at the 
Marshall  Space  Flight  Center.  Your  agents,  along  with  the  agents 
of the FBI, were preparing to serve a search warrant that had been 
sworn  by  an  assistant  U.S.  Attorney  and  signed  by  a  magistrate 
judge.  And,  again,  you  halted  the  search  warrant,  moments  before 
it was to be served. Why did you do that? 

Mr.  COBB.  Well,  again,  I  don’t  necessarily  accept  the  premise— 
all  the  premises  of  the  question  that  you  pose.  But  I  also  admit 
that  my  recollection  of  exactly  what  occurred  with  respect  to  that 
particular  search  warrant,  and  whether  it  was  even  a  search  war-
rant at the time, or was it a contemplated search warrant—I’m not 
that  familiar.  I  do  remember  having  a  question,  and  the  funda-
mental  question  I  was—I  think  I  was  getting  into,  in  connection 
with  that  one,  was  whether  we  were  better  off  serving  a  search 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

warrant or going and gathering the evidence, which we would have 
been able to do at night without a search warrant. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  Mr.  Cobb,  see,  this  is  where  you  get  into 
trouble,  because  this  was  a  different  assistant  U.S.  Attorney  than 
the  one  in  the  Stennis  case,  it  was  a  different  Federal  judge  than 
the  Stennis  case,  and,  again,  you  inserted  your  opinion  instead  of 
an  assistant  U.S.  prosecutor,  the  FBI,  your  agents,  and  a  Federal 
judge.  And  that’s  where  you  start  to  get  into  trouble.  And  part  of 
the  execution  of  criminal  law  is  the  timeliness  of  the  search  war-
rants. Delay gives time for suspects to dispose of evidence. 

Now, how much of a delay was there in this particular time? 
Mr.  COBB.  I  don’t  recall,  but  I  assure  you  that  that’s  something 
that  we  would  have  discussed  at  great  length  at  the  time,  and  I 
do  not  believe  that  there  was  any  negative  impact  associated  with 
ensuring  whether  or  not  this  was  an  appropriate—an  appropriate 
use of NASA OIG resources in connection with this activity. 

Senator  NELSON.  There’s  where  you  get  yourself  in  trouble.  You 
are  interfering  with  the  judgment  of  the  criminal  law  system  of  a 
series of people who, by law, are charged with the responsibility of 
carrying  out  that  law.  And  if  there  is  a  delay  in  that  search  war-
rant, there is the distinct possibility of the loss of evidence. 

Now, in your testimony just a few minutes ago with regard to the 
Stennis  case,  you  said  the  search  warrant  wasn’t  delayed  more 
than  one  day.  I  want  to  call  your  attention  to  page  117  of  the  IC 
report.  It  says,  ‘‘Burnell  stated  Cobb  called  Haughton  and  allowed 
them to execute’’—this is on the Stennis case ‘‘to execute the search 
warrant  at  about  2  p.m.  on  December  9,  2004.  After  the  search, 
Burnell  recalled  discussing  with  Haughton  that  the  subjects  may 
have  been  alerted,  ‘the  subjects  of  the  search  warrant,’  may  have 
been  alerted  to  the  impending  search,  and  possibly  removed  the 
evidence being sought. The Radiance employees were not surprised 
when the warrant was executed. Burnell states that he believes the 
element of surprise was lost because of the delay.’’ 

People charged, in the criminal justice system, with carrying out 
the  law.  This  is  where  you’re  getting  yourself  in  trouble:  imposing 
your judgment for that of the legal authorities. 

Let  me  ask  you  about  the  Command  Destruct  System.  STS–111 
launched on June 5, 2002, and one of the two required range safety 
systems was malfunctioning. That’s the Command Destruct System 
which  can  destroy  the  solid  rocket  boosters  in  case  of  going  off 
track.  Your  office  did  an  investigation  into  that  incident.  Is  that 
correct? 

Mr.  COBB.  There  was  consideration  of  issues  by  Mr.  Carson  and 

another gentleman on our audit staff. 

Senator NELSON. I don’t understand your answer. 
Mr. COBB. We have—we’re divided, fundamentally, into two orga-
nizational—operational  organizational  elements:  investigation  and 
audit.  This  was  not  an  investigation  under  our  Office  of  Investiga-
tions. It was in our audit shop. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  let  me  continue.  It  was  determined  that 
an  Air  Force  general  went  through  back  channels  to  the  Kennedy 
Space Center center director, telling him that the range was green 
for  launch,  when  the  range  safety  officers  were  actually  reporting 
red,  which  means  that  both  systems  were  not  go  for  launch.  And 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

that’s  a  launch  criteria.  Did  your  office  complete  an  investigation 
in this incident? 

Mr. COBB. I don’t believe so. 
Senator NELSON. And why not? 
Mr.  COBB.  I  was  briefed  on  these  issues,  I  believe,  in  February 
of  2005,  along  with  my  deputy  and  other  senior  managers  in  the 
NASA  Office  of  Inspector  General.  You  must  realize  that  Mr.  Car-
son was, during the course of the time he worked in the NASA Of-
fice of Inspector General, three and four levels below me, down the 
chain of command. So, all of those people up the chain of command 
would have been present for the briefing. 

The fact was that, in this instance, the Air Force Office of Inspec-
tor  General  had,  two  and  a  half  years  previously,  already  consid-
ered  the  allegation  that  there  was  some  impropriety  associated 
with the conduct of the Air Force general, and had concluded, ‘‘that 
the  general’’—excuse  me—that  the  general,  ‘‘acted  within  his  au-
thority  for  range  and  public  safety  when  he  made  the  risk  assess-
ment and determined the range was a ‘go for launch.’ ’’ Since there 
was no violation, any further investigation into this incident is not 
warranted.’’  That  was  two  and  a  half  years  prior  to  the  time  that 
the matter was brought to my attention in a briefing. 

This was an Air Force general executing his authorities as an Air 

Force general, not on detail or assignment to NASA. 

It’s interesting, I think, that, when I was asked by the HUD Of-
fice  of  Inspector  General  about  this  same  incident,  in  the  end  of 
June of 2006, that Administrator Griffin had, in connection with a 
launch  just  prior  to  that  interview  down  at  the  Space  Center,  had 
overruled and bypassed the recommendation of his chief safety offi-
cer  and,  I  believe,  chief  engineer,  to  proceed  with  a  launch,  not-
withstanding  the  fact  that  they  indicated  that  there  was  a  no-go. 
So,  you  know,  people  make  command  decisions  and  are  respon-
sible and accountable for them. And, to me, dedication of resources 
to find out whether or not this particular general, who had retired 
two  and  three-quarters  years  earlier,  had  exercised  proper  author-
ity  in  a  matter  that  was  questionably  under  the  jurisdiction  of  the 
NASA Office of Inspector General, did not, in my opinion, but also 
that of my senior staff, warrant additional examination. 

Senator NELSON. So, you felt that the Air Force had investigated 

this, and it was a matter that was taken care of. 

Mr. COBB. Yes, as regards the actions of the general. There were 
other issues that were legitimate issues, that were relevant to this, 
that  were  being  considered.  And  that  was  the  communication  be-
tween the range and NASA officials, and to what extent those com-
munications  were  acting  in  a  way  that  kept  people  informed  of 
what they needed to be informed of. And there was a red team that 
had been—and, quite possibly, as a result of the inquiries that Mr. 
Carson and his colleague were making—there was a red team that 
had been established by the Air Force, a joint NASA/Air Force red 
team, to consider the issues. They made recommendations, they es-
tablished  new  procedures,  and  the—the  issue  that  was  most  con-
cerning  about  communication  between  the  Air  Force  and  NASA  as 
concerned  the  range,  the  safety  of  the  range,  the  safety  of  the  as-
tronauts, that those issues were addressed. And we examined that, 
and we believe that they were addressed. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

Senator  NELSON.  And  you  did  an  investigation  on  that,  on  the 

Mr.  COBB.  We  conducted  audit  activities  in  connection  with  that 

issue of communication? 

communication, yes. 

Senator NELSON. If that were to occur again, what would you do? 
Mr. COBB. If what was to occur again? 
Senator  NELSON.  Same  thing.  That  they  launch,  and  both  of 

them aren’t activated. 

Mr. COBB. Well, one thing that I would do, that I don’t know that 
the  HUD  Office  of  Inspector  General  did—in  fact,  I  don’t  believe 
that they did—is, I would consult with those people who were inti-
mately  familiar  with  the  range  safety  issues,  and  to  the  Integrity 
Committee  and  the  HUD  Office  of  Inspector  General.  I  made—I 
made  a  fairly  significant  list  of  people  who  would  be  familiar  with 
those issues, and I don’t believe any of them were spoken to in con-
nection with these activities. 

Senator  NELSON.  Let  me  tell  you  what  the  difference  is  between 
you drawing a parallel with Dr. Griffin making decision to launch. 
In  the  one  case  here,  we  have  an  Air  Force  general  overriding  his 
Air Force officer who has said that they are red for launch, and the 
Air  Force  general  says  they  are  go,  or  green  for  launch,  and  then 
using  back  channels  to  the  KSC  center  director.  That,  by  the  way, 
was  reminiscent  of  all  of  the  misinformation  in  the  loss  of  Chal-
lenger back in 1986. That’s one set of circumstances. 

That  is  not  parallel  to  the  set  of  circumstances  with  which  you 
just  accused  Dr.  Griffin,  where  there  is  a  flight  readiness  review 
with all the people present, all discussing their issues being on the 
table  in  front  of  everyone,  and  with  the  Administrator  making  the 
final decision in front of everybody, and then going back to the two 
that  said  no-go,  and  getting  their  approval  to  go.  It’s  a  totally  dif-
ferent  situation.  One’s  secretive  and  back  channels,  the  other  is  a 
recognized  procedure  in  the  launch  operations,  and  is  completely 
out  in  the  open  among  all  of  the  flight  readiness  team.  Huge  dif-
ference. 

Let’s put up that chart again on the work product. Why don’t you 
just  give  us  some  comments  about  that,  in  how  you  compare  to 
your  two  predecessors.  This  is  the  work  product  of  your  shop,  the 
IG’s shop. 

Mr. COBB. Well, I can see the graph from here, and, for purposes 

of discussion—— 

Senator NELSON. Give him a copy of that, please. 
Mr.  COBB.—for  purposes  of  discussion,  let’s  assume  that  it’s  an 

accurate reflection of audit productivity. 

Thank you. 
To  me—and  maybe  I  could  be  criticized  for  this—the  number  of 
audits our office publishes is, to me, not necessarily the—is not my 
indicia  of  whether  or  not  we’re  successfully  carrying  out  our  mis-
sion.  And,  in  fact,  I’d  say,  when  I  joined  as  Inspector  General  at 
NASA,  the  metric  that  was  utilized  for  analyzing  whether  or  not 
our  office  was  effectively  carrying  out  its  mission  was  the  number 
of recommendations it was making. 

As  a  point  of  fact,  I  didn’t  think  that  that  was  an  appropriate 
metric for our activities. And, furthermore, to me, the quality of the 
work was much more important. And, in that respect, there might, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

especially if you look at the chart, see that there were a substantial 
number  of  audits  that  were  generated  three-quarters  of  the  way 
through  Roberta  Gross’s  tenure.  Interestingly,  there  was  a  signifi-
cant downward slope toward the end. 

But, in any event, the Office of Inspector General was generating 
many,  many  recommendations  which  were  being  accepted  by  the 
agency,  and  then  not  implemented.  And  to  the—it  became  such  a 
problem that the Internal Control Council at NASA identified it as 
an  internal  control  weakness  of  the  agency,  that  it  had  approxi-
mately 500 outstanding audit recommendations that it was not im-
plementing.  Office  of  Inspector  General  was  issuing  recommenda-
tions. Agency wasn’t implementing them. That was a problem. 

And  I  think  that  that  problem  was  caused  by  many  things,  and 
I don’t know that you want me to go into great detail on that. But 
part  of  it  was  the  quality  of  the  recommendations  and  whether  or 
not they were implementable, from the standpoint of doing right by 
NASA. 

So,  from  my  perspective,  when  I  became  the  Inspector  General, 
first  thing  that  I  did  was,  I  wanted—and  I  recognized  that  I  did 
not  have  a  substantial  background  in  audit  activities,  so  I  hired  a 
deputy who had, at that time, 28 years of audit experience, to help 
me  in  managing  the  audit  activity  of  the  office.  And  what  we 
worked very hard to do was to make sure that our audit work was, 
as Mr. Carson indicated earlier—well, that our work was top notch. 
Senator  NELSON.  But  you  would  acknowledge  that,  on  the  num-
ber  of  audit  reports,  that  your  high  of  19  is  less  than  the  average 
of the previous two IGs. 

Mr.  COBB.  I  acknowledge  that  the  numbers  here  are  less  than 

what occurred under Bill Colvin and Roberta Gross. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  let’s  talk  about  safety-related  audits.  In 
the  past  6  months,  the  only  safety-related  audit  product  was  not 
a  report,  but  it  was  a  memorandum  on  stair  access  trucks  used  at 
the Dryden Research Center. Is that correct? 

Mr.  COBB.  I’m  not  sure  exactly  which  audits  that  we’ve  pub-
lished.  We’ve  published  some  significant  audits  in  safety  in  the 
last—in  the  last—in  the  recent  period.  Space  Shuttle  program— 
problem  reporting  corrective  action  process  at  Kennedy  Center— 
Space Center—needs improvement. That was one. But—— 

Senator NELSON. OK. I’m reading from Appendix B of the Office 
of the Inspector General’s Semi-Annual Report, October 1, 2006, to 
March  31,  2007.  I  think  this  is  your  report.  ‘‘During  the  period 
April 1 through September 30, the Office of Audits issued 19 prod-
ucts.’’ And then, in the audit area of safety, there is a final memo-
randum on the review of the access stair trucks located at the Dry-
den Flight Research Center. And that’s the only thing under audit 
safety. 

Mr.  COBB.  We  have  many  ongoing  projects  that  are  safety-re-
lated.  You  know,  the  idea  that—you  know,  again,  I’d  say  that  the 
HUD  Inspector  General’s  report,  as  regards  any  safety-related 
issue,  is  remarkably  deficient  insofar  as  I  identified  a  substantial 
number of people with safety expertise at NASA as people who po-
tentially should be considered as witnesses, and the HUD Office of 
Inspector General did not interview a single one of them. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  it’s  a  high-risk  little  agency  where  safety 
is  absolutely  key.  This  is  one  of  the  reasons  you’ve  got  to  have  an 
independent  IG.  You’ve  got  to  have  an  IG  that’s  looking  for  those 
safety problems, other than access stair trucks at Dryden. 

Mr. COBB. Senator, under my leadership, the NASA Office of In-
spector  General  hired  technical  staff,  safety  experts.  We’ve  got 
somebody  at  the  MMT  meeting,  going  on  today,  regarding  activi-
ties,  keeping  us  apprised  of  issues  that  relate  to  Shuttle  launch 
safety. We’ve got people now in the NASA Office of Inspector Gen-
eral  who  are  engineering  and  technical  experts,  aerospace  tech-
nologists, safety folks, that we didn’t have when I started as NASA 
Inspector  General.  And  it’s  because  of  my  concern  that  we  have 
competent,  independent  ability  to  ascertain  what  are  real  safety 
issues  that  we  need  to  address,  that  we  now  have  those  people. 
There  is  no  limit  on  the  amount  of  attention,  dedication  of  re-
sources that my office has given to safety. 

And on the investigation side, I’d say that, recently—and I think 
that  you’ll  see,  in  that  semi-annual  report—many  of  our  criminal 
prosecutions  are  parts-  and  test-fraud  related.  We  had  a  case  re-
cently involving the falsification of test data for spacesuit batteries. 
We  had  another  case  where  several  people  went  to  jail,  on  signifi-
cant  prison  sentences  in  addition  to  substantial  fines,  associated 
with  making  false  statements  relating  to—and  altered  test  results 
of  metal  materials  received—relating  to  the  Space  Shuttle  wings. 
And I would just say that there’s been no lack of dedication to safe-
ty-related issues at NASA under my leadership. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  I’m  only  looking  at  your  report,  and,  of 
course,  the  question  is  begged,  respectfully,  audit  area,  financial 
management,  you  have  four;  audit  area,  procurement,  you  have 
two; audit area, space operations and explanation, one; audit area, 
other,  one;  audit  area,  quality  control  reviews,  a  couple;  but  under 
audit  area,  safety,  the  access  stair  trucks.  So,  I  just  simply  point 
out from your own report, someone like me, in this committee, has 
got to raise these things, because safety is absolute. We can’t afford 
the  loss  of  another  Shuttle,  because  you  know  what  happens  if 
that’s the case. 

Let  me  ask  you  about  another  issue  that  I  stated  in  my  opening 
comments.  This  one  really  concerns  me.  This  is  the  theft  of  a  $1.9 
billion  set  of  rocket  plans.  And  it  was  never  reported.  And  who 
knows  who  has  that.  It’s  allegation  number  28,  the  theft  of  the 
ITAR-sensitive data from a computer at the Marshall Space Flight 
Center.  The  data  involved  was  detailed  design  information  on  the 
Shuttle main engines, which are the most technologically advanced 
in  the  world,  as  well  as  design  information  for  NASA’s  new  ad-
vanced engine. The intellectual-property value of that is almost $2 
billion.  And  the  investigation  into  that  incident  ultimately  deter-
mined that the data was downloaded by a hacker in South America 
or  France,  and,  for  a  period  of  time,  posted  on  the  Internet  where 
anybody could have gotten it. Anyone and everyone could have got-
ten it. And Lord knows who got it. And there are some folks, I can 
tell  you,  sitting  in  my  capacity  as  the  chairman  of  the  Strategic 
Systems Subcommittee of the Armed Services Committee, there are 
sure  folks  on  Planet  Earth  that  we  don’t  want  to  have  these  kind 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

of rocket designs that are very advanced. Namely, folks like North 
Korea and Iran. 

Now,  4  years  after  the  incident,  the  Department  of  Defense  was 
finally  asked  to  evaluate  the  national  security  implication  of  the 
compromised  data.  The  request  didn’t  come  from  your  office,  but 
from  the  HUD  investigators  who  were  investigating  your  conduct. 
And the Pentagon’s conclusions are shown in Senate Exhibit 3. 

Do  you  recall,  anytime  during  2002  or  2003,  a  member  of  your 
staff recommending that this incident be reported to the State De-
partment, as is required under law? 

Mr. COBB. Well, first, I don’t accept your premise that this is re-

quired under law. 

Senator  NELSON.  The  gravity  of  this  situation,  you  don’t  think, 
requires  the  reporting  of  this  to  the  United  States  State  Depart-
ment. 

Mr.  COBB.  I  don’t—the  premise  is—of  your  question  was  that 
there’s  a  requirement  under  law  to  report  this  to  the  Department 
of State. 

Senator NELSON. Well, you—— 
Mr. COBB. I have—— 
Senator NELSON.—you may—— 
Mr. COBB.—to this day—— 
Senator  NELSON.—dispute  it  on  the  law.  What  is  your  opinion? 

Do you think it should have been reported to another agency? 

Mr.  COBB.  Our  office,  as  soon  as  we  were  informed  of  this  activ-
ity,  we  worked  in  concert  with  the  Defense  Criminal  Investigative 
Service,  the  FBI;  the  NIPC,  the  National  Infrastructure  Protection 
Center,  was  aware  of  it;  we  worked  with  international  authorities. 
There  was  no  act  that  our  office  did  not  take,  that  it  should  have, 
in connection with this activity. There was no serious discussion in 
our  office,  or  presented  to  me,  regarding  a  reporting  requirement 
to  the  State  Department.  And,  in  fact,  to  this  day,  nobody  has 
brought  any  specific  indication  of  agency  requirements  to  report 
this information. 

But I do understand that, in August 2002, there was a conversa-
tion  between  the  director  of  the  Export  Control  Office  at  NASA 
with the Department of State, who indicated that voluntary disclo-
sure under the ITAR was not required. 

Senator NELSON. So, that’s your position. 
Mr. COBB. That’s my position. 
Senator NELSON. All right. A senior member of your staff reports 
that  you  worked  with  NASA  to  have  the  data  classified  so  that  its 
loss wouldn’t be publicly disclosed. Is that true? 

Mr.  COBB.  I  don’t  believe  that  that  is  the  case.  I  believe  that 
there  might  have  been  the  discussion,  back  at  the  time,  as  to 
whether  or  not,  for  example,  the  kind  of  conversation  that  we’re 
having  here  today  is  something  that  should  be  made  public,  when 
there  are  national  security  concerns—Is  it  national  security  infor-
mation?—and  a  question  about  classification  often  rises  and  is 
dealt with, as every other issue is, intelligently, and disposed of. 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  it’s  your  position  that  you  weren’t  required 
to  report  this  to  the  State  Department.  You’ve  stated  that.  Can’t 
you see? You’re getting into trouble with judgment here. Something 
of  enormous  defense  importance  to  the  United  States,  and  you’re 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

not sharing it with another agency whose responsibility it is to pro-
tect the secrets of the United States. Can’t you see where all of this 
controversy has stirred up, and the chain of these things? 

Mr.  COBB.  Again,  our  office  took  every  action  that  was  appro-
priate  under  the  circumstances.  The  National  Infrastructure  Pro-
tection Center—under Presidential Decision Directive 63, the NIPC 
was  the  interagency  operation  located  at  the  FBI.  It  was  created 
in 1998. It was the focal point for the Government’s efforts to warn 
of,  and  respond  to,  cyber  attacks,  and  served  as  the  national  crit-
ical  infrastructure,  threat  assessment,  warning,  vulnerability,  and 
law  enforcement  investigation,  and  response  entity.  To  my  knowl-
edge,  they  knew  about  it.  The  FBI  knew  about  it.  The  DCIS  were 
aware  of  it.  International  authorities—appropriate  international 
authorities  were  aware  of  it.  You  know,  and  so,  there  was  no—no 
limitation  placed  on  any  member  of  my  staff,  in  terms  of  commu-
nication to any person about—and these communications were tak-
ing  place  not  at  my  direction,  but  as  a  matter  of  normal  course  in 
the exercise of duties of staff members in our office. 

Senator NELSON. Chairman Miller? 
Representative MILLER. Thank you. I just have a few more ques-

tions. 

Mr.  Cobb,  the  finding  of  the  PCIE  was  based  predominantly  on 
testimony and evidence given by employees of your office. And you 
have  said  that  you  are  now  reluctant  to  talk  to  your  employees, 
that  they  twist  your  words,  you  think  that  they  said  unfavorable 
things about you because you came in and found an office that did 
not  meet  your  standards,  and  you  whipped  them  into  shape,  and 
you  insisted  that  they  improve,  and  that  was  why  they  resented 
you.  You  know,  you  do  sound  somewhat  like  Humphrey  Bogart  in 
The Caine Mutiny, when you describe your staff. 

But  I  have  not  heard  an  explanation  for  why  you  think  your 
peers—why other Inspectors General have been so critical. In your 
testimony, there is a tone of grievance, and—with having given 11 
hours  of  testimony,  although,  in  hearing  your  testimony  today,  I 
think  it  might  have  been  shorter  if  yes-or-no  answers—questions 
that  contemplated  a  yes-or-no  answer  had  gotten  a  yes-or-no  an-
swer. You obviously think you were treated unfairly. And it was an 
investigation  conducted  by  the  Inspector  General  of  HUD,  your 
peer.  It  was  reviewed  by  other  peers,  other  Inspectors  General. 
Why do you think they treated you so badly? I cannot figure a mo-
tive for their treatment of you, if it is as bad as you believe is. 

Mr.  COBB.  I  can  only  say  you  request  speculation  on  my  part.  I 
think  that  all  I  can  say  is,  as  regards  the  investigation,  I’ve  gone 
to  great  lengths  in  my  statement  and  my  attachment,  Exhibit  B, 
to  reflect  the  falsities  that  are  reflected  in  the  Integrity  Commit-
tee’s  report.  And,  you  know,  I  think  that  you  need  to  direct  that 
question to them, on why they would conduct an investigation that 
would result in such falsities being published. 

I would go further, to say that you will find no work of the NASA 
Office of Inspector General that has those types of false statements 
included  in  it,  in  terms  of  the  important  work  that  we  do,  both  on 
the investigation side and on the audit side, but particularly as re-
gards  administrative  investigations  of  NASA  employees  or  the  ad-
dressing of whistleblower complaints of which we’ve received many. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

We  go  to  great  lengths  to  get  our  work  right,  and  I  can’t  say  the 
same for what is reflected in the HUD OIG/Integrity Committee re-
port. 

There’s  this  notion  that  the  NASA  Office  of  Inspector  General 
was  the  land  of  milk  and  honey  until  Inspector  General  Robert 
Cobb  arrived.  And  let  me  suggest  that,  in  this  very  difficult  busi-
ness, that IGs straddle barbed-wire fences that we heard about ear-
lier, which doesn’t sound particularly comfortable, but may be apro-
pos—Bill  Colvin  who  was  an  Inspector  General  at  NASA,  was 
forced out as a result of allegations made by staff. Roberta Gross— 
and this is—I’m not making any statement about Roberta Gross or 
Bill  Colvin  and  their  competency  or  ability  to  do  the  job,  I’m  just 
saying—giving a little bit of insight into the NASA Office of Inspec-
tor General. Recently, there was a document from an—a year 2000 
EEO case, which was 2 years before I came, and a footnote in that 
document—it’s  important  to  know  that  the  complainant  sought  a 
class-action alleging that OIG employees over 40 years of age were 
being  systematically  discriminated  against.  The  EEO  counselor’s 
report  included  statements  from  nine  OIG  employees  who  com-
plained  of  discriminatory  nonselections,  and  identified  an  addi-
tional  13  OIG  employees  who  were  interested  in  speaking  with  an 
EEO  counselor  regarding  alleged  discriminatory  nonselections. 
That’s  22  NASA  OIG  employees  in  the  year  2000  concerned  about 
discriminatory nonselections. 

And  I  don’t  suggest—present  that  for  the  truth  of  the  matter, 
only  that—again,  that—and  Roberta  Gross  had  Integrity  Com-
mittee complaints filed against her, as well. This is part of the ter-
ritory with respect to being an Inspector General. 

What  I  stand  for,  whether  you’re  talking  about  search  warrants 
or  you’re  talking  about  the  work  of  the  NASA  Office  of  Inspector 
General,  is  that  we  get  the  work  right  based  on  the  law  and  the 
facts. And there has not been any—and I credit, not myself, but the 
NASA  OIG  staff,  for  getting  the  work  right—there  has  not  been 
any  suggestion  that  any  work  that  we—that  we’ve  worked  on,  we 
didn’t get right. 

Senator  NELSON.  OK.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  your  indulgence. 
I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  time.  It’s  with  a  heavy  heart  that  we 
leave this hearing, after 24 complaints, 79 allegations, a number of 
career  law  enforcement  officials  at  HUD  Office  of  Inspector  Gen-
eral, and seven members of the Integrity Committee, and you have 
asserted  that  those  people  are  all  wrong  and  that  you’re  all  right. 
And  so,  I  go  back  to  the  question  that  Senator  Grassley  asked 
us  to  propound,  ‘‘What  are  the  honest  answers  to  the  questions 
that  lead  us  to  a  decision  about  what’s  in  the  best  interest  of 
NASA,  America’s  space  program,  and  the  American  people?’’  And 
that’s a judgment that you’re going to have to live with. 

The meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 5:31 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CHUCK GRASSLEY, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM IOWA 

Good  afternoon.  I  would  like  to  begin  by  thanking  Senator  Nelson  and  Congress-
man  Miller  for  calling  this  important  joint  hearing  concerning  the  investigation  of 
the  NASA  Inspector  General  by  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency 
(PCIE). I regret that I am unable to attend your hearing in person but would appre-
ciate having this statement placed into the record. 

I  have  been  a  long-time  advocate  of  government  oversight.  I  am  also  not  a  new-
comer to overseeing the overseers. For example, I conducted inquiries into the oper-
ation  of  the  Offices  of  the  Inspector  General  at  the  Department  of  Health  and 
Human Services and the Postal Service. 

As  Ranking  Member  of  the  Committee  on  Finance,  I  consider  government  over-
sight  to  be  a  critical  role  of  Congress.  This  role  is  especially  crucial  when  it  relates 
to an office such as the NASA Inspector General, an office which plays an important 
role  in  protecting  lives,  guaranteeing  the  integrity  of  vital  government  assets,  and 
defending  a  budget  of  over  $13  billion  against  waste,  fraud,  and  abuse.  The  dedi-
cated  staff  of  the  NASA  Inspector  General  office  is  one  of  the  last  lines  of  defense 
for  the  NASA  mission,  and  I  applaud  the  work  of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Com-
merce,  Science,  and  Transportation,  as  well  as  House  Committee  on  Science  and 
Technology, for their oversight work on this important matter. 

Over  a  period  of  14  months,  the  PCIE’s  Integrity  Committee  received  eighteen 
complaints against NASA Inspector General Robert ‘‘Moose’’ Cobb. Then, in January 
2006,  the  Integrity  Committee  referred  the  matter  to  the  Office  of  the  Inspector 
General  in  the  Department  of  Housing  and  Urban  Development  (HUD).  I  also  had 
a  member  of  the  HUD  OIG’s  staff  visit  the  Finance  Committee  staff  to  identify  a 
number of concerns regarding the operation of the NASA OIG office. 

The  HUD  OIG  office  conducted  an  extensive,  independent  investigation  into  the 
complaints  lodged  against  Mr.  Cobb,  including  79  separate  allegations.  During  the 
six-month  investigation,  staff  in  the  HUD  Inspector  General  office  reviewed  26,259 
e-mails, conducted 121 interviews, and cataloged 199 exhibits relating to the allega-
tions. They interviewed 50 NASA employees and former employees. In all, the HUD 
investigators  prepared  a  289-page  report  substantiating  allegations  that  Mr.  Cobb 
abused his authority as Inspector General, and that he had created at least the ap-
pearance  of  a  lack  of  independence  between  the  Office  of  Inspector  General  and 
NASA management. 

Created by the Inspector General Act of 1978, IG offices were intended to impar-
tially  investigate  and  audit  programs  and  operations  within  their  respective  agen-
cies to promote efficiency, and prevent waste, fraud, and abuse. 

I’m  alarmed  by  the  evidence  uncovered  by  the  PCIE  investigation.  In  fact,  it  ap-
pears  that  Mr.  Cobb  did  not  act  in  a  manner  consistent  with  the  spirit  and  intent 
of  that  statute.  According  to  the  evidence,  he  has  used  this  important  position  to 
interfere  in  the  activities  conducted  by  the  investigative  and  audit  divisions  within 
his office for reasons that appear, at the very least, improper. In fact, Mr. Cobb re-
peatedly told employees that one of his priorities was to avoid embarrassing NASA. 
Evidence  also  indicates  that  he  shied  away  from  bringing  investigations  against 
high-ranking NASA officials. 

From the evidence presented to me, Mr. Cobb hasn’t simply tried to micromanage 
the  activities  of  NASA  IG  staff;  he  has  used  the  power  of  his  office  to  insulate  the 
agency from critical investigations and audits. 

One  such  investigation  concerned  the  theft  of  approximately  $1.9  billion-worth  of 
International  Traffic  in  Arms  Regulations  data.  This  information,  controlled  by 
NASA, was illegally accessed by hackers and transmitted to locations in France. Ac-
cording to the PCIE investigation, Mr. Cobb dismissed worries over the theft of this 
data because, in his view, the data wasn’t ‘‘stolen,’’ since NASA was still technically 
in possession of the accessed information. That kind of thinking doesn’t make sense 
to this Senator. That sort of hair-splitting suggests that Mr. Cobb would rather walk 

(77) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

a mile to avoid embarrassing NASA than walk across the street to let the American 
people know what really happened. 

In  another  instance  substantiated  by  the  PCIE  report,  Cobb  interfered  with  law 
enforcement  activities  initiated  by  his  office.  Specifically,  he  questioned  the  suffi-
ciency  of  a  search  warrant  sought  by  the  Department  of  Justice  and  issued  by  a 
Federal  magistrate.  In  fact,  Mr.  Cobb  went  so  far  as  to  say  that  the  Federal  judge 
had  been  ‘‘duped’’  into  signing  the  warrant.  Although  the  search  eventually  took 
place, Mr. Cobb’s interference caused the search to be delayed by more than a week 
in  a  matter  that  is  characterized  as  ‘‘very  time  sensitive.’’  It  also  may  have  given 
the  targets  of  the  search  a  chance  to  receive  advanced  warning,  which  could  create 
the opportunity to destroy evidence before it is seized. 

Another  troubling  allegation  substantiated  by  the  PCIE  investigation  concerned 
Mr.  Cobb’s  discussion  of  potential  audits  and  investigative  findings  with  former 
NASA  Administrator  Sean  O’Keefe  and  former  NASA  General  Counsel  Paul 
Pastorek. This included e-mail warnings on upcoming investigations. Mr. Cobb also 
sought the advice of NASA management about the timing and issuance of OIG find-
ings.  Those  simply  are  not  the  sort  of  communications  an  independent  inspector 
general ought to be having with officials at the agency he oversees. 

Time  and  time  again,  it  appears  that  Mr.  Cobb  sought  to  protect  himself  and 
NASA’s management at the expense of maintaining the integrity of the NASA Office 
of the Inspector General. 

The  allegations  against  Mr.  Cobb  and  the  subsequent  findings  of  the  Integrity 
Committee  all  point  to  deep  and  systemic  problems  with  Inspector  General  Cobb 
and how he managed his office. These problems in turn call into question his ability 
to investigate allegations no matter where they lead, whom they implicate, or what 
they  uncover.  Whether  it  embarrasses  NASA  or  not,  the  Inspector  General  needs 
to do his job. Moreover, the deference demonstrated by Mr. Cobb to NASA manage-
ment raises questions about how he views his own duties to be ethical, independent, 
and to serve with integrity. 

To paraphrase a quote attributed to Abraham Lincoln, if you want to test a man’s 
character, give him power. By this test, Inspector General Cobb has not fared well. 
The evidence against Mr. Cobb goes beyond the appearance of a lack of independ-
ence between the Office of Inspector General and NASA management. The PCIE in-
vestigation  also  substantiated  allegations  that  Mr.  Cobb  abused  Inspector  General 
staff members, creating an atmosphere of hostility and fear. According to the PCIE 
report,  Mr.  Cobb  abused  his  staff  with  vile  and  degrading  language.  As  a  result  of 
his  management  style,  the  bulk  of  his  experienced  audit  staff  left  the  administra-
tion. By his own admission he cannot, and will not, communicate with a significant 
portion of his staff because he does not trust them and they do not trust him. Near-
ly  a  quarter  of  the  staff  was  interviewed  in  the  independent  investigation,  and  all 
of  them  had  negative  things  to  say  about  Mr.  Cobb.  In  fact,  his  management  style 
has  proven  so  abrasive  that  the  NASA  Administrator  hired  an  ‘‘executive  coach’’  to 
help  Mr.  Cobb  learn  how  to  better  manage  his  staff,  and  has  had  to  send  him  to 
a management ‘‘charm’’ school. 

Additional concerns have also come to light regarding the process followed by the 
President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  that  I  am  compelled  to  address. 
NASA  management  was  provided  with  a  completely  unredacted  copy  of  the  PCIE 
report.  This  copy  identified  NASA  employees  by  name.  Specifically,  it  identified  to 
NASA  management  those  employees  who  cooperated  with  the  PCIE  investigation; 
who bravely spoke out about Mr. Cobb and other problems plaguing NASA. This ef-
fectively  painted  a  target  on  the  backs  of  NASA  employees  who  provided  informa-
tion to PCIE investigators and to Congress. This is unconscionable. If we don’t give 
a  certain  amount  of  protection  to  whistleblowers,  if  we  can’t  ensure  anonymity  to 
those  who  speak  with  investigators  about  government  wrongdoing,  how  can  we  ex-
pect  anyone  to  cooperate  with  these  investigations  in  the  future?  For  this  reason, 
I  am  requesting  the  Government  Accountability  Office  to  review  the  President’s 
Council on Integrity and Efficiency and its procedures and operations. 

It is clear to me that our ability to trust Mr. Cobb to effectively manage the Office 
of Inspector General and the vital functions that it seeks to carry out is in question. 
It seems that Mr. Cobb may care more about protecting NASA from embarrassment 
than he does about performing the critical functions of his office. An Inspector Gen-
eral  must  possess  temperance,  high  ethical  standards,  and  a  firm  understanding  of 
the  independent  nature  of  that  office.  From  the  evidence  presented,  Mr.  Cobb  does 
not appear to possess these attributes. 

So,  in  conclusion,  I  have  some  questions  that  I  would  like  to  pose  to  Mr.  Cobb. 
In  answering  them,  I  hope  he  honestly  places  the  mission  of  his  office  ahead  of  his 
self-interest.  Mr.  Cobb,  do  you  believe  that  an  Inspector  General  can  continue  to 
serve  if  he  has  lost  the  confidence  of  his  staff  and  of  Congress?  Do  you  believe  an 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

inspector  general  can  continue  to  serve  who  has  been  found  by  an  independent  in-
vestigation  to  have  abused  his  authority?  Do  you  believe  an  inspector  general  can 
continue  to  serve  if  he  is  perceived  as  in  the  pockets  of  the  people  he  is  supposed 
to  investigate?  Do  you  believe  an  inspector  general  can  continue  to  serve  if  he  has 
acknowledged  verbally  abusing  staff  on  numerous  occasions?  These  would  be  my 
questions to Mr. Cobb. The honest answering of those questions should lead him to 
make  a  decision  as  to  what  is  best  for  NASA  and  the  American  people.  Thank  you 
again for this opportunity. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KENNETH M. DONOHUE, INSPECTOR GENERAL, 

DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT 

Mr.  Chairmen  and  Ranking  Members,  and  Members  of  the  Committees,  I  am 
Kenneth Donohue, Inspector General of the Department of Housing and Urban De-
velopment  (HUD  OIG)  having  been  confirmed  to  this  position  on  March  25,  2002. 
Prior to becoming Inspector General, I spent twenty-one years in the United States 
Secret  Service.  After  my  retirement  from  that  organization,  I  spent  7  years  at  the 
Resolution  Trust  Corporation  as  Assistant  Director  for  Investigations,  uncovering 
fraud and abuse among directors of failed savings and loans institutions. 

The HUD OIG is one the original twelve Inspectors General authorized under the 
Inspector General Act of 1978. We are committed to our statutory mission of deter-
ring and preventing fraud, waste and abuse and promoting the effectiveness and ef-
ficiency of government operations. While organizationally located within the Depart-
ment,  the  OIG  operates  independently  with  separate  budget  authority.  This  inde-
pendence  allows  for  clear  and  objective  reporting  to  the  Secretary  and  to  the  Con-
gress. 

The HUD OIG conducts oversight on a Department that receives over $30 billion 
in annual appropriation for a myriad of programs including community development 
block  grants,  public  housing,  homeless  and  lead  abatement,  and  nursing  home  and 
hospital  mortgage  insurance  coverage.  In  addition  to  these  areas,  HUD  also  man-
ages the Federal Housing Administration (FHA), a program that is the largest mort-
gage  insurer  in  the  world,  providing  coverage  to  over  34  million  home  mortgages 
and 47,000 multifamily projects since 1934. In the last fiscal year, FHA had an out-
standing 
insurance  portfolio  of  about  $395  billion.  HUD  also  manages 
securitizations worth billions of dollars in the Ginnie Mae program as well as main-
tains  oversight  of  the  regulatory  agency  that  oversees  the  Fannie  Mae  and  Freddie 
Mac  programs.  As  you  can  see,  we  have  a  busy  portfolio  that  requires  us  to  main-
tain  a  significant  pool  of  talented  Federal  criminal  investigators  and  auditors  on 
staff.  Our  semi-annual  reports  reflect  our  audit  and  investigative  work  as  well  as 
impressive criminal statistics and significant taxpayer funds put to better use. 

On  March  21,  1996,  President  William  J.  Clinton  signed  Executive  Order  12993 
that  outlines  procedures  to  be  taken  regarding  administrative  allegations  against 
Inspectors General. This process is intended to mitigate the concern that Inspectors 
General,  as  designated  by  the  Inspector  General  Act,  are  independent  but  can  still 
be held accountable in the event that allegations of misconduct are valid. This proc-
ess has been in place for years and has proven to be valuable in terms of maintain-
ing  credibility  and  integrity  within  the  OIG  community.  The  process  is  understood 
and accepted by the Inspectors General when they consent to their nomination and 
are confirmed by the U.S. Senate. 

In early 2006, the Integrity Committee (IC) of the President’s Council on Integrity 
and  Efficiency  (PCIE),  a  council  comprised  of  Presidentially-appointed  Inspectors 
General,  asked  the  HUD  OIG  to  investigate  allegations  of  administrative  mis-
conduct it had received regarding the Inspector General of the National Aeronautics 
and  Space  Administration  (NASA).  The  Integrity  Committee  Executive  Order  char-
ter  states  that  it  shall  first  determine  if  there  is  a  substantial  likelihood  that  the 
allegations presented to the Committee disclosed a violation of any law, rule, or reg-
ulation, or gross mismanagement, gross waste of funds, or abuse of authority. If the 
IC  makes  this  preliminary  determination,  and  further  concludes  that  allegations 
cannot  be  referred  to  any  agency  with  appropriate  jurisdiction,  it  then  refers  the 
matter  to  the  Chair  who  is  to  cause  a  thorough  and  timely  investigation  of  allega-
tions. 

The  January  6,  2006  letter  I  received  from  the  IC  Chair  (the  Federal  Bureau  of 
Investigations’  Assistant  Director,  Criminal  Investigative  Division)  stated,  in  part, 
that  ‘‘at  a  December  15,  2005  meeting,  this  matter  was  discussed  and  opined  that 
due to the number of credible allegations, with a pattern of possible misconduct and/ 
or wrongdoings by the NASA IG, the IC determined that an administrative investiga-
tion  of  the  allegations  is  appropriate.’’  It  further  stated,  ‘‘It  is  requested  that  the  in-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

vestigators  you  appoint  conduct  a  thorough  investigation  to  determine  whether  the 
alleged  misconduct  did,  in  fact,  occur  and  develop  a  comprehensive  factual  report 
concerning the allegations and any additional issues which may be uncovered during 
the  investigation.  That  report  will  serve  as  the  basis  for  further  action  to  be  taken 
by the IC.’’ 

In a prior meeting, your committee staff asked that I speak to the process of what 
we  went  through  regarding  the  development  and  implementation  of  this  investiga-
tion. The PCIE IC forwarded 22 complaints that generated approximately 100 sepa-
rate  allegations.  A  team  of  HUD  OIG  Special  Agents  and  Forensic  Auditors  con-
ducted  the  investigation  and  completed  the  report.  Each  of  the  complainants  was 
interviewed  and  more  than  120  interviews  were  completed.  Documents  were  ob-
tained  and  analyzed,  over  25,000  electronic  mail  messages  were  reviewed,  and  199 
exhibits  were  catalogued.  The  NASA  IG  was  interviewed  under  oath  and  the  inter-
view  was  reported  by  a  certified  court  reporter.  The  most  significant  of  the  allega-
tions  were  grouped  into  the  following  general  categories:  lack  of  independence  and 
impartiality; obstruction of justice; misconduct; safety issues; audit issues; and hos-
tile/untenable  work  environment.  The  final  Report  of  Investigation  contained  three 
sections;  the  first  consisted  of  audit  issues,  the  second  of  investigation  issues,  and 
the third of management issues. 

We  had  previously  successfully  conducted  another  investigation  at  the  request  of 
the IC of an agency of similar size to our organization. It had involved multiple alle-
gations,  some  of  a  complicated  nature,  which  had  also  been  forwarded  by  external 
entities including Congressional chairman. I was asked to conduct this investigation 
of  the  NASA  IG  because  of  our  prior  experience  and  of  our  position  as  an  objective 
outsider.  I  did  not  seek  this  task  but  did  not  take  the  request  lightly  as  I  feel  the 
process  must  be  respected  if  the  community  is  to  maintain  respectable  credibility 
with  Congress  and  the  American  citizens  we  serve.  Though  I  intimately  knew  how 
cumbersome  such  an  investigation  could  be,  I  accepted  it  at  the  urging  of  the  then 
IC  Chair  despite  a  confluence  of  events  around  that  time  that  made  it  even  more 
arduous. 

Shortly  before  this  assignment,  devastating  hurricanes  hit  the  Gulf  Coast  region 
and  HUD  became  the  primary  agency  for  redevelopment  activities.  $17  billion  in 
new HUD funding needed to be immediately overseen by the HUD OIG despite our 
having  lost  our  office  in  New  Orleans.  This  was  in  addition  to  the  already  under-
way,  and  also  labor-intensive,  emergency-related  task  that  we  had  been  given  re-
garding  emergency  appropriations  for  HUD  redevelopment  and  revitalization  funds 
for lower Manhattan following the attack of September 11th. Unfortunately, we had 
also lost our office at World Trade Center 7 on that day. 

Despite our previous experience performing IC work, this investigation, neverthe-
less,  has  taken  a  big  toll  on  parts  of  my  staff  in  terms  of  manpower  and  resources. 
At  the  time  the  HUD  OIG  was  tasked  in  the  early  part  of  2006,  a  Shuttle  launch 
had  been  delayed  for  over  two  and  a  half  years  due  to  safety  concerns  in  the  after-
math of the explosion of the Shuttle Columbia and only one previous mission, a re-
turn to flight in the summer of 2005, had taken place. The next Shuttle launch was 
set  for  the  summer  of  2006.  Though  not  in  the  initial  IC  direction  to  us,  I  felt 
strongly that, because there had been allegations relating to safety, I needed to com-
plete  our  investigation  and  draft  our  Report  of  Investigation  in  time  for  this  sched-
uled launch. 

Indeed, we kept the FBI cognizant of developments for this very reason (the Integ-
rity  Committee  staff  consists  of  detailees  from  the  FBI  owing  to  the  fact  that  the 
IC  Chair  is  the  FBI  Assistant  Director,  Criminal  Investigative  Division  and  these 
agents  perform  much  of  the  duties  associated  with  the  IC  and  its  process  require-
ments) and I met with Senator Nelson’s staff to let them know if any critical safety 
issues  emerged.  To  keep  this  timetable  and  to  address  all  of  the  numerous,  and 
sometimes  lengthy  and  complex,  allegations  caused  a  hardship  on  my  staff.  We 
have,  however,  as  a  result  of  our  dealings  with  the  Oklahoma  City  bombings  in 
which we lost staff, the September 11 attack, and the hurricanes become somewhat 
condition-hardened. On August 30, 2006, we turned over our Report of Investigation 
(ROI)  to  the  Integrity  Committee  and  briefed  its  members  a  short  time  later.  Our 
time  and  resource  commitment  has  not  ended  due  to  the  extended  deliberation  of 
the IC into 2007 and to the continuing interest of entities such as the Congress and 
media.  Accordingly,  we  have  recently  submitted  a  new  request  for  a  modest  reim-
bursement of our expended funds. 

I am not a member of the Integrity Committee nor was I privy to its deliberations 
once  we  completed  our  investigation  and  briefed  the  IC.  I  placed  great  weight  on 
our  having  been  chosen  as  outsiders  to  be  objective  and  on  our  designated  role  as 
‘‘finder  of  the  facts.’’  The  IC’s  determinations,  and  the  underlying  process  of  how  it 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

arrived  at  its  findings,  were  unknown  to  me.  Only  recently  was  I  made  aware  of 
its conclusions but I have not had access to its deliberative activities. 

When  I  met  with  your  staff  previous  to  this  hearing,  I  was  asked  specific  ques-
tions  relating  to  various  aspects  of  an  Inspector  General.  Being  an  Inspector  Gen-
eral is one of the most difficult jobs in the Federal Government and remaining inde-
pendent  and  objective  is  the  benchmark  of  success.  As  Senator  Grassley  once  char-
acterized the position, ‘‘you’re like a skunk at a picnic.’’ Or as another IG once testi-
fied, ‘‘it is like straddling a barbed wire fence.’’ I know that I am constantly striving 
to achieve a balance of what I believe it is to be a good public servant in this arena. 
It can be a challenging job to supervise a staff of disparate disciplines and to inter-
act internally and externally with groups or individuals who do not always want to 
hear  your  sometimes  controversial  or  painful  findings.  I  do  know,  however,  that  I 
believe in the words that the Secretary that I work under has stated to me numer-
ous times. He has said ‘‘I know that we are going to definitely disagree, many times 
and  on  many  different  things,  but  we  will  always  agree  to  never  be  disagreeable.’’ 
As I stated to your staff during their questioning, it is crucial that the department 
or agency must respect the independence of the OIG, must understand why this un-
usual  organization  needs  to  be  insulated  from  political  pressures,  and  will,  hope-
fully, come to realization that a strong OIG will ultimately benefit the effectiveness 
of  its  operations.  Unfortunately,  this  epiphany  does  not  always  manifest.  When  it 
does by those who run America’s Federal programs, however, it works to the better-
ment  of  government  efficiency  and,  ultimately,  to  the  benefit  of  the  American  tax-
payer and the recipients of the programs it manages. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

HON. ROBERT W. COBB 

All  answers  are  to  the  best  of  my  recollection,  after  review  of  pertinent  informa-

tion. 

Question  1.  Referring  to  the  search  warrant  issued  December  8,  2004,  related  to 
an  investigation  at  the  Stennis  Space  Center:  Did  you  communicate,  or  cause  any 
other  person  to  communicate,  the  existence  of  the  search  warrant  to  any  persons 
associated with the target of the search warrant? 

Answer. No. 
Question 2. Related to the same matter as Question 1: Please list all persons out-
side  the  NASA  Office  of  Inspector  General  (OIG)  with  whom  you  discussed  the 
search  warrant  between  its  issuance  and  its  execution.  Please  describe  the  nature 
and content of any such communications. 

Answer.  On  December  9,  2004,  I  believe  I  was  conferenced  into  a  conversation 
with Jay Golden, an Assistant United States Attorney (AUSA) regarding a question 
NASA OIG counsel had raised with him about whether the search warrant was sup-
ported by probable cause. In the context of my being the official ultimately account-
able for the activities of the NASA OIG staff, I had raised a question as to whether 
the allegations, if true, were of conduct constituting a crime and, therefore, whether 
there was probable cause underpinning a warrant to be served by NASA OIG crimi-
nal  investigators;  the  Counsel  to  the  Inspector  General  believed  that  the  affidavit 
in support of the warrant did not support a finding of probable cause, thereby inher-
ently  raising  a  question  of  legality  of  the  warrant  under  the  Fourth  Amendment  of 
the United States Constitution. The AUSA wished to proceed with the service of the 
warrant notwithstanding the question that had been raised. As the warrant was the 
AUSA’s  and  the  issuing  Federal  magistrate’s  responsibility  and  I  believed  the  OIG 
had  fulfilled  its  responsibility  by  raising  the  issue,  I  did  not  object  to  his  decision 
to  proceed  with  the  warrant’s  execution.  The  warrant  was  served  on  the  day 
planned. 

Question  3.  Referring  to  the  search  warrant  issued  June  30,  2005,  related  to  an 
investigation  at  the  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center:  Did  you  communicate,  or  cause 
any  other  person  to  communicate,  the  existence  of  the  search  warrant  to  any  per-
sons associated with the target of the search warrant? 

Answer. No. 
Question 4. Related to the same matter as Question 3: Please list all persons out-
side  the  NASA  OIG  with  whom  you  discussed  the  search  warrant  between  its 
issuance and its execution. Please describe the nature and content of any such com-
munications. 

Answer. I had no such discussions. 
Question  5.  Please  describe  the  history  and  nature  of  your  relationship  with  the 

Deputy Director of the Office of Management and Budget, Clay Johnson. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

Answer.  I  would  characterize  my  relationship  with  Mr.  Johnson  as  professional. 
From January 2001 to April 2002, I was an Associate Counsel and Special Assist-
ant  to  the  President  as  a  member  of  the  Office  of  the  Counsel  to  the  President.  I 
reported  through  the  Deputy  Counsel  to  the  Counsel.  Mr.  Johnson,  as  head  of  the 
Office of Presidential Personnel, was an Assistant to the President, two levels high-
er  than  I  on  the  organizational  chart  and  at  a  level  equivalent  to  the  Counsel  to 
the President, who was also an Assistant to the President. I was responsible for eth-
ics  issues  and  frequently  dealt  with  staff  of  the  Office  of  Presidential  Personnel  in 
connection with the processing of Financial Disclosure Reports of persons under con-
sideration for nomination and appointment to Executive Branch positions requiring 
confirmation by the U.S. Senate. The carrying out of this responsibility brought me 
into occasional contact with Mr. Johnson. 

I  also  was  responsible  for  the  review  of  Financial  Disclosure  Reports  of  commis-
sioned  officers  in  the  White  House,  including  Mr.  Johnson,  providing  briefings  on 
ethics  issues  and  answering  questions  related  to  compliance  with  certain  laws  and 
regulations,  such  as  the  Standards  of  Ethical  Conduct  for  Employees  of  the  Execu-
tive Branch. These responsibilities brought me into contact with most White House 
Office  employees,  including  Mr.  Johnson.  Any  contacts  with  him  in  carrying  out 
these responsibilities were of a routine nature. 

During the summer of 2002, I had occasion to play in a Saturday golf game with 

Mr. Johnson which was arranged by the then NASA Administrator. 

After  Mr.  Johnson  became  the  Deputy  Director  of  the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget,  I  came  into  contact  with  Mr.  Johnson  in  his  capacity  as  the  Chairman  of 
the PCIE. My contact with Mr. Johnson was generally limited to seeing and speak-
ing to him occasionally at PCIE meetings. 

Question  6.  Please  describe  any  communications  between  you  and  Clay  Johnson 
between  January  6,  2006,  and  the  present  time  that  related  in  any  way  to  the 
NASA  OIG.  Please  describe  the  date  and  nature  of  the  communication,  who  initi-
ated it, and the content. 

Answer.  I  do  not  have  records  of  contacts  with  Mr.  Johnson,  other  than  as  dis-
closed  below.  My  contacts  with  him  during  the  period  of  the  investigation  by  the 
Integrity  Committee  were  initiated  by  me  and  were  intended  to  keep  Mr.  Johnson 
informed  of  the  actions  I  was  taking  in  response  to  the  investigation  so  that  he 
would  not  be  surprised.  I  believe  I  contacted  Mr.  Johnson  prior  to  my  sending  my 
July  17,  2006,  letters  to  the  Director  of  the  FBI  and  to  the  Integrity  Committee  to 
advise him of my plans to send those letters. Likewise, I may have called him prior 
to my sending my letters of August 23, 2006, and September 7, 2006, and I believe 
I  called  him  in  November  of  2006  prior  to  sending  my  November  17,  2006,  letter 
to the Director of the FBI about leaks of confidential information from the investiga-
tion  to  the  Orlando  Sentinel.  In  my  communications  to  Mr.  Johnson,  I  alerted  him 
to  the  content  of  my  letters  (all  of  these  letters  were  copied  to  Mr.  Johnson,  and 
are attached to my June 7 testimony as Exhibits) emphasizing that I had never re-
ceived any honest notice of what I was accused of and that I was under an impres-
sion that I would not receive a copy of any ‘‘findings’’ or have an opportunity to re-
spond  to  them  and  that  the  process  defined  in  the  governing  Executive  Order, 
12993,  was  not  being  followed.  In  two  instances,  when  I  copied  Mr.  Johnson  with 
my  correspondence  to  the  Integrity  Committee,  I  wrote  him  notes  of  transmittal 
stating as follows: 
8/24/06 
Dear Clay: 

Enclosed  are  my  August  23  letter  to  Burros  and  my  letter  to  Mueller  of  July  17. 

I believe the IC process is broken. 

Aside from my letters, which are primarily focused on process, the 500 page tran-

script of my testimony fully demonstrates the offensive nature of this. 

I understand the process, such as it is, will play out and patience is required. 

Sincerely, 

MOOSE 

9/13/06 
Dear Clay: 

This  is  my  submission  In  response  to  Burrus’s  letter  of  August  30.  Note  the  first 
item  on  Exhibit  A.  The  IC  is  broken  and  needs  to  be  fixed.  I  will  share  some  ideas 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

on  the  subject  after  the  wasteful  and  abusive  investigation  I  have  been  subjected 
to comes to an end. 

Sincerely, 

MOOSE 

On those occasions I spoke to Mr. Johnson, his consistent response was that there 
is a process in place and it would have to play out. I believe, during a conversation 
in  the  fall,  presumably  in  connection  with  my  contacting  him  about  the  reprehen-
sible leak of information from the investigation and my intent to report it, Mr. John-
son conceded that there were problems with Integrity Committee processes and that 
he  expected  that  there  would  be  some  changes  to  Integrity  Committee  procedures 
made. 

In  January  of  2007,  I  was  informed  by  the  Integrity  Committee  that  it  had  for-
warded a report to the Chair of the PCIE, Mr. Johnson. I called Mr. Johnson to see 
if  I  could  obtain  a  copy  of  the  Integrity  Committee  report.  Mr.  Johnson  called  me 
back  and  informed  me  that  he  would  not  be  providing  the  report  to  me  and  that 
I  would  have  to  obtain  it  from  the  Integrity  Committee.  The  Integrity  Committee 
refused  to  provide  me  a  copy  of  that  report  (which  I  subsequently  obtained  only 
after  publication  by  a  Congressional  subcommittee  on  its  website).  In  my  conversa-
tion  with  Mr.  Johnson  about  the  Integrity  Committee  report,  he  read  me  one  para-
graph from the Integrity Committee’s letter which summarized the conclusion of the 
Integrity Committee, he told me that he did not believe it was a White House mat-
ter, and he told me that he intended to send the report to the NASA Administrator 
for  review.  Mr.  Johnson  did  not  provide  me  with  additional  detail  on  the  content 
of the Integrity Committee report. Subsequently, I copied Mr. Johnson on an e-mail 
request  to  Mr.  Burrus  relating  to  a  commitment  Mr.  Burrus  made  to  provide  me 
with  the  HUD  OIG  investigative  report  responsive  to  a  FOIA  request  that  I  had 
filed  several  months  earlier.  (As  I  was  never  provided,  during  the  course  of  the  In-
tegrity Committee process, any proposed or final findings or conclusions of the HUD 
OIG or the Integrity Committee, I was deprived of an opportunity to respond to the 
findings  and  conclusions  or  the  factual  and  legal  basis  for  them.  As  subsequently 
demonstrated  in  my  testimony  on  June  7,  the  conclusions  of  the  Integrity  Com-
mittee were without legal and factual basis.) 

I  sent  Mr.  Johnson  by  e-mail  a  copy  of  my  prepared  testimony  for  the  June  7 
hearing,  possibly  having  called  him  prior  to  sending  it  to  see  if  he  wanted  a  copy 
of  it.  I  do  not  recall  any  subsequent  conversations  with  Mr.  Johnson  about  the  in-
vestigation. I did see him once socially (which was not prearranged) in the summer 
of 2007 and recall discussing in most general terms issues relating to IG reform leg-
islation.  I  have  communicated  to  him  my  recommendations  for  improvement  to  the 
Integrity  Committee  in  the  context  of  commenting  on  proposed  legislation  relating 
to  Inspectors  General.  The  e-mail  exchange  relating  to  this  is  attached,  along  with 
the attachment to the e-mail. 

Question 7. Have you at any time discouraged an employee of the NASA OIG from 

pursuing a criminal investigation of former NASA [employee] (name deleted). 

Answer. No. 
In  the  context  of  my  carrying  out  my  supervisory  responsibilities  and  as  the  offi-
cial  ultimately  accountable  for  the  NASA  OIG’s  work,  I  try  to  keep  informed  as  to 
the  status  of  major  or  sensitive  investigative  activity  and  to  ensure  that  investiga-
tive activity is properly resourced and focused. In various conversations with Office 
of Investigations personnel, I inquired, as I frequently do with respect to significant 
matters pending in the office, as to what we were finding through investigation and 
to what extent we believed that possible criminal activity was involved. 

This case was no exception. In 2002, with respect to allegations concerning (name 
deleted)  I  raised  a  question  of  whether  the  allegations  or  facts  known  to  the  OIG, 
if true, constituted a crime. From the written summary provided to me by the Office 
of  Investigations,  the  acts  allegedly  taken  by  (name  deleted)  occurred  prior  to  his 
being a Federal employee, and it appeared that, as a legal matter, the theory of con-
flict of interest that was being investigated was a legal impossibility. The conclusion 
of the Office of Investigations, in coordination with the Department of Justice Public 
Integrity Section, was that there was no crime or other issue appropriate for further 
investigation and the investigation was closed. 

With regard to a subsequent matter, I referred a question about (name deleted)’s 
activities to the Office of Investigations. Based on this and, I believe, other informa-
tion  that  was  received  by  the  Office  of  Investigations,  an  investigation  was  opened. 
As is the case in all matters of alleged crime, the NASA OIG coordinated the allega-
tions  with  a  United  States  Attorney’s  office  and  subsequently  other  components  of 
the  Department  of  Justice.  I  cannot  comment  further  given  the  legal  status  of  this 
matter, except to say that I did not take action to stop or discourage a criminal in-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

vestigation.  Further  details  can  be  provided  by  our  Assistant  Inspector  General  for 
Investigations. 

84 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL 

Washington, DC, August 15, 2003 

Hon. SEAN O’KEEFE, 
Administrator, 
National Aeronautics and Space Administration, 
Washington, DC. 

SUBJECT: OBSERVATIONS ON THE INDEPENDENCE OF THE COLUMBIA ACCIDENT 
INVESTIGATION BOARD 

Dear Mr. O’Keefe: 

Here  are  some  observations  I  have  about  the  Columbia  Accident  Investigation 
Board  (CAIB),  particularly  as  regards  CAIB  independence.  These  observations  re-
sult  from  my  role  as  an  observer  to  CAIB  activities,  a  role  which  I  sought  and  you 
effected by letter dated February 2, 2003. 

Although  NASA  policy  and  the  CAIB’s  original  charter  contained  provisions  that 
could  have  hindered  an  independent  investigation,  based  on  my  observations,  I  be-
lieve  the  CAIB,  under  Admiral  Harold  Gehman’s  leadership,  is  and  has  been  con-
ducting  its  investigation  independently  and  without  undue  influence  from  NASA.  I 
say  this  while  recognizing  the  reliance  that  any  investigative  body  would  have  on 
obtaining information and analysis from NASA. I also note the time-sensitive nature 
of  the  Board’s  challenge  in  light  of  the  status  of  the  International  Space  Station. 
The CAIB has been diligently focused on determining the cause(s) of the accident 
and the remedies needed to prevent future mishaps. The CAIB, despite the breadth 
of its inquiry and expertise, has not been chartered to conduct a public policy debate 
on  the  merits  of  human  space  flight  or  to  examine  whether,  from  a  public  policy 
standpoint,  return  to  flight  best  serves  the  public  interest.  However,  to  the  extent 
the Board distinguishes between return-to-flight and long-term recommendations, it 
will  facilitate  NASA’s  return  to  flight.  Overall,  it  is  my  expectation  that  CAIB  rec-
ommendations will help shape any debate on the public policy issues. 

NASA and the public will be best served by the issuance of an accurate, construc-
tive, and credible report by the CAIB. One possible impediment to the Board’s abil-
ity  to  issue  such  a  report  would  be  a  compromise  of  the  CAIB’s  independence.  Of 
course,  ‘‘independence’’  is  subjective.  The  CAIB  has  constituencies  including  NASA, 
Congress,  the  Administration,  and  the  public.  These  constituencies  and  the  media 
provide information, advice, requests, and expectations. The Board has been in con-
tact with these constituencies and has sought to be responsive to their needs. 

My conclusion that the CAIB is acting independently and without undue influence 
is  based  on  my  view  that  the  Board  can  address  the  challenging  questions  associ-
ated with the loss of the Space Shuttle Columbia in good faith and without material 
impediments  from  organizational  or  personal  conflicts  of  interest.  I  have  primarily 
focused on the question of CAIB independence from NASA—the organization in the 
best  position  to  interfere  in  the  CAIB’s  pursuit  of  its  objectives  and  with  the  most 
at stake in terms of the Board’s report and recommendations. 
Appointment of the CAIB 

On  February  1,  2003,  at  approximately  9  a.m.,  mission  control  at  Johnson  Space 
Center lost communication with Columbia during re-entry into Earth’s atmosphere. 
At 9:15 a.m., NASA declared a mishap after determining that Columbia had experi-
enced a critical failure in the atmosphere over eastern Texas. At 9:16 a.m., the Asso-
ciate  Administrator  for  Space  Flight  initiated  the  NASA  Contingency  Action  Plan, 
a  document  that  delineates  the  pre-planned  contingency  response  to  a  space  flight 
operations  mishap.  Within  24  hours  of  the  Columbia  accident,  NASA  had  formally 
activated the CAIB and published its charter. 
Independence of CAIB Questioned 

The  initial  implementation  of  the  CAIB  was  not  without  its  difficulties.  During 
the fast few weeks after the Columbia accident, Members of Congress and the news 
media  expressed  concerns  that  the  Board  would  operate  at  the  direction  of  the 
NASA Administrator and that NASA’s influence would prevent the CAIB from con-
ducting  an  independent  and  objective  investigation.  CAIB  members  themselves  ex-
pressed concerns about taking direction from the NASA Administrator. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Revisions to the CAIB Charter 

85 

In connection with the issues regarding the CAIB’s independence, I recommended 
that  the  Chairman  consider  four  modifications  to  the  Board’s  charter.  These  revi-
sions  addressed  membership  and  staffing,  direct  supervision  of  the  CAIB  by  the 
NASA Administrator, access to records, and review of NASA’s management and fis-
cal  environment  relating  to  Shuttle  crew  safety.  In  a  separate  letter  to  the  CAIB, 
I advised the Chairman that he should take steps to ensure its independence in con-
nection with the participation of certain senior-level NASA executives on the Board. 
(See Enclosures 1 and 2 for February 14, 2003, memoranda to the CAIB.) The CAIB 
was already contemplating independence issues, and it sought changes to the char-
ter  and  took  other  actions  to  address  these  issues.  NASA  management  was  sup-
portive of changes to the CAIB charter, which was revised several times. 

As  a  result  of  one  of  the  charter  revisions,  the  CAIB  was  no  longer  required  to 
follow the NASA mishap policy. This change provided the Board the ability to alter 
the organization and composition of its membership. For example, the change to the 
charter that permitted the CAIB to determine its own policies gave it the flexibility 
to make changes that would eliminate the perception of conflicts of interest in Board 
proceedings.  Specifically,  the  Chairman  replaced  an  ex  officio  member  of  the  Board 
who  was  a  NASA  senior  official  whose  NASA  duties  would  likely  fall  under  the 
broad scope of the CAIB’s review. Another NASA senior official, while nominally an 
ex officio member of the CAIB in an administrative capacity, returned to his NASA 
duties  with  very  little  association  with  the  Board  after  mid-March.  While  the  offi-
cials  had  proven  invaluable  in  helping  establish  the  CAIB,  the  need  for  their  serv-
ices lessened as the Board became fully staffed and supported. 

Ultimately, the CAIB Chairman added four new members with expertise in aero-
nautics,  astronautics,  physics,  space  science,  and  space  policy.  The  changes  to  the 
charter,  composition,  and  manner  of  operations  were  intended,  in  part,  to  address 
questions about CAIB independence. 
Relationships Between NASA and Individual Board Members 

In  my  view,  the  CAIB  has  been  composed  and  operated  in  a  manner  that  strikes 
an appropriate balance between those with limited or no prior dealings with NASA 
and those with familiarity with the Agency. The military members of the Board and 
the  FAA  employee  have  had,  for  the  most  part,  little  or  no  association  with  NASA 
beyond participating in mishap activities. Their collective expertise lies primarily in 
safety  and  accident  investigations.  In  contrast,  other  Board  members  have  had 
greater prior exposure to NASA operations. For example, based on publicly available 
information,  seven  of  the  thirteen  CAIB  members  worked  as  NASA  contractors  or 
received NASA grants in the past. Two of these seven members have served on the 
NASA  Advisory  Council,  and  two  are  former  NASA  employees  (one  worked  on  the 
Gemini and Apollo programs in the 1960s, and the other is a former astronaut and 
member of the Rogers Commission, which investigated the Challenger accident). An-
other CAIB member was a White House Fellow at NASA and worked as the NASA 
administrator’s executive assistant and White House liaison at the time of the Chal-
lenger accident. Also, one CAIB member is a full-time NASA employee. The breadth 
of experience of CAIB members has enabled the Board to engage in a comprehensive 
and independent examination of the Shuttle disaster. 

The CAIB was criticized on the basis of independence because those persons who 
were  added  after  the  original  composition  of  the  Board  were  placed  on  the  NASA 
payroll. Critics presumed that anyone receiving a paycheck from NASA would some-
how be compromised. Without any exercise of supervision by NASA over these per-
sons,  there  is  no  merit  to  a  claim  that  NASA  controls  the  actions  of  these  persons 
or  that  they  might  be  beholden  to  NASA  because  of  the  salaries’  source.  In  some 
respect, making these persons NASA employees reduced the opportunity for conflicts 
of interest. In becoming Federal employees, these individuals became subject to con-
flict of interest laws that otherwise would not have applied. 
CAIB Disclosure to the Public 

To address the public’s interest in the proceedings, the CAIB began holding press 
conferences  and  public  hearings.  However,  public  disclosure  was  complicated  be-
cause the CAIB was conducting a safety investigation that extended a limited privi-
lege to certain witnesses. Limited privilege protects witness statements from public 
disclosure.  The  theory  behind  a  safety  investigation  is  that  an  accident’s  cause(s) 
can  be  best  determined  in  an  atmosphere  where  admissions  of  mistakes  and  criti-
cisms of superiors or programs are free from reprisal or retribution. As the objective 
of  the  CAIB  is  to  identify  the  cause(s)  of  the  accident  rather  than  to  place  blame 
on particular individuals, the limited privilege procedure seems reasonably designed 
to  assist  in  this  regard.  In  my  role  as  observer,  I  respected  the  principle  of  limited 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

privilege and, therefore, was not privy to the testimonies of those witnesses to whom 
limited  privilege  was  extended.  It  is  noteworthy  that  the  privilege  in  no  way  pro-
tects information suggesting criminal activity. 

As  a  result  of  the  limited  privilege  protection,  some  information  obtained  by  the 
CAIB  will  be  withheld  from  public  release.  Pursuant  to  an  arrangement  with  over-
sight  committees,  the  CAIB  is  permitting  inspection  of  the  privileged  testimony  of 
witnesses  by  Congressional  members  and  staff,  subject  to  certain  limitations. 
Heightened  attention  is  warranted  for  proceedings  that  have  not  been  entirely 
transparent.  Congress,  the  Office  of  Inspector  General,  the  media,  and  the  public 
will generate additional scrutiny. 
Office  of  Inspector  General  (OIG)  Continuing  Role  in  Columbia-Related 

Matters 

The  conclusions  presented  in  this  memorandum  are  based  solely  on  my  observa-
tions.  (The  conclusions  are  not  the  product  of  a  formal  audit  conducted  in  accord-
ance with generally accepted government auditing standards.) 

Future  activities  are  planned  by  the  OIG  to  review  the  CAB’s  activities  and  the 
Agency’s  resulting  implementation  of  the  Board’s  findings  and  recommendations. 
We  are  currently  conducting  an  audit  of  CAIB  financial  and  procurement  manage-
ment. The audit is examining whether the CAIB established controls to ensure that 
cost  expenditures  were  reasonable,  necessary,  and  accounted  for  and  whether  the 
Board  established  contract  agreements  in  accordance  with  the  Federal  Acquisition 
Regulation.  We  will  also  monitor  the  Agency’s  plans  for  implementing  the  Board’s 
recommendations, including return-to-flight activities, and consider all referrals the 
Board makes to the OIG. In addition, the OIG will review NASA’s contingency plans 
in  the  event  one  or  more  of  the  three  remaining  orbiters  is  subject  to  catastrophic 
loss or is otherwise out of service. 

Because of the importance of its work to NASA, I sought to be an observer to the 
Board’s activities and to make recommendations regarding CAIB organization on an 
ongoing  basis  rather  than  waiting  until  after  a  report  is  issued,  when  any  rec-
ommendations  I  might  have  would  be  too  late  to  be  of  any  value.  I  also  believed 
that proximity to CAIB activities would strengthen the ability of my office to follow 
up  on  CAIB-identified  issues  and  to  promote  the  efficiency  and  effectiveness  of 
NASA. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  have  served  as  an  observer  to  the  CAIB,  which 
has  permitted  me  to  coordinate  OIG  activities  with  those  of  the  CAIB  and  to  make 
these observations. 

Sincerely, 

ROBERT W. COBB, 

Inspector General. 

Enclosures 
cc: 
Admiral Harold W. Gehman, USN (Ret.) 
Chairman 
Columbia Accident Investigation Board 
Hon. Ted Stevens 
Chairman 
Senate Committee on Appropriations 
Hon. Robert C. Byrd 
Ranking Member 
Senate Committee on Appropriations 
Hon. Christopher Bond 
Chairman 
Senate Subcommittee on VA, HUD, and Independent Agencies 
Hon. Barbara Mikulski 
Ranking Member 
Senate Subcommittee on VA, HUD, and Independent Agencies 
Hon. John McCain 
Chairman 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation 
Hon. Ernest Hollings 
Ranking Member 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation 
Hon. Sam Brownback 
Chairman 
Senate Subcommittee on Science, Technology, and Space 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

Hon. John Breaux 
Ranking Member 
Senate Subcommittee on Science, Technology, and Space 
Hon. Susan Collins 
Chairwoman 
Senate Committee on Government Affairs 
Hon. Joseph Lieberman 
Ranking Member 
Senate Committee on Government Affairs 
Hon. C.W. Bill Young 
Chairman 
House Committee on Appropriations 
Hon. David R. Obey 
Ranking Member 
House Committee on Appropriations 
Hon. James T. Walsh 
Chairman 
House Subcommittee on VA, HUD, and Independent Agencies 
Hon. Alan Mollohan 
Ranking Member 
House Subcommittee on VA, HUD, and Independent Agencies 
Hon. Tom Davis 
Chairman 
House Committee on Government Reform 
Hon. Henry Waxman 
Ranking Member 
House Committee on Government Reform 
Hon. Todd Russell Platts 
Chairman 
House Subcommittee on Government Efficiency and Financial Management 
Hon. Edolphus Towns 
Ranking Member 
House Subcommittee on Government Efficiency and Financial Management 
Hon. Adam H. Putnam 
Chairman 
House  Subcommittee  on  Technology,  Information  Policy,  Intergovernmental  Rela-

tions and the Census 

Hon. William L. Clay, Jr. 
Ranking Member 
House  Subcommittee  on  Technology,  Information  Policy,  Intergovernmental  Rela-

tions and the Census 

Hon. Sherwood Boehlert 
Chairman 
House Committee on Science 
Hon. Ralph Hall 
Ranking Member 
House Committee on Science 
Hon. Dana Rohrabacher 
Chairman 
House Subcommittee on Space and Aeronautics 
Hon. Bart Gordon 
Ranking Member 
House Subcommittee on Space and Aeronautics 

ENCLOSURE 1 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL 

Washington, DC, February 14, 2003 

Admiral HAROLD W. GEHMAN, USN (Ret.), 
Chairman, 
Columbia Accident Investigation Board, 
Houston, TX. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

Dear Admiral Gehman: 

At the February 12, 2003, Congressional hearing on the Columbia accident, mem-
bers of NASA’s oversight committees expressed concern that the membership of the 
Board  and  its  charter  could  limit  the  Board’s  ability  to  carry  out  its  duties  with 
independence  and  objectivity.  In  response  to  the  concern  expressed  at  the  hearing, 
the NASA Administrator amended the Board’s charter to expand your flexibility and 
remove any inference of NASA oversight. 

In  order  to  assist  you  and  the  Administrator  in  ensuring  that  the  Board’s  activi-
ties  are  independent,  here  are  some  general  ideas  for  your  consideration.  These 
could  be  worked  into  the  guidelines  section  of  the  charter,  any  further  amendment 
of the responsibilities listed in the charter, or in a letter summarizing your interpre-
tation of the Board’s responsibilities under the charter. 

• The  Board  will  add  members  and  use  independent  technical  expertise  as  nec-

essary to reach independent conclusions and recommendations. 

• The  Board  will  not  be  subject  to  supervision  by  the  Administrator  or  any,  em-
ployee  of  NASA.  Neither  the  Administrator  nor  any  delegate  of  the  Adminis-
trator  will  prevent  or  prohibit  the  Board  from  initiating,  carrying  out  or  com-
pleting any task regarding the investigation of the Columbia accident. 

• The Board shall have access to all records, reports, audits, reviews, documents, 
papers,  recommendations,  or  other  material  available  to  NASA  programs  and 
operations that are relevant to the investigation of the Columbia accident. 

• In considering all causes of the accident, the Board will review NASA budgeting 
and management to determine whether an environment could have existed that 
did not maximize human space flight safety. 

I  am  prepared  to  discuss  these  suggestions  or  any  other  matter  as  the  Board  de-
liberates  how  it  can  effectively  accomplish  its  mission  in  a  technically  sound  and 
independent manner. 

Sincerely, 

ROBERT W. COBB, 

Inspector General. 

cc: NASA Administrator 

ENCLOSURE 2 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL 

Washington, DC, February 14, 2003 

Admiral HAROLD W. GEHMAN, USN (Ret.), 
Chairman, 
Columbia Accident Investigation Board, 
Houston, TX. 

Dear Admiral Gehman: 

RE: INVOLVEMENT IN BOARD ACTIVITIES BY NASA EMPLOYEES 

The Board will need to be extraordinarily sensitive to the issue of NASA employ-
ees’  involvement  in  Board  activities.  There  is  tremendous  value  in  the  information 
and views that these employees provide. On the other hand, these persons may ap-
pear to some to have loyalties to NASA and NASA programs that could impair their 
objectivity. 

In  particular,  the  Board’s  ex  officio  member  (Bryan  O’Connor)  and  executive  sec-
retary (Theron Bradley) are NASA’s Associate Administrator for Safety and Mission 
Assurance and Chief Engineer, respectively. The Board will delve into NASA’s safe-
ty  and  mission  assurance  and  engineering  programs.  The  Board  should  take  steps 
to  ensure  independence  in  its  evaluation  of  program  management  in  these  two 
areas. More, the Board must strive to prevent even the appearance of conflict of in-
terest in these areas. 

In  addition,  Scott  Hubbard  is  the  Center  Director  at  the  Ames  Research  Center. 
While  Mr.  Hubbard  does  not  appear  to  have  significant  programmatic  responsibil-
ities  relevant  to  the  investigation,  his  status  as  a  senior  NASA  official  establishes 
the  appearance  of  an  organizational  conflict  that  the  other  members  of  the  Board 
need to be mindful of in the conduct of Board activities. 

The Board has already taken some helpful steps: 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

1. The breaking of the Board into subgroups has taken the initial consideration 
of  issues  out  of  the  boardroom  and  into  smaller  groups  that  do  not  include  the 
executive secretary or the ex officio member. 
2. The Board in at least one instance has had certain NASA employees step out 
of the room in connection with a briefing to assure the free flow of information 
to the Board and to minimize any appearance of conflicts of interest. 
3.  The  Board  has  sought  and  obtained  amendments  to  the  charter  to  provide 
it greater independence from NASA. 

The Board should consider taking the following steps: 

1. When the Board collectively evaluates the program management of engineer-
ing and of safety and mission assurance, it should request that the program of-
ficials in these areas step out of the boardroom—except where those officials are 
answering questions about their programs posed to them by the Board. 
2.  The  Board  should  treat  any  information  obtained  by  witnesses  from  within 
the  engineering  and  safety  and  mission  assurance  programs  that  is  critical  of 
program  organization  or  management  as  being  privileged  from  release  to  these 
program heads so that there is no organizational disincentive for witnesses from 
within  those  particular  programs  to  provide  information.  Witnesses  in  these 
areas  should  be  advised  of  the  Board’s  policies  in  this  regard  and  specifically 
asked if they want the information they have provided to be shielded from these 
program  managers.  NASA  employees  who  are  witnesses  should  be  told  that 
they might seek protection from reprisal by calling the Office of Inspector Gen-
eral, which is by statute obligated to protect whistleblowers. 

I  also  note  that  since  the  revised  charter  indicates  that  the  Board  is  subject  to 
its  own  policies  rather  than  those  of  NASA,  there  is  no  limit  on  the  Board’s  ability 
to  reorganize  its  support  in  such  a  way  as  to  eliminate  appearances  of  conflicts  of 
interest that may arise by virtue of provisions in NASA’s policies concerning mishap 
investigation. 

I hope this is of assistance to you. 

Sincerely, 

ROBERT W. COBB, 

Inspector General. 

POLICY AND PROCEDURES FOR EXERCISING THE AUTHORITY OF THE INTEGRITY 

COMMITTEE OF THE PRESIDENT’S COUNCIL ON INTEGRITY AND EFFICIENCY 

Preface 

In  January  1995,  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (PCIE)  and 
the  Executive  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (ECIE)  established  an  Integrity 
Committee (IC), pursuant to authority granted by Executive Order (EO) 12805. 

In EO 12993, signed on March 21, 1996, the IC was formally recognized and spe-
cifically  tasked  by  the  President  to  receive,  review,  and  refer  for  investigation, 
where  appropriate,  allegations  of  wrongdoing  against  an  Inspector  General  (IG)  or, 
in  the  limited  circumstances  defined  in  EO  12993,  allegations  against  a  staff  mem-
ber  in  an  IG  office  (OIG).  However,  the  authority  granted  to  the  IC  by  EO  12993 
does not encompass the statutory IGs of the Legislative Branch. 

EO 12993 directs the IC to ‘‘establish the policies and procedures necessary to en-
sure  consistency  in  conducting  investigations  and  reporting  activities  under  [the] 
order.’’ This document seeks to accomplish that goal. 

The  policy  and  procedures  provide  a  framework  for  the  investigative  function  of 
the  IC.  The  IC  must  consider  a  wide  variety  of  allegations  of  wrongdoing  and  ana-
lyze  conflicting  information  during  its  deliberations.  Such  deliberations  require  dis-
cretionary  determinations.  The  standards  and  requirements  set  out  in  this  docu-
ment provide the structure in which that discretion can be exercised. However, pol-
icy  and  procedures  cannot  be  read  to  dictate  determinative  outcomes  in  any  par-
ticular matter before the IC. 

The  IC  policy  and  procedures  were  developed  under  the  guidance  of  its  Chair-
person  and  were  considered  and  accepted  by  the  full  IC.  Drafts  of  the  policy  and 
procedures  were  vetted  with  the  membership  of  the  PCIE  and  ECIE.  The  IC  policy 
and procedures also have the concurrence of the Chairperson and Vice Chairpersons 
of the PCIE/ECIE. 

After  conducting  itself  under  these  procedures  for  a  period  of  time,  the  IC  may 
determine that amendments are desired. In that event, the IC shall vote on any pro-
posed  amendment,  which  must  be  endorsed  by  its  Chairperson.  The  IC  win  notify 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

the  PCIE/ECIE  Chairperson  and  Vice  Chairpersons  of  the  proposed  change.  Any 
substantive changes will be vetted with the membership of the PCIE and ECIE. Un-
less  the  Chairperson  or  Vice  Chairpersons  voice  disagreement  within  thirty  days, 
the proposed amendment will become final. 

The IC remains dedicated to building and ensuring integrity in the IG community 
by  fulfilling  its  responsibilities  under  EO  12993  and  by  leading  discussions  of,  and 
ongoing education on, integrity issues. 
Table of Contents 
I. Statement of Policy 
II. Receipt and Initial Screening of Allegations 

A. Receipt of Complaints 
B. Screening of Complaints by the Working Group 
C. Determinations by the Public Integrity Section 
D. Definitions 

III. Integrity Committee Meetings 

A. Administrative Details 
B. Review of Allegations 
C.  Notification  to  Complainants,  Subjects,  and  Subjects’  Agency  Heads  of  Integ-
rity Committee Decisions 
D. Review and Transmittal of Investigative Reports 
E. Disposition of Agency Head Reports 

IV. Policy Review 

A. The Integrity Committee Chairperson 
B. The Chairperson and Vice Chairpersons of the PCIE/ECIE 

V. Maintenance of Integrity Committee Records 

A. The Central Records System 
B. Disclosure of Information under the Freedom of Information Act 
C. Privacy Act Protection 
D. Physical Maintenance of Records 

I. Statement of Policy 

The  IC  serves  as  an  independent  investigative  mechanism  for  allegations  of  ad-
ministrative  misconduct  brought  against  IGs  and,  under  certain  circumstances, 
members of their staffs, as authorized by EO 12993. 

Allegations  against  an  agency  OIG  staff  member,  that  implicate  that  agency’s  IC 

are within the jurisdiction of the IG. 

Allegations against certain staff members must be referred to the IC when an IG, 
unable to refer them to another Executive Branch agency with investigative jurisdic-
tion  over  the  matter,  determines  that  an  internal  investigation  would  lack  objec-
tivity, or would appear to lack objectivity. 

The  IC  receives  allegations,  reviews  them,  and,  where  necessary,  refers  them  for 
investigation  either  to  an  agency  with  jurisdiction  over  the  matter  or  to  an  inves-
tigative  team  composed  of  selected  investigators  supervised  and  controlled  by  the 
IC’s Chairperson. 

The procedures which follow describe how the IC, in implementing EO 12993, will 
ensure timeliness, fairness, and consistency in conducting, and reporting, investiga-
tions and other activities. 
II. Receipt and Initial Screening of Allegations 
A. Receipt of Complaints 

The  IC  receives  complaints  containing  allegations  from  a  variety  of  sources, 
among  them  private  citizens  and  government  officials.  The  IC  will  respond  to  all 
named  complainants  in  writing,  advising  them  that  the  allegations  have  been  re-
ceived.  In  the  IC’s  reply,  complainants  will  generally  be  advised  that  the  IC  con-
centrates  its  efforts  on  allegations  of  serious  misconduct  by  an  IG  or  an  OIG  staff 
member under the circumstances described in EO 12993. Complainants will also be 
advised that the IC will refer cases to other investigative bodies, close cases, or take 
other  actions  consistent  with  its  discretionary  powers  under  EO  12993.  Complain-
ants  may  contact  the  IC  in  writing  to  learn  the  status  of  a  pending  case;  however, 
details of pending investigations will not be provided. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

B. Screening of Complaints by the Working Group 

1. Initial Review. The working group of the IC will conduct a timely, initial review 
of  the  complaint  to  determine  whether  the  allegations  made  are  credible  and  not 
frivolous,  and  fall  within  the  IC’s  jurisdiction  under  EO  12993.  Based  on  that  re-
view, a course of action for every allegation will be recommended to the IC for con-
sideration  at  the  next  scheduled  IC  meeting.  The  working  group  may  conduct,  or 
cause to be conducted, administrative inquiries to obtain additional information. 

(a)  Not  Within  Jurisdiction  of  the  IC.  If  an  allegation  of  misconduct  does  not 
fall  within  the  jurisdiction  of  the  IC  and/or  is  frivolous  or  lacks  credibility,  the 
working  group  will  recommend  to  the  IC  that  a  letter  be  sent  to  the  complain-
ant advising of that determination and that no further action will be taken con-
cerning the complaint. 
(b)  Within  Jurisdiction  of  the  IC.  If  a  credible,  nonfrivolous  allegation  of  mis-
conduct  falls  within  the  jurisdiction  of  the  IC,  the  working  group  will  refer  the 
complaint containing the allegation to the Public Integrity Section of the Crimi-
nal Division of the Department of Justice for a determination of potential crimi-
nality. 

2. Assignment of Case File Number. A document containing allegations will be as-
signed a file number as a record of the IC for indexing purposes in the FBI Central 
Records System. 
C. Determinations by the Public Integrity Section 

The  Public  Integrity  Section  will  review  each  complaint  referred  by  the  working 
group  of  the  IC  to  determine  whether  it  presents  information  sufficient  to  warrant 
a  criminal  investigation.  The  working  group  will  maintain  the  case  file  containing 
the  complaint  in  a  pending  status  until  the  conclusion  of  the  Public  Integrity  Sec-
tion’s review. When a criminal investigation has been conducted, the IC Chairperson 
may  request  that  the  investigative  authority  provide,  for  IC  review,  a  summary  re-
port  of  the  results  of  the  investigation  as  it  relates  to  the  jurisdiction  of  the  IC.  If 
during, or after, IC review of the matter, the IC Chairperson determines that addi-
tional  information  should  be  considered  by  the  Public  Integrity  Section,  the  IC 
Chairperson will refer such information to the Public Integrity Section and maintain 
the allegation in a pending status. 
D. Definitions 

‘‘Frivolous allegations’’ means those allegations that would not constitute criminal 

violations or administrative misconduct, even if they prove to be true. 

‘‘Administrative  misconduct’’  means  noncriminal  misconduct,  or  misconduct  that 
the  Public  Integrity  Section  declines  to  pursue  on  a  criminal  basis,  that  evidences 
a  violation  of  any  law,  rule,  or  regulation;  or  gross  mismanagement;  gross  waste  of 
funds;  or  abuse  of  authority,  in  the  exercise  of  official  duties  or  while  acting  under 
color of office. 

‘‘Working  group’’  means  agency  staff  associated  with  the  Chairperson  of  the  IC, 
who  is  the  FBI’s  representative  to  the  PCIE.  All  IC  correspondence  is  handled  by 
the working group. 

‘‘Agency  head’’  means  the  head  of  a  department,  agency,  or  Federal  entity;  or  an 
IG  who  has  referred  allegations  against  a  subordinate  to  the  IC  for  investigation. 
III. IC Meetings 
A. Administrative Details 

1. Membership. The IC is composed of the following members: a Chairperson, who 
is  the  FBI  official  designated  by  the  Director  of  the  FBI  to  serve  on  the  PCIE;  the 
Special  Counsel  of  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel;  the  Director  of  the  Office  of  Gov-
ernment Ethics; and three, or more, IGs, representing both the PCIE and the ECIE, 
appointed by the PCIE/ECIE Chairperson. The Chief of the Public Integrity Section 
of  the  Department  of  Justice,  or  his  designee,  attends  the  meetings  in  an  advisory 
capacity. 

2.  Frequency  of  Meetings.  The  IC  will  meet  at  least  once  each  quarter  to  review 
the status of all pending cases. More frequent meetings may be called at the discre-
tion  of  the  IC’s  chairperson.  It  is  expected  that  an  IC  member  will  miss  no  more 
than two meetings a year. 

3. Location of Meetings. IC meetings will be held at a location agreed upon by the 

members, usually at an IC member’s agency. 

4.  Records  of  Meetings.  A  written  agenda  of  each  meeting,  and  decisions  made 

pursuant to each agenda item, will be made and retained as a record of the IC. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

B. Review of Allegations 

1.  New  Allegations.  The  working  group  will  provide  a  report  to  the  IC  describing 
allegations  of  administrative  misconduct.  The  report  will  also  list  any  new  allega-
tions unrelated to the allegations determined by the Public Integrity Section to war-
rant criminal investigation. In handling an allegation of administrative misconduct, 
the IC must: 

(a) determine whether the allegation is within its jurisdiction; 

Allegations  that  may  be  outside  the  IC’s  review  authority  include  general, 
nonspecific  complaints  about  the  effectiveness  of  a  particular  IG.  Those 
issues can be referred to other officials, as appropriate. 

(b) determine whether further investigation is necessary; 

Some  allegations  received  by  the  IC  may  not  warrant  further  investigation 
and,  therefore,  the  IC  may  choose  to  take  no  further  investigative  action. 
The  IC  Chairperson  will  notify  the  complainant  in  writing  of  the  IC’s  deci-
sion. 

(c)  determine  whether  there  is  an  Executive  Branch  agency  with  appropriate  ju-
risdiction over the matter to conduct an investigation; and 

For  example,  equal  employment  opportunity  complaints  are  referred  to  the 
Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, while allegations of illegal po-
litical  activity,  whistleblower  retaliation,  or  prohibited  personnel  practices 
are referred to the Office of Special Counsel, or another agency as provided 
by law. In accord with Section 4(b) of EO 12993, the IC will request a sum-
mary  of  the  findings  from  the  investigative  authority  to  which  complaints 
have been referred. 

(d) determine how to handle investigations that do not fall within the investiga-
tive jurisdiction of another Executive Branch agency. 

EO  12993  allows  the  IC  to  request  that  the  FBI  conduct  such  investiga-
tions,  or  that  such  investigations  be  conducted  by  uninvolved  OIGs  under 
the  control  and  supervision  of  the  IC  Chairperson.  Should  an  investigation 
by such an OIG be required, the IC Chairperson, with the assistance of the 
PCIE/ECIE  Chairperson  if  necessary,  will  request  the  assistance  of  IGs 
whose personnel have the requisite expertise. OIG investigators will be as-
signed to the IC with funding for the investigation provided in accord with 
EO 12993. 

2. Allegations Currently Under Investigation. The IC may review the status of any 
investigations currently under way and will request expeditious and appropriate ac-
tion, where necessary. 

3.  Allegations  for  Which  an  Investigation  Report  Has  Been  Issued.  When  the  IG 
receives  an  investigative  report,  it  must  determine  whether  the  report  establishes 
any  misconduct  on  the  part  of  the  subject  of  the  investigation.  If  the  report  does 
not establish misconduct, the IC will close the matter and so notify the PCIE/ECIE 
Chairperson.  The  IC  may  also  choose  to  forward  such  a  report  to  the  PCIE/ECIE 
Chairperson  and  suggest  that  the  Chairperson  share  the  report  with  the  subject’s 
agency  head,  and/or  the  subject,  where  appropriate  (for  example,  where  the  allega-
tion  has  become  generally  known  and  is  now  disproved  or  was  initially  referred  to 
the  IC  by  the  agency  head).  However,  if,  in  the  IC’s  opinion,  the  report  does  estab-
lish  misconduct  or  otherwise  requires  action,  the  IC  shall  refer  the  report  to  the 
PCIE/ECIE Chairperson with recommendations for appropriate action. 
C.  Notification  to  Complainants,  Subjects,  and  Subjects’  Agency  Heads  of  IC  Deci-

sions 

Notice  of  the  IC’s  decisions  to  close,  refer,  or  initiate  investigations  of  allegations 
will  be  provided  to  the  complainant,  the  subject,  and  the  subject’s  agency  head, 
when, and if, appropriate. Each may request in writing from the IC a general status 
update  while  the  case  is  open.  However,  the  IC  will  not  provide  details  on  pending 
investigations. 
D. Review and Transmittal of Investigative Reports 

EO 12993 requires that the IC forward to the PCIE/ECIE Chairperson investiga-
tive  reports  with  IC  recommendations  for  further  action  if  the  results  of  the  par-
ticular  investigation  warrant  such  recommendations.  The  PCIE/ECIE  Chairperson 
will then work with appropriate offices based on the investigative findings and rec-
ommendations  of  the  IC.  The  PCIE/ECIE  Chairperson  may,  when  he  or  she  deems 
appropriate,  forward  these  findings  and  recommendations  to  the  appropriate  par-
ties, such as agency heads of the subjects of the reports. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

93 

E. Disposition of Agency Head Reports 

1. Receipt From PCIE/ECIE Chairperson. The PCIE/ECIE Chairperson is respon-
sible  for  forwarding  to  the  IC  the  agency  heads  reports  on  any  actions  taken  in  re-
sponse  to  the  investigative  findings.  In  accord  with  section  4(d)  of  EO  12993,  an 
agency  head  has  sixty  days  to  review  an  investigative  report,  take  action  or  decide 
on a course of action, and to so notify the PCIE/ECIE chairperson. The PCIE/ECIE 
chairperson  may  choose  to  extend  that  time  limit  for  another  thirty  days,  if  nec-
essary. 

2.  IC  Review.  The  IC  will  review  the  course  of  action  taken  by  the  agency  head 
concerning the investigative findings, and if the IC believes that the action was ap-
propriate,  it  will  close  the  matter.  If  the  IC  has  concerns  regarding  the  action,  it 
may  so  advise  the  PCIE/ECIE  Chairperson  and  suggest  an  alternative.  However, 
the IC has no power to compel any particular action. 
IV. Policy Review 
A. The IC Chairperson 

As Chairperson of the IC, the FBI representative to the PCIE/ECIE is the Federal 
official  with  primary  responsibility  for:  (1)  the  effective  conduct  of  the  IC;  and  (2) 
responses  to  inquiries  regarding  allegations  received  from  Executive,  Legislative, 
and  Judicial  Branch  officials,  in  a  manner  consistent  with  applicable  law.  The  IC 
Chairperson oversees the working group, the quality of IC investigative reports, and 
discretionary  determinations.  The  IC  Chairperson  is  also  responsible  for  the  timeli-
ness  of  IC  actions;  and  IC  (and/or  IC-led  FBI)  investigations.  The  IC  Chairperson 
may recommend changes to the IC procedures as he or she finds necessary. The IC 
Chairperson will also issue an annual report to the PCIE/ECIE Chairperson on the 
status of complaints received by the IC. 
B. The Chairperson and Vice Chairpersons of the PCIE/ECIE 

The PCIE/ECIE Chairperson and Vice Chairpersons provide guidance and support 
to  the  Chairperson  of  the  IC.  After  the  completion  of  IC  action  on  a  matter  within 
its jurisdiction, the PCIE/ECIE Chairperson and Vice Chairpersons may review with 
an IG, or with other appropriate parties, any allegations which appear to constitute 
a pattern of misconduct or gross mismanagement in a particular OIG. 
V. Maintenance of IC Records 
A. The Central Records System 

1. Content of Records. All documents received or transmitted by the IC in fulfilling 
its  responsibilities  under  EO  12993  (including,  but  not  limited  to,  written  com-
plaints making allegations against IGs; IC correspondence; reports of administrative 
misconduct investigations; reports of final actions taken with regard to proven alle-
gations;  and  memoranda  providing  the  final  dispositions  of  allegations  determined 
to be frivolous, outside the jurisdiction of the IC, or otherwise closed without further 
investigation)  will  be  collected  and  maintained  as  IC  records  in  the  FBI’s  Central 
Records  System.  The  Central  Records  System  consists  of  a  numerical  sequence  of 
subject matter files and an index. 

2.  Criminal  Investigative  Files  Not  Included  as  Integrity  Committee  Records.  The 
Integrity  Committee  records  will  not  include  any  criminal  investigative  files  with 
general  investigative  information  arising  out  of  Public  Integrity  Section  referrals  of 
criminal allegations to the FBI. However, Integrity Committee records may contain 
information from criminal investigative files when such information is the source of 
the  alleged  administrative  misconduct.  The  FBI’s  criminal  investigative  files  are 
maintained in the Central Records System under the subject matter of the criminal 
violation, and, therefore, will be separate from IC records. 
B. Disclosure of Information Under the Freedom of Information Act 

Third party requests (requests by individuals other than the IG or OIG staff mem-
ber, who is the subject of the allegation) for information will be processed pursuant 
to  the  Freedom  of  Information  Act  (FOIA)  (Title  5,  U.S.C.,  Section  562),  in  accord 
with applicable law; regulations implementing the FOIA at Title 28, C.F.R. Part 16, 
Subpart A; and FBI FOIA policy and procedures. 
C. Privacy Act Protection 

1.  Restrictions  on  Disclosure.  The  records  of  the  IC  will  he  maintained  in  accord 
with the Privacy Act of 1974 (Title 5, U.S.C., Section 552a), which restricts the dis-
closure  of  all  records  contained  in  a  system  of  records  maintained  by  an  Executive 
Branch  agency  and  retrieved  by  an  individual’s  name  or  a  personal  identifier,  such 
as  a  Social  Security  Number.  The  records  may  be  disclosed  only  in  response  to  the 
written request of, or with the prior written consent of, the individual, to whom the 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

94 

record  pertains,  or  under  the  conditions  specifically  set  forth  in  the  Act  at  Section 
552a(b). 

2.  Access  by  Individuals  to  Their  Own  Records.  Procedures  for  access  by  individ-
uals  to  their  own  records  have  been  established  by  the  Privacy  Act  and  in  regula-
tions  implementing  the  Act  at  Title  28,  C.F.R.,  Part  16,  Subpart  D.  All  disclosures 
of information requested from the IC records will be coordinated with the IC. 
D. Physical Maintenance of Records 

1.  Retention  of  Records  The  records  of  the  IC  will  be  maintained  by  the  working 

group in a restricted area. 

2.  Disposal  of  Records.  FBI  record  disposition  programs  relevant  to  the  Central 
Records  System  are  conducted  under  the  FBI  Records  Retention  Plan  and  Disposi-
tion  schedule  approved  by  the  Archivist  of  the  United  States  and  U.S.  District 
Court, District of Columbia. Administrative records at Headquarters which meet the 
destruction criteria are destroyed after a period of 10 years or when administrative 
needs have expired, whichever is later. 
Approved: William J. Esposito
Chairman 
Integrity Committee of the President’s Council on Integrity and Efficiency 

Date: 4/24/97 

QUALITY STANDARDS FOR FEDERAL OFFICES OF INSPECTOR GENERAL 

President’s Council on Integrity and Efficiency 
Executive Council on Integrity and Efficiency; dated 
October 2003 
Foreword 

On  the  25th  anniversary  of  the  enactment  of  the  Inspector  General  Act  of  1978, 
as  amended,  the  members  of  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency 
(PCIE)  and  the  Executive  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (ECIE)  have  updated 
the Quality Standards for Federal Offices of Inspector General. To commemorate the 
anniversary,  we  are  issuing  this  update  with  a  silver  cover.  The  standards  in  the 
Silver  Book  set  forth  the  overall  quality  framework  for  managing,  operating,  and 
conducting  the  work  of  Offices  of  Inspector  General  and  will  guide  the  Inspector 
General Community’s efforts into the future. 
GASTON L. GIANNI, JR. 
Vice Chair, PCIE 
Contents 
I. Introduction 

BARRY SNYDER 
Vice Chair, ECIE 

A. Purpose 
B. OIG Mission 
C. Relationship to Federal Legislation and Regulations, and Federal and Profes-
sional Standards 

II. Ethics, Independence, and Confidentiality 

A. General Standard 
B. Standards for Ethical Conduct for Employees of the Executive Branch 
C. Independence 
D. Confidentiality 

III. Professional Standards 

A. General Standard 

IV. Ensuring Internal Control 

A. General Standard 
B. Efficient and Effective Operations 
C. Control Environment 
D. Risk Assessment 
E. Control Activities 
F. Information and Communication 
G. Monitoring 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

95 

V. Maintaining Quality Assurance 

A. General Standard 
B. Quality Assurance Program 
C. Elements of an Internal Quality Assurance Program 
D. Elements of an External Quality Assurance Program 

VI. Planning and Coordinating 

A. General Standard 
B. Elements of the Planning Process 
C. Coordination Considerations 
D. Prevention 

VII. Communicating Results of OIG Activities 

A. General Standard 
B. Keeping the Head of the Agency Informed 
C. Keeping the Congress Informed 
D. Keeping the Congress and Agency Informed on Performance 
E. Keeping Program Managers Informed 
F. Keeping Ethics Officials Informed 
G. Keeping the Attorney General Informed 
H. Elements of Effective Reporting 

VIII. Managing Human Capital 

A. General Standard 
B. Human Capital Processes 
C. Core Competencies 
D. Skills Assessment 

IX. Reviewing Legislation and Regulations 

A. General Standard 
B. Elements of Legislative and Regulatory Review 

X. Receiving and Reviewing Allegations 

A. General Standard 
B. Elements of a System for Receiving and Reviewing Allegations 
C. Feedback 

Appendix I 

Legislation, Executive Orders, Standards, and OMB and Other Guidance Impact-

ing the Inspector General Community 
Appendix II 

Members of the PCIE/ECIE Advisory Committee to Revise the Quality Standards 

for Federal Offices of Inspector General 

QUALITY STANDARDS FOR FEDERAL OFFICES OF INSPECTOR GENERAL 

I. Introduction 
A. Purpose 

This  document  contains  quality  standards  for  the  management,  operation,  and 
conduct  of  the  Federal  Offices  of  Inspector  General  (OIG).  Executive  Order  12805 
gives  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (PCIE)  and  the  Executive 
Council on Integrity and Efficiency (ECIE) 1 the responsibility for developing profes-
sional  standards  for  OIGs.2 The  members  of  the  PCIE  and  ECIE  have  formulated 
and  adopted  these  standards.  They  are  for  OIG  use  to  guide  the  conduct  of  official 
duties in a professional manner. These standards incorporate by reference the exist-
ing professional standards for audit, investigation, and inspection and evaluation ef-
forts. 

Public  office  carries  with  it  a  responsibility  to  apply  and  account  for  the  use  of 
public  resources  economically,  efficiently,  and  effectively.3 The  OIGs  have  a  special 
need  for  high  standards  of  professionalism  and  integrity  in  light  of  the  mission  of 
the  Inspectors  General  under  the  Act.4 Because  of  this  special  need,  the  PCIE  and 
ECIE have adopted the general quality standards contained in this document. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

96 

B. OIG Mission 

OIGs have responsibility to report on current performance and accountability and 
to foster good program management to ensure effective government operations. The 
Inspector General Act of 1978 (IG Act), as amended, created the OIGs to: 5 

1.  Conduct,  supervise,  and  coordinate  audits  and  investigations  relating  to  the 
programs and operations of their agencies; 
2.  Review  existing  and  proposed  legislation  and  regulations  to  make  rec-
ommendations  concerning  the  impact  of  such  legislation  and  regulations  on 
economy and efficiency or the prevention and detection of fraud and abuse; 
3. Provide leadership for activities designed to promote economy, efficiency, and 
effectiveness,  and  to  promote  efforts  to  reduce  fraud,  waste,  and  abuse  in  the 
programs and operations of their agencies; 
4.  Coordinate  relationships  between  the  agency  and  other  Federal  agencies, 
State  and  local  government  agencies,  and  non-government  agencies  to  promote 
economy  and  efficiency,  to  prevent  and  detect  fraud  and  abuse,  or  to  identify 
and prosecute participants engaged in fraud or abuse; 
5.  Inform  their  agency  heads  and  Congress  of  problems  in  their  agencies’  pro-
grams  and  operations  and  the  necessity  for  and  progress  of  corrective  actions; 
and 
6.  Report  to  the  Attorney  General  whenever  the  Inspector  General  has  reason-
able grounds to believe there has been a violation of Federal criminal law. 

In  addition  to  audits  and  investigations  referenced  in  item  1  above,  OIGs  may 
conduct,  supervise,  and  coordinate  inspections,  evaluations,  and  other  reviews  re-
lated to the programs and operations of their agencies. 
C.  Relationship  to  Federal  Legislation  and  Regulations,  and  Federal  and  Profes-

sional Standards 

OIG operations are subject to a variety of Federal legislation and regulations, and 
Federal  and  other  professional  standards,  such  as  the  IG  Act,  Single  Audit  Act, 
Standards  of  Ethical  Conduct  for  Employees  of  the  Executive  Branch,  the  Govern-
ment  Auditing  Standards,  the  PCIE  Quality  Standards  for  Inspections,  and  the 
PCIE/ECIE  Quality  Standards  for  Investigations.  The  standards  contained  in  this 
document are derived from these and other requirements. However, these standards 
are  not  intended  to  contradict  or  supersede  applicable  standards  or  Federal  laws 
and regulations. See Appendix I for a list of major laws, regulations, and standards 
that apply to OIGs. 

An OIG may be a component of an entity that is not legally defined as a ‘‘Federal 
agency.’’  For  this  reason,  or  other  reasons,  certain  laws,  regulations,  or  other  guid-
ance  cited  in  this  document  may  not  be  directly  applicable  to  certain  OIGs.  Where 
a standard contained in this document is premised on law or other criteria that are 
not  directly  applicable  to  an  OIG,  OIGs  are  encouraged  to  adopt  the  underlying 
principles and concepts to their operations where appropriate and feasible. 
II. Ethics, Independence, and Confidentiality 
A. General Standard 6 

The Inspector General and OIG staff shall adhere to the highest ethical principles 

by conducting their work with integrity.7 

Integrity is the cornerstone of all ethical conduct, ensuring adherence to accepted 
codes  of  ethics  and  practice.  Objectivity,  independence,  professional  judgment,  and 
confidentiality are all elements of integrity. 

Objectivity  imposes  the  obligation  to  be  impartial,  intellectually  honest,  and  free 

of conflicts of interest. 

Independence  is  a  critical  element  of  objectivity.  Without  independence,  both  in 

fact and in appearance, objectivity is impaired. 

Professional  judgment  requires  working  with  competence  and  diligence.  Com-
petence  is  a  combination  of  education  and  experience  and  involves  a  commitment 
to  learning  and  professional  improvement.  Professional  standards  for  audits,  inves-
tigations, and inspections and evaluations require continuing professional education 
(see  the  Managing  Human  Capital  standard).  Diligence  requires  that  services  be 
rendered promptly, carefully, and thoroughly and by observing the applicable profes-
sional and ethical standards. 

Confidentiality  requires  respecting  the  value  and  ownership  of  privileged,  con-
fidential,  or  classified  information  received  and  protecting  that  information,  and 
safeguarding the identity of confidential informants. In some instances, legal or pro-
fessional obligations may require an OIG to disclose information it has received. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

B. Standards for Ethical Conduct for Employees of the Executive Branch 

97 

The  Inspector  General  and  OIG  staff  shall  follow  the  Standards  for  Ethical  Con-
duct  for  Employees  of  the  Executive  Branch 8 (Ethical  Standards)  and  the  Federal 
conflict  of  interest  laws.9 These  standards  require  the  Inspector  General  and  the 
OIG  staff  to  respect  and  adhere  to  the  14  principles  of  ethical  conduct,  as  well  as 
the  implementing  standards  contained  in  the  Ethical  Standards  and  in  supple-
mental  agency  regulations.10 The  first  principle  emphasizes  that  public  service  is  a 
public trust, requiring employees to place loyalty to the Constitution, laws, and eth-
ical principles above private gain. 

Executive  Order  12993  (‘‘Administrative  Allegations  Against  Inspectors  Gen-
eral’’) 11 provides  an  independent  investigative  mechanism  to  ensure  that  adminis-
trative  allegations  against  IGs  and  OIG  senior  staff  are  expeditiously  investigated 
and  resolved.  The  Order  establishes  a  PCIE/ECIE  Integrity  Committee  to  receive, 
review, and refer such allegations. OIGs should maintain policies and controls to en-
sure  that  allegations  are  handled  consistent  with  the  executive  order.  OIGs  should 
also  have  in  place  policies  and  procedures  to  ensure  that  criminal  allegations 
against  the  IG  or  senior  OIG  staff  are  appropriately  referred  to  the  Attorney  Gen-
eral. 

Where  a  situation  is  not  covered  by  a  specific  standard  set  forth  in  the  Ethical 
Standards  or  in  supplemental  agency  regulations,  the  Inspector  General  and  OIG 
staff  shall  apply  the  principles  underlying  the  standards  in  determining  whether 
their  planned  or  actual  conduct  is  proper.12 OIG  staff  should  also  consult  with  the 
Designated Agency Ethics Official or similar official within their agency or organiza-
tion regarding application of the Ethical Standards. 
C. Independence 

The  Inspector  General  and  OIG  staff  must  be  free  both  in  fact  and  appearance 
from  personal,  external,  and  organizational  impairments  to  independence.  The  In-
spector  General  and  OIG  staff  have  a  responsibility  to  maintain  independence,  so 
that  opinions,  conclusions,  judgments,  and  recommendations  will  be  impartial  and 
will  be  viewed  as  impartial  by  knowledgeable  third  parties.  The  Inspector  General 
and  OIG  staff  should  avoid  situations  that  could  lead  reasonable  third  parties  with 
knowledge  of  the  relevant  facts  and  circumstances  to  conclude  that  the  OIG  is  not 
able to maintain independence in conducting its work. 
1. Statutory Independence 

The IG Act of 1978, as amended, established OIGs to create organizationally inde-
pendent  and  objective  units.  This  statutory  independence  is  intended  to  ensure  the 
integrity and objectivity of OIG activities. The IG Act of 1978, as amended, author-
izes Inspectors General to: 

a.  Conduct  such  audits  and  investigations,  and  issue  such  reports,  as  they  be-
lieve  appropriate  (with  limited  national  security  and  law  enforcement  excep-
tions).13 
b. Issue subpoenas for information and documents outside the agency (with the 
same limited exceptions).14 
c. Have direct access to all records and information of the agency.15 
d. Have ready access to the agency head.16 
e. Administer oaths for taking testimony.17 
f. Hire and control their own staff and contract resources.18 
g.  Request  assistance  from  any  Federal,  state,  or  local  governmental  agency  or 
unit.19 

Inspectors General report both to the head of their respective agencies and to the 
Congress.20 This  dual  reporting  responsibility  is  the  framework  within  which  In-
spectors  General  perform  their  functions.  Unique  in  government,  dual  reporting  is 
the legislative safety net that protects the Inspector General’s independence and ob-
jectivity. 
2. Personal Impairments 

Personal  impairments  of  staff  members  result  from  relationships  and  beliefs  that 
might  cause  OIG  staff  members  to  limit  the  extent  of  an  inquiry,  limit  disclosure, 
or  weaken  or  slant  their  work  in  any  way.  OIG  staff  are  responsible  for  notifying 
the appropriate officials within their organization if they have any personal impair-
ments to independence. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

98 

3. External Impairments 

Factors external to the OIG may restrict the work or interfere with an OIG’s abil-
ity  to  form  independent  and  objective  opinions  and  conclusions.  External  impair-
ments to independence occur when the OIG staff is deterred from acting objectively 
and exercising professional skepticism by pressures, actual or perceived, from man-
agement  and  employees  of  the  reviewed  entity  or  oversight  organizations.  OIGs 
should  have  policies  and  procedures  in  place  to  resolve  or  report  external  impair-
ments to independence when they exist. 

These impairments could include, but are not limited to, the following: 21 

a. external interference or influence that could improperly or imprudently limit 
or modify the scope of OIG work or threaten to do so, including pressure to re-
duce  inappropriately  the  extent  of  work  performed  in  order  to  reduce  costs  or 
fees; 
b. external interference with the selection or application of OIG procedures, the 
selection of transactions to be examined, or access to records or personnel; 
c.  unreasonable  restrictions  on  the  time  allowed  to  complete  OIG  work  or  re-
ports; 
d. interference external to the OIG in the assignment, appointment, promotion, 
or termination of OIG personnel; 
e. restrictions on funds or other resources provided to the OIG organization that 
adversely affect the OIG’s ability to carry out its responsibilities; 
f.  authority  to  overrule  or  to  inappropriately  influence  OIG  judgment  as  to  the 
appropriate content of reports; 
g.  threat  of  replacement  over  a  disagreement  with  the  contents  of  an  OIG  re-
port, conclusions, or the application of an accounting principle or other criteria; 
and 
h.  influences  that  jeopardize  the  continued  employment  of  the  IG  or  other  OIG 
staff other than incompetence, misconduct, or the need for OIG services. 

4. Types of Services 

Auditors and audit organizations within OIGs have a specific independence stand-
ard 22 required  by  Government  Auditing  Standards.  This  standard  requires  that, 
while auditors have the capability of performing a range of services for their clients, 
in some circumstances it is not appropriate for them to perform both audit and cer-
tain nonaudit services for the same client. The standard is based on two overarching 
principles: 

a. Auditors should not perform management functions or make management de-
cisions; and 
b. Auditors should not audit their own work or provide nonaudit services in sit-
uations  where  the  amounts  or  services  involved  are  significant/material  to  the 
subject matter of the audit. 

In  addition  to  its  application  to  OIG  audit  activities,  the  first  overarching  prin-
ciple should be applied broadly to all OIG activities. Specifically, OIG staff, and oth-
ers  under  OIG  direction,  should  not  perform  management  functions  or  make  man-
agement decisions for their agency. 

OIG audit organizations should take steps to ensure that auditors under contract 

to the OIG do not have independence impairments. 
5. Conflicting Financial Interests 

An OIG staff member’s objectivity and independence may also be affected by per-
sonal  financial  interests  that  are  held  by  the  staff  member  or  by  certain  family 
members,  or  by  positions  the  staff  member  holds  as  a  trustee,  director,  officer,  or 
employee  of  an  outside  organization.  OIG  staff  should  notify  appropriate  officials 
within their organization if they have a potentially conflicting financial interest. 
D. Confidentiality 

Each  OIG  shall  safeguard  the  identity  of  confidential  sources  and  protect  privi-
leged,  confidential,  and  national  security  or  classified  information  in  compliance 
with applicable laws, regulations, and professional standards. 

Congress  has  provided  specific  authority  for  withholding  the  identities  of  agency 
employees who make complaints to the OIG. Under Section 7 of the IG Act of 1978, 
as  amended,  the  OIG  may  receive  and  investigate  complaints  or  information  from 
employees  concerning  the  possible  existence  of  an  activity  constituting  a  violation 
of  law,  rules,  or  regulations;  mismanagement;  waste  of  funds;  abuse  of  authority; 
or  a  substantial  and  specific  danger  to  the  public  health  or  safety.  The  Inspector 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

99 

General  shall  not,  after  receipt  of  such  complaint  or  information,  disclose  the  iden-
tity of the agency employee without the consent of the employee, unless the Inspec-
tor General determines that such disclosure is unavoidable. 

The  Freedom  of  Information  Act,  the  Privacy  Act,  the  Civil  Service  Reform  Act, 
the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act,23 the Trade Secrets Act,24 
and  other  Federal  statutes  and  case  law  provide  certain  protections  for  the  identi-
ties of sources and for sensitive information obtained. Additionally, the relevant pro-
fessional  standards  provide  guidance  on  the  use,  protection,  and  reporting  of  privi-
leged  and  confidential  information.  OIGs  must  follow  the  guidance  contained  in 
these authorities. 
III. Professional Standards 
A. General Standard 

Each  OIG  shall  conduct,  supervise,  and  coordinate  its  audits,  investigations,  in-
spections, and evaluations in compliance with the applicable professional standards 
listed below. 

For audits: Government Auditing Standards, issued by the U.S. General Account-

ing Office (GAO). 

For  investigations:  Quality  Standards  for  Investigations,  accepted  by  the  PCIE 

and ECIE and consistent with appropriate Department of Justice directives. 

For  inspections  and  evaluations:  Quality  Standards  for  Inspections,  accepted  by 
the  PCIE  and  ECIE,  Government  Auditing  Standards,  or  other  appropriate  profes-
sional standards. 
IV. Ensuring Internal Control 
A. General Standard 

The Inspector General and OIG staff shall direct and control OIG operations con-
sistent with the Standards for Internal Control in the Federal Government 25 issued 
by  the  GAO.  These  standards  require  that  internal  control  be  part  of  an  entity’s 
management  infrastructure  to  provide  reasonable  assurance  that  (1)  operations  are 
efficient  and  effective;  (2)  financial  reporting  is  reliable;  and  (3)  operations  are  in 
compliance with applicable laws, regulations, and professional standards. 

Internal control is a continuous built-in component of operations, effected by peo-
ple,  that  provides  reasonable  but  not  absolute  assurance,  that  the  OIG’s  objectives 
will be met. Internal control considerations include the following: 
B. Efficient and Effective Operations 

OIGs  should  strive  to  conduct  their  operation  in  the  most  efficient  and  effective 
manner.  Each  OIG  should  manage  available  resources  at  the  least  cost  to  produce 
the greatest results in terms of public benefit, return on investment, and risk reduc-
tion.  OIGs  derive  much  of  their  credibility  to  perform  their  work  by  demonstrating 
the ability to efficiently and effectively use and account for public funds. 
C. Control Environment 

OIG  management  and  staff  should  establish  and  maintain  an  environment 
throughout  the  organization  that  fosters  a  positive  and  supportive  attitude  toward 
internal control and conscientious management. Key factors affecting the control en-
vironment include the following: 

1.  Integrity  and  ethical  values  maintained  and  demonstrated  by  OIG  manage-
ment  and  staff,  the  organizational  structure  and  delegations  of  authority  and 
responsibility, and OIG management’s philosophy and operating style. 
2.  OIG  management’s  commitment  to  competence  and  human  capital  policies 
and practices (see the Managing Human Capital standard). 
3. OIG management’s relationship with the Congress, their agency, and the Of-
fice of Management and Budget (OMB). 

D. Risk Assessment 

The Inspector General should provide for an assessment of the risks the OIG faces 
from  both  external  and  internal  sources.  Risk  assessment  includes  identifying  and 
analyzing  relevant  risks  associated  with  achieving  the  OIG’s  objectives,  such  as 
those  defined  in  strategic  and  annual  performance  plans,  and  forming  a  basis  for 
determining  how  risks  should  be  managed.  Risk  assessment  methodologies  and  the 
formality  of  their  documentation  may  vary  from  OIG  to  OIG,  depending  on  the 
OIG’s size, mission, and other factors. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

100 

E. Control Activities 

The  Inspector  General  should  establish  and  implement  internal  control  activities 
that ensure the OIG’s directives are carried out. The control activities should be ef-
fective and efficient in accomplishing the OIG’s control objectives. 

Control  activities  are  the  policies,  procedures,  techniques,  and  mechanisms  that 
enforce management’s directives. Control activities are an integral part of the plan-
ning,  implementing,  reviewing,  and  accountability  activities.  Control  activities  in-
clude  supervisory  reviews  at  all  levels  to  ensure  compliance  with  applicable  profes-
sional standards, controls over information processing, physical control over vulner-
able  assets,  establishing  and  reviewing  performance  measures  and  indicators,  and 
segregation of duties. 
F. Information and Communication 

The  Inspector  General  should  ensure  that  information  is  recorded  and  commu-
nicated  to  internal  OIG  management  and  others  within  the  OIG  who  need  it  and 
in  a  form  and  within  a  time-frame  that  enables  them  to  carry  out  their  internal 
quality control and other responsibilities. 

For  the  OIG  to  control  its  operations,  it  must  have  relevant,  reliable,  and  timely 
communications  relating  to  internal  and  external  events.  Information  is  needed 
throughout the OIG to achieve all of its objectives. 
G. Monitoring 

The Inspector General should ensure that monitoring assesses the quality of per-
formance  over  time  and  ensures  that  the  findings  and  recommendations  of  quality 
assurance and other reviews are promptly resolved. 

The  monitoring  standard  discusses  three  different  types  of  activities:  ongoing 
monitoring,  self-assessment  evaluations,  and  quality  assurance  reviews.  Ongoing 
monitoring occurs in the course of normal operations and is continuous. Self-assess-
ment  evaluations  and  independent  external  reviews  can  be  useful  in  focusing  di-
rectly  on  the  controls’  effectiveness  at  a  specific  time.26 The  scope  and  frequency  of 
these  independent  reviews  should  depend  primarily  on  the  assessment  of  risks  and 
the effectiveness of ongoing control monitoring procedures. 

1. Ongoing monitoring occurs in the course of normal operations. It is performed 
continually  and  is  ingrained  in  the  agency  operations.  It  includes  regular  man-
agement and supervisory activities,27 comparisons, reconciliations, and other ac-
tions employees take in performing their duties. Ongoing monitoring should in-
clude  policies  and  procedures  for  ensuring  that  the  findings  of  separate  quality 
control evaluations and quality assurance reviews are promptly resolved. 
2.  Self-assessment  evaluations,  conducted  by  the  unit  or  activity  itself,  include 
a reassessment of the risks associated with a particular activity and can include 
periodic reviews of control design and direct testing of internal controls, depend-
ing on the risk associated with the activity. 
3.  Independent  external  reviews  are  conducted  by  sources  not  assigned  to  the 
unit  being  reviewed.  These  reviews  are  distinct  from  ongoing  management  and 
supervision,  and  encompass  the  entirety  of  internal  control,  including  adminis-
trative  operations  and  professional  services  (audits,  investigations,  inspections, 
and  evaluations).  Quality  assurance  is  intended  to  assess  the  internal  controls 
of  the  entire  OIG  or  specific  OIG  components.  The  Quality  Assurance  Program 
is  a  type  of  independent  review  that  focuses  on  complying  with  professional 
standards  in  conducting  professional  services  (see  the  Maintaining  Quality  As-
surance standard). 

V. Maintaining Quality Assurance 
A. General Standard 28 

Each  OIG  shall  establish  and  maintain  a  quality  assurance  program  to  ensure 
that  work  performed  adheres  to  established  OIG  policies  and  procedures;  meets  es-
tablished standards of performance, including applicable professional standards; and 
is carried out economically, efficiently, and effectively. 

External quality assurance reviews provide OIGs with added assurance regarding 
their  adherence  to  prescribed  standards,  regulations,  and  legislation  through  a  for-
mal  objective  assessment  of  OIG  operations.  OIGs  are  strongly  encouraged  to  have 
external  quality  assurance  reviews  of  audits,  investigations,  inspections,  evalua-
tions,  and  other  OIG  activities.  Each  OIG  shall  participate  in  the  external  quality 
assurance review programs required by the PCIE and ECIE. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

101 

B. Quality Assurance Program 

Because OIGs evaluate how well agency programs and operations are functioning, 
they  have  a  special  responsibility  to  ensure  that  their  own  operations  are  as  effec-
tive  as  possible.  The  nature  and  extent  of  an  OIG’s  quality  assurance  program  de-
pends  on  a  number  of  factors,  such  as  the  OIG  size,  the  degree  of  operating  auton-
omy  allowed  its  personnel  and  its  offices,  the  nature  of  its  work,  its  organizational 
structure,  and  appropriate  cost-benefit  considerations.  Thus,  the  program  estab-
lished  by  individual  OIGs  could  vary,  as  could  the  extent  of  their  documentation. 
However,  each  organization  should  prepare  appropriate  documentation  to  dem-
onstrate compliance with its policies and procedures for its system of quality assur-
ance. 

1. The quality assurance program is an evaluative effort conducted by reviewers 
external  to  the  units/personnel  being  reviewed  to  ensure  that  the  overall  work 
of the OIG meets appropriate standards. The quality assurance program has an 
internal and external component. 
2. The internal quality assurance program can include reviews of all aspects of 
the OIG’s operations. The reviews are conducted by internal OIG staff that are 
external  to  the  units  being  reviewed.  The  internal  quality  assurance  program 
is  distinct  from  regular  management  and  supervisory  activities,  comparisons, 
and other activities by OIG staff performing their duties. Thus, an audit super-
visor  ensuring  that  audit  reports  are  properly  referenced  to  working  papers  is 
an example of regular supervision whereas an independent reviewer evaluating 
the referencing process is an example of internal quality assurance. 
3.  External  quality  assurance  reviews  are  conducted  by  independent  organiza-
tions not affiliated with the OIG being reviewed. 

C. Elements of an Internal Quality Assurance Program 

1. An internal quality assurance program must be structured and implemented 
to  ensure  an  objective,  timely,  and  comprehensive  appraisal  of  operations.  The 
internal  quality  assurance  reviews  should  be  conducted  by  individuals  who  are 
not  directly  involved  in  the  activity  or  unit  being  reviewed  and  who  do  not  re-
port to the immediate supervisor of that activity or unit. 
2.  The  same  professional  care  should  be  taken  with  quality  assurance  reviews 
as  with  other  OIG  efforts,  including  adequately  planning  the  review,  docu-
menting  findings,  developing  supportable  recommendations,  and  soliciting  com-
ments from the supervisor of the activity or unit reviewed. 
3.  The  Inspector  General  shall  implement  necessary  improvements  on  a  timely 
basis. 

D. Elements of an External Quality Assurance Program 

1. The purpose of the external quality assurance program is to provide an addi-
tional  and  external  level  of  assurance  that  the  OIG  conducts  its  audits,  inves-
tigations,  inspections,  and  evaluations  in  compliance  with  applicable  profes-
sional standards. 
2. The objective of the external quality assurance review is to determine wheth-
er  the  internal  control  system  is  in  place  and  operating  effectively  to  provide 
reasonable  assurance  that  established  policies  and  procedures  and  applicable 
professional standards are being followed. 
3. Organizations and individuals managing and conducting external quality as-
surance  reviews  should  be  highly  qualified  and  comply  with  specific  supple-
mental  guidance  issued  by  the  PCIE  and  ECIE  to  ensure  the  highest  level  of 
review  quality.  Individuals  conducting  these  reviews  should  have  a  thorough 
knowledge  of  the  applicable  professional  standards  and  the  environment  rel-
ative to the work being performed. 
4.  The  reviewers  should  be  independent  of  the  organization  being  reviewed,  its 
staff, and the work selected for review. 
5. The reviewers should have knowledge related to performing an external qual-
ity assurance review and use professional judgment in conducting and reporting 
on the results of the review. 
6. The review should be sufficiently comprehensive to assess whether the inter-
nal quality assurance program meets its objectives. 
7.  The  external  reviewers  and  the  organization  under  review  should  prepare 
and  sign  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  regarding  fundamental  aspects  of 
the  review.  Possible  topics  include  scope;  staffing  and  time-frames;  discussion 
of  preliminary  findings;  reporting;  handling  of  requests  for  reports,  letters  of 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

102 

comment,  and  review  documentation;  and  procedures  to  address  disagreements 
on findings and recommendations. 
8.  OIGs  should  provide  copies  of  final  reports  resulting  from  external  quality 
assurance  reviews  to  the  head  of  the  agency  or  department  and  to  the  Chair 
and  the  Vice  Chairs  of  the  PCIE  or  ECIE,  as  appropriate.  Upon  request  and 
subject  to  applicable  law,  the  reports  and  letters  of  comment  should  be  made 
available to the public in a timely manner. 
9.  OIGs  should  have  procedures  in  place  to  address  findings  and  recommenda-
tions contained in external quality assurance reviews. 
10. The external quality assurance program can be extended to cover other OIG 
operations. 

VI. Planning and Coordinating 
A. General Standard 

Each  OIG  shall  maintain  a  planning  system  assessing  the  nature,  scope,  and  in-
herent  risks  of  agency  programs  and  operations.  This  assessment  forms  the  basis 
for  establishing  strategic  and  performance  plans,29 including  goals,  objectives,  and 
performance  measures  to  be  accomplished  by  the  OIG  within  a  specific  time  pe-
riod.30 

The  Inspector  General  and  OIG  staff  shall  coordinate  their  activities  internally 
and  with  other  components  of  Government  to  assure  effective  and  efficient  use  of 
available resources.31 
B. Elements of the Planning Process 

OIGs should develop an appropriate planning process, giving consideration to the 

following elements: 

1. Use a strategic planning process that carefully considers current and emerg-
ing agency programs, operations, risks, and management challenges. This anal-
ysis  will  identify  the  nature  of  agency  programs  and  operations,  their  perform-
ance  measures  and  anticipated  outcomes,  their  scope  and  dollar  magnitude, 
their staffing and budgetary trends, their perceived vulnerabilities, and their in-
herent risks. 
2.  Develop  a  methodology  and  process  for  identifying  and  prioritizing  agency 
programs  and  operations  as  potential  subjects  for  audit,  investigation,  inspec-
tion,  or  evaluation.  The  methodology  should  be  designed  to  use  the  most  effec-
tive combination of OIG resources, including previous OIG work and input from 
OIG  staff.  Also,  the  OIG  should  consider  the  plans  of  other  organizations  both 
internal and external to the agency. 
3.  Use  an  annual  performance  planning  process  that  identifies  the  activities  to 
audit,  investigate,  inspect,  or  evaluate  and  translates  these  priorities  into  out-
come-related goals, objectives, and performance measures. As part of this plan-
ning process, OIGs should consider agency actions to address recommendations 
from  prior  OIG  work.  Because  resources  are  rarely  sufficient  to  meet  require-
ments, the OIG must choose among competing needs. 

C. Coordination Considerations 

1.  In  planning  work,  the  OIG  should  coordinate,  where  applicable,  with  agency 
management to ensure that OIG priorities appropriately consider agency needs. 
The  OIG  should  take  into  consideration  requests  from  the  Congress,  the  OMB, 
other  external  stakeholders,  the  PCIE,  the  ECIE,  complaints  from  employees 
and,  as  appropriate,  private  citizens.  By  using  this  information,  along  with  the 
OIG’s knowledge of agency objectives and operations, the OIG can plan its work 
based on the relative costs and benefits. 
2.  The  OIG  should  minimize  duplicative  work.  The  OIG  should  coordinate  its 
work internally and with other groups (both inside and outside the agency) per-
forming  independent  evaluations  of  agency  operations  and  programs.  This  co-
ordination  should  identify  the  nature  and  scope  of  other  reviews,  both  planned 
and  completed,  to  avoid  duplicating  others’  work.  Coordinating  with  the  GAO 
is  particularly  important.  As  part  of  the  planning  process,  each  OIG  should  co-
ordinate as needed with GAO representatives to exchange and discuss tentative 
plans  for  the  next  fiscal  year.32 If  duplication  is  identified,  every  effort  should 
be made to resolve it. 
3. The OIG will closely coordinate, if applicable, with the Department of Justice 
with  respect  to  criminal  and  civil  investigations  in  compliance  with  investiga-
tive standards and applicable deputations and accompanying Memoranda of Un-
derstanding. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

103 

4.  When  OIG  staff  identify  problems  that  might  affect  other  offices,  agencies, 
or arms of government, the OIG should coordinate with them and their respec-
tive  OIGs.  Where  appropriate,  joint  or  coordinated  audits,  investigations,  in-
spections,  or  evaluations  may  be  performed  to  fulfill  all  the  interested  parties’ 
requirements.33 
5. Because of the close interrelationships among many Federal programs, situa-
tions  will  arise  where  audit,  investigation,  inspection,  or  evaluation  activity  by 
one  OIG  will  require  work  with  another  agency’s  program  or  administrative 
staff.  In  such  cases,  the  OIGs  will  coordinate  in  order  to  facilitate  the  efficient 
accomplishment of the work. 

D. Prevention 

OIG  planning  should  develop  a  strategy  to  identify  the  causes  of  fraud,  waste, 
abuse, and mismanagement in high-risk agency programs, and to help agencies im-
plement a system of management improvements to overcome these problems.34 OIG 
prevention efforts may include the following: 

1. A routine procedure for OIG staff to identify and report prevention opportuni-
ties  as  these  may  come  up  in  their  work,  and  for  OIG  managers  to  refer  these 
to agency management, as appropriate; 
2. Special awareness and training initiatives designed to alert agency employees 
to systemic weaknesses in the programs and operations of their agencies; 
3.  Review  and  comment  on  initial  design  of  new  agency  programs  and  oper-
ations; 
4. Analyses of audit, investigative, and other OIG reports to identify trends and 
patterns; 
5.  Education  and  training  to  ensure  that  appropriate  OIG  staff  have  requisite 
abilities  in  the  loss  prevention  area,  as  well  as  fraud  detection  and  prevention; 
and 
6. An effective means for tracking the implementation of recommendations. 

VII. Communicating Results of OIG Activities 
A. General Standard 

Each  OIG  shall  keep  agency  management,  program  managers,  and  the  Congress 
fully and currently informed of appropriate aspects of OIG operations and findings. 
OIGs  should  assess  and  report  to  the  Congress,  as  appropriate,  on  their  own  stra-
tegic and annual performance and the performance of the agency or department for 
which  they  have  cognizance.  Each  OIG  shall  also  report  expeditiously  to  the  Attor-
ney  General  whenever  the  Inspector  General  has  reasonable  grounds  to  believe 
there has been a violation of criminal law. 
B. Keeping the Head of the Agency Informed 35 

1.  Through  periodic  briefings  and  reports,  the  Inspector  General  should  keep 
the  appropriate  department  and  agency  heads  advised  of  important  under-
takings  of  the  OIG,  its  outcomes,  and  any  problems  encountered  that  warrant 
the department or agency head’s attention. 
2.  The  Inspector  General  should  timely  advise  department  and  agency  heads, 
consistent  with  requirements  of  confidentiality,  of  any  agency  official  who  at-
tempts to impede or fails to require a contractor under his or her responsibility 
to  desist  from  impeding  an  audit,  investigation,  inspection,  evaluation,  or  any 
other OIG activity.36 
3. The Inspector General should timely alert department and agency heads, con-
sistent  with  requirements  imposed  by  confidentiality  and  the  prosecutive  sys-
tem, to examples of egregious misconduct and waste. 

C. Keeping the Congress Informed 37 

1.  The  Inspector  General  shall  report  to  the  Congress,  as  required  by  the  IG 
Act of 1978, as amended, and other legislation, regulations, and directives. 
2.  The  Inspector  General  may  also  inform  the  agency  head  and  Congress 
through  the  7-day  letter  (IG  Act  of  1978,  as  amended,  Section  5(d)),  or  other 
appropriate means of particularly serious programmatic or administrative prob-
lems that contribute to fraud, waste, abuse, or mismanagement in agency oper-
ations and programs. 
3. If the results of an audit, investigation, inspection, or evaluation indicate that 
deficiencies  in  Federal  law  contribute  to  fraud,  waste,  or  abuse,  these  matters 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

104 

may be brought to the attention of the Congress, and may include recommenda-
tions for statutory change.38 
4.  The  Inspector  General  shall  also  report  to  the  Congress  and  OMB  on  man-
agement  challenges  facing  the  agency  or  department  and  progress  in  meeting 
the challenges.39 

D. Keeping the Congress and Agency Informed on Performance 40 

1.  Each  OIG  should  annually  assess  its  own  performance  by  evaluating  actual 
to planned performance. 
2. Each OIG should have sufficient information to conduct performance evalua-
tions,  e.g.,  a  history  of  past  results  to  show  prior  performance,  a  strategic  and 
annual  planning  process  to  show  expected  performance,  and  a  management  in-
formation system to show actual performance. 
3.  Each  OIG  should  report  annually  on  its  actual  performance  as  compared  to 
its  performance  goals,  either  as  a  contributing  part  of  their  agency  reporting 
under  the  Government  Performance  and  Results  Act  of  1993  (GPRA),  if  appro-
priate, or independently to their agency and Congress. 
4.  Inspectors  General  may  also  advise  the  Congress  on  the  performance  goals, 
measurement  process,  and  results  of  the  agencies  and  departments  for  which 
they have cognizance. 

E. Keeping Program Managers Informed 

The  OIG  should  make  a  special  and  continuing  effort  to  keep  program  managers 
and their key staff informed, if appropriate, about the purpose, nature, and content 
of  OIG  activity  associated  with  the  manager’s  programs.  These  efforts  may  include 
periodic briefings as well as interim reports and correspondence. 
F. Keeping Ethics Officials Informed 

The  OIG  should  make  a  special  and  continuing  effort  to  keep  the  Designated 
Agency Ethics Official or similar official informed about OIG activities, including the 
results  of  investigations  and  allegations  of  ethical  misconduct  where  appropriate, 
that  related  to  the  ethics  official’s  responsibilities  for  the  agency’s  ethics  program. 
G. Keeping the Attorney General Informed 41 

The  OIG  shall  notify  the  Department  of  Justice  and  seek  a  prosecutive  opinion 

whenever the OIG develops evidence of a Federal crime. 
H. Elements of Effective Reporting 42 

1. All products issued should comply with applicable professional standards and 
conform to the OIG’s established policies and procedures. 
2. Whether written or oral, all OIG reports should be objective, timely, and use-
ful. 
3. All products should be adequately supported. 

VIII. Managing Human Capital 
A. General Standard 43 

Each  OIG  should  have  a  process  to  ensure  that  the  OIG’s  staff  members  collec-

tively possess the core competencies needed to accomplish the OIG mission. 
B. Human Capital Processes 

Each  OIG’s  process  for  ensuring  that  its  staff  members  possess  the  requisite 
qualifications should encompass processes for recruiting, hiring, continuously devel-
oping,  training,  and  evaluating  their  staff  members,  and  succession  planning  to  as-
sist  the  organization  in  maintaining  a  workforce  that  has  the  ability  to  meet  the 
OIG’s mission. 
C. Core Competencies 

Staff  members  must  collectively  possess  the  professional  competence  (i.e.,  team-
work, leadership, communication, technical knowledge, critical thinking skills, abili-
ties,  and  experience)  to  perform  the  work  assigned.  In  addition,  staff  must  individ-
ually  meet  requirements  established  by  the  Office  of  Personnel  Management  for 
their respective job series and by applicable professional standards. 
D. Skills Assessment 

To  ensure  that  the  OIG  staff  members  collectively  possess  needed  skills,  the  In-
spector  General  and  key  managers  should  assess  the  skills  of  their  staff  members 
and  determine  the  extent  to  which  these  skills  match  the  OIG’s  requirements.  OIG 
management  is  responsible  for  deciding  the  methods  by  which  identified  needs  can 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

105 

be  met  by  hiring  contractors  or  outside  consultants,  using  staff  members  who  pos-
sess the requisite skills, developing staff members and providing training, or recruit-
ing  new  staff.  Each  OIG  must  also  ensure  that  staff  members  meet  the  require-
ments for continuing professional education contained in the applicable professional 
standards.44 
IX. Reviewing Legislation and Regulations 
A. General Standard 

Each OIG shall establish and maintain a system to review and comment on exist-
ing and proposed legislation, regulations, and those directives that affect either the 
programs  and  operations  of  the  OIG’s  agency  or  the  mission  and  functions  of  the 
OIG.45 The  system  should  result  in  OIG  recommendations  designed  to  (1)  promote 
economy  and  efficiency  in  administering  agency  programs  and  operations;  (2)  pre-
vent  and  detect  fraud  and  abuse  in  such  programs  and  operations;  and  (3)  protect 
the integrity and independence of the OIG. 
B. Elements of Legislative and Regulatory Review 

1.  OIGs  should  assure  independent  and  timely  formulation  and,  to  the  extent 
within  their  control,  transmission  of  OIG  recommendations  so  that  authorities 
dealing with the matters concerned can adequately consider the OIG comments. 
This  requires  early  identification  of  legislative,  regulatory,  and  those  key  ad-
ministrative or directive issues of particular interest to the OIG. 
2. OIGs should seek implementation of agency procedures that routinely provide 
for  OIG  review  or  comment  on  legislative  and  regulatory  proposals  of  interest 
to the OIG and on agency-wide directives. 
3.  OIGs  should  have  written  procedures  for  and  conduct  appropriate  reviews, 
as necessary, of authorizing legislation, regulations, and directives during inves-
tigations, internal audits, inspections and evaluations, and other OIG activities, 
particularly  when  it  appears  that  a  lack  of  controls  or  deficiencies  in  law  have 
contributed to fraud, waste, abuse, and mismanagement. 

X. Receiving and Reviewing Allegations 
A. General Standard 46 

Each  OIG  shall  establish  and  follow  policies  and  procedures  for  receiving  and  re-
viewing  allegations.  This  system  should  ensure  that  an  appropriate  disposition,  in-
cluding appropriate notification, is made for each allegation. 
B. Elements of a System for Receiving and Reviewing Allegations 

This system should ensure that: 

1.  The  OIG  has  a  well-publicized  vehicle  through  which  agency  employees  and 
other interested persons can submit allegations of fraud, waste, abuse, and mis-
management, preserving anonymity when possible. 
2. Each allegation is retrievable and its receipt, review, and disposition are doc-
umented. 
3.  Each  allegation  is  initially  screened  to  ensure  that  urgent  and/or  high  pri-
ority  matters  receive  timely  attention  and  facilitate  early  determination  of  the 
appropriate courses of action for those complaints requiring follow-up action. 
4. Based on the nature, content, and credibility of the complaint, allegations are 
appropriately reviewed. 

C. Feedback 

The OIG may establish a mechanism for providing feedback to parties who submit 
allegations. This feedback can be furnished in summary form through such vehicles 
as an employee newsletter, a semiannual report digest, or other means. 
ENDNOTES 

1 Executive Order 12805, dated May 11, 1992, updated the charter for the President’s Council 

on Integrity and Efficiency and created the Executive Council on Integrity and Efficiency. 

2 Executive  Order  12805,  Section  3(c),  states  that  individual  members  of  the  Councils  should, 
to the extent permitted under law, adhere to professional standards developed by the Councils. 
This section gives the Councils the authority to establish standards for quality. 

3 The  Standards  for  Internal  Control  in  the  Federal  Government,  published  by  the  U.S.  Gen-
eral  Accounting  Office  (GAO)  in  November  1999,  require  that  ‘‘Management  and  employees 
should establish and maintain an environment throughout the organization that sets a positive 
and  supportive  attitude  toward  internal  control  and  conscientious  management.’’  The  Internal 
Control Standards define internal control as an integral component of an organization’s manage-
ment  that  provides  reasonable  assurance  that  the  following  objectives  are  being  achieved:  (1) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

106 

effectiveness and efficiency of operations, (2) reliability of financial reporting, and (3) compliance 
with applicable laws and regulations. 

4 The  IG  Act  (Public  Law  95–452),  Section  2,  established  independent  and  objective  units  to 

review agency activities. 

5 IG Act, Sections 2 and 4. 
6 This standard was adapted from the Standards for Ethical Conduct for Employees of the Ex-
ecutive Branch and the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants’ Code of Professional 
Conduct, Section ET 53–56, and the Institute of Internal Auditors’ Code of Ethics. 

7 IG  Act,  Section  2,  established  independent  units  to  review  agency  activities.  Section  6(a)(2) 
gives  the  Inspector  General  responsibility  for  independently  determining  the  nature  and  extent 
of the work necessary. 

8 Codified in 5 C.F.R. Part 2635 (January 1, 2002 Edition), as amended at 67 FR 61761–61762 

(October 2, 2002). 

9 18 U.S.C. Sections 202–209. 
10 5 C.F.R. Section 2635.101(a). The 14 general principles restate the principles of ethical con-

duct set forth in Executive Order 12674, as modified by Executive Order 12731. 

11 Executive  Order  12993,  Section  2,  dated  March  22,  1996,  gives  the  PCIE  and  ECIE  Integ-
rity Committee the responsibility for receiving, reviewing, and referring for investigation allega-
tions of wrongdoing against Inspectors General and certain OIG staff members. 

12 5 C.F.R. Section 2635.101(b). 
13 IG Act, Section 6(a)(4). 
14 IG Act, Section 6(a)(4). 
15 IG Act, Section 6(a)(1). 
16 IG Act, Section 6(a)(6). 
17 IG Act, Section 6(a)(5). 
18 IG Act, Section 6(a)(7), (8), and (9). 
19 IG Act, Section 6(a)(3). 
20 IG Act, Sections 2(3), 4(a)(5), and 5(b). 
21 Government Auditing Standards, Section 3.19. 
22 Government Auditing Standards, Section 3.11–Section 3.25. 
23 42  U.S.C.  Section  1320d–2  and  implementing  regulations  cover  the  privacy  of  individually 

identifiable health information. 

24 18  U.S.C.  Section  1905  prohibits  OIGs  from  disclosing  confidential  proprietary  data  ob-
tained  during  the  course  of  conducting  their  work  unless  such  disclosure  is  authorized  by  law. 
25 The Federal Managers’ Financial Integrity Act of 1982 requires GAO to issue standards for 
internal  control  in  government.  The  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  issues  implementing 
guidelines and specific requirements. 

26 The Standards for Internal Control in the Federal Government state that: ‘‘Separate evalua-
tions of control can also be useful by focusing directly on the controls’ effectiveness at a specific 
time.  The  scope  and  frequency  of  separate  evaluations  should  depend  primarily  on  the  assess-
ment of risks and the effectiveness of ongoing monitoring procedures. Separate evaluations may 
take the form of self-assessments as well as review of control design and direct testing of inter-
nal control.’’ 

27 The  Government  Auditing  Standards,  the  Quality  Standards  for  Investigations,  and  the 
Quality Standards for Inspections all require that work be adequately supervised through higher 
level review and approval. 

28 This  standard  is  based  on  the  Standards  for  Internal  Control  in  the  Federal  Government 
and the quality control and assurance standard in the Government Auditing Standards (Section 
3.49). 

29 The  Government  Performance  and  Results  Act  of  1993,  Section  3(a),  requires  each  agency 
to  develop  a  5-year  strategic  plan,  and,  in  Section  4(a)  and  (b),  to  prepare  annual  performance 
plans  and  reports.  A  January  28,  1998  memorandum  from  OMB  to  the  PCIE  and  the  National 
Science  Foundation  OIG  requires  each  OIG  that  has  a  separate  line  item  account  in  the  Presi-
dent’s Budget Appendix to submit a performance plan. The OIGs can either include goals, objec-
tives, and measures in their agency’s strategic and performance plans or develop their own stra-
tegic and annual performance plans and performance reports. 

30 OMB  Circular  No.  A–123,  Management  Accountability  and  Control,  Section  2,  states  that 
management accountability is the expectation that managers are responsible for the quality and 
timeliness of program performance, increasing productivity, controlling costs and mitigating ad-
verse aspects of agency operations, and ensuring that programs are managed with integrity and 
in compliance with applicable law. 

31 Throughout the IG Act, the IGs are given responsibility for coordinating their activities. In 
Section  4(a)(1),  (3),  and  (4),  the  IGs  are  to  coordinate  the  following:  Section  4(a)(1)  audits  and 
investigations relating to the programs and operations of the agency; Section 4(a)(3) other activi-
ties  carried  out  or  financed  by  the  agency  for  the  purpose  of  promoting  economy  and  efficiency 
or preventing and detecting fraud and abuse in its programs and operations; Section 4(a)(4) rela-
tionships between the agency and other Federal agencies, State and local governments, and non-
governmental  entities  with  respect  to  (A)  all  matters  relating  to  promoting  economy  and  effi-
ciency  or  preventing  and  detecting  fraud  and  abuse  in  programs  and  operations  administered 
or  financed  by  the  agency;  or  (B)  identifying  and  prosecuting  participants  in  such  fraud  or 
abuse. 

32 IG Act, Section 4(c). 
33 According  to  Executive  Order  12805,  Section  3(a),  the  PCIE  and  ECIE  shall  continually 
identify, review, and discuss areas of weakness and vulnerability in Federal programs and oper-
ations to fraud, waste, and abuse, and shall develop plans for coordinated, Government-wide ac-
tivities  that  address  these  problems  and  promote  economy  and  efficiency  in  Federal  programs 
and operations. These activities will include interagency and inter-entity audit and investigation 
programs  and  projects  to  deal  efficiently  and  effectively  with  those  problems  concerning  fraud 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

107 

and waste that exceed the capability or jurisdiction of an individual agency or entity. The Coun-
cils  shall  recognize  the  preeminent  role  of  the  Department  of  Justice  in  law  enforcement  and 
litigation. 

34 The  IG  Act  of  1978,  as  amended,  Section  2(2)(B),  requires  OIGs  ‘‘to  provide  leadership  and 
coordination and recommend policies for activities designed . . . to prevent and detect fraud and 
abuse. . . .’’ Section 4(a)(3) reiterates the OIG’s mission ‘‘to recommend policies for, and to con-
duct, supervise, or coordinate other activities . . . for the purpose of . . . preventing and detect-
ing fraud and abuse.’’ 

35 IG  Act,  Section  2(3),  requires  that  OIGs  keep  the  head  of  the  establishment  and  the  Con-
gress  fully  and  currently  informed  about  problems  and  deficiencies  relating  to  the  administra-
tion of programs and operations and the necessity for and progress of corrective action. Section 
4(a)(5) and Section 5(b) require semiannual reports. 

36 IG Act, Section 6(b)(2). 
37 See footnote 35. 
38 IG Act, Section 4(a)(2). 
39 31  U.S.C.,  Section  3516(d),  requires  OIGs  to  summarize  what  the  IG  considers  to  be  the 
most serious management and performance challenges facing the IG’s agency and briefly assess 
the agency’s progress in addressing those challenges. This requirement is triggered by the agen-
cy’s consolidation of reports made to the Congress, OMB, or the President. 

40 See footnote 29. 
41 IG Act, Section 4(d). 
42 OMB Guidelines for Ensuring and Maximizing the Quality, Objectivity, Utility, and Integrity 
of  Information  Disseminated  by  Federal  Agencies  require  agencies  to  adopt  a  basic  standard  of 
information quality (including objectivity, utility, and integrity) as a performance goal and take 
appropriate steps to incorporate information quality criteria into agency information dissemina-
tion  practices.  Quality  is  to  be  ensured  and  established  at  levels  appropriate  to  the  nature  and 
timeliness of the information to be disseminated. Agencies shall adopt specific standards of qual-
ity  that  are  appropriate  for  the  various  categories  of  information  they  disseminate,  and,  as  a 
matter of good and effective agency information resources management, agencies are to develop 
a  process  for  reviewing  the  quality  (including  the  objectivity,  utility,  and  integrity)  of  informa-
tion  before  it  is  disseminated.  The  Government  Auditing  Standards,  the  Quality  Standards  for 
Investigations, and the Quality Standards for Inspections all address reporting standards for in-
dividual audit, investigative, and inspection or evaluation reports. 

43 The Standards for Internal Control in the Federal Government identifies one factor affecting 
the control environment as management’s commitment to competence. All personnel need to pos-
sess  and  maintain  a  level  of  competence  that  allows  them  to  accomplish  their  assigned  duties, 
as  well  as  understand  the  importance  of  developing  and  implementing  good  internal  control. 
Management  needs  to  identify  what  appropriate  knowledge  and  skills  are  needed  for  various 
jobs  and  provide  training  as  well  as  candid  and  constructive  counseling,  and  performance  ap-
praisals.  The  Standards  also  discuss  good  human  capital  policies  and  practices  as  another  crit-
ical  environmental  factor.  This  includes  establishing  appropriate  practices  for  hiring,  orienting, 
training, evaluating, counseling, promoting, compensating, and disciplining personnel. Executive 
Order  12805,  Section  3(b),  states  that  the  PCIE  and  ECIE  shall  develop  policies  that  will  aid 
in  the  establishment  of  a  corps  of  well  trained  and  highly  skilled  Office  of  Inspector  General 
staff members. 

44 The  Government  Auditing  Standards,  the  Quality  Standards  for  Investigations,  and  the 
Quality Standards for Inspections each require that the personnel collectively possess the skills 
and abilities to perform the assigned tasks and require continuing professional education. 

45 The IG Act, Section 4(a)(2), gives IGs the responsibility to review existing and proposed leg-
islation  and  regulations  and  make  recommendations  in  the  semiannual  reports  on  the  impact 
of  legislation  or  regulations  on  the  economy  and  efficiency  of  administering  the  agency’s  pro-
grams and operations or in preventing and detecting fraud and abuse. 

46 IG Act, Section 7. 

APPENDIX I 

Legislation, Executive Orders, Standards, and OMB and Other Guidance Impacting the Inspector 

General Community 

Document a 

Description 

Legislation 

The  Inspector  General  Act  of  1978,  as  amend-

ed, 5 U.S.C. App. 3. (P.L. 95–452) 

Establishes independent and objective Offices 
of Inspector General. 

Accounting  and  Auditing  Act  of  1950,  31 
U.S.C.  §§ 713,  714,  718,  719,  3326,  3501, 
3511–3514, 3521, 3523, 3524. (P.L. 97–258). 

Requires the head of each executive agency to 
certify that the agency’s systems for internal 
accounting and administrative control comply 
with standards prescribed by the Comptroller 
General. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

108 

Legislation, Executive Orders, Standards, and OMB and Other Guidance Impacting the Inspector 

General Community—Continued 

Document a 

Description 

Budget  and  Accounting  Act  of  1921,  31  U.S.C. 
§§ 501,  502,  521,  522,  701–704,  711,  712, 
716,  718,  719,  731,  771–779,  1101,  1104– 
1108,  1111,  1113,  3301,  3323,  3324,  3521, 
3522, 3526, 3529, 3531, 3541, 3702. (42 Stat. 
20) 

Assigns responsibilities for government ac-
counting, auditing, and financial reporting to 
improve evaluations of Federal Government 
programs and activities by better identifying 
sources of funding and how the funding was 
applied. 

Federal Financial Management Act of 1994, 31 
U.S.C.  §§ 331,  501  note,  3301  note,  3332, 
3515, 3521. (P.L. 103–356) 

Requires all agencies covered by the Chief Fi-
nancial Officers Act to prepare annual, agen-
cy-wide financial statements. 

Provides for the establishment of uniform Fed-
eral Government accounting systems, account-
ing standards, and reporting systems. 

Provides for establishment, implementation, 
and evaluation of accounting and administra-
tive controls regarding financial management 
activities. 

Provides for the establishment of strategic 
planning and performance measurement in 
the Federal Government. 

Improves the efficiency of Executive Branch 
performance by enhancing reporting to the 
Congress through elimination and consolida-
tion of duplicative or obsolete reporting re-
quirements. 

Improves the general and financial manage-
ment of the Federal Government. 

Provides for the independent review of Federal 
agency information technology security by Of-
fices of Inspector General. 

Federal  Financial  Management  Improvement 
Act  of  1996,  5  U.S.C.  App.  § 5;  10 
U.S.C.§§ 113  note,  2315;  15  U.S.C.  § 278g–3; 
28  U.S.C.  § 612;  31  U.S.C.  §§ 3512,  3512 
note,  3521;  38  U.S.C.  § 310;  40  U.S.C. 
§§ 1401  notes,  1441  note;  41  U.S.C.  § 251 
notes. (P.L. 104–208) 

Federal  Managers  Financial  Integrity  Act  of 
1982,  31  U.S.C.  §§ 1105,  1113,  3512.  (P.L. 
97–255) 

Government  Performance  and  Results  Act  of 
1993, 5 U.S.C.  § 306; 31 U.S.C.  §§ 1101 note, 
1105,  1115,  1115  note,  1116–1119,  9703, 
9704; 39 U.S.C. §§ 2801–2805. (P.L. 103–62) 

Government  Management  Reform  Act  of  1994, 
2  U.S.C.  § 31,  31  note;  3  U.S.C.  § 104;  5 
U.S.C.  §§ 5318,  6304,  6304  note;  28  U.S.C. 
§ 461;  31  U.S.C.  §§ 331  note,  501  note,  1113 
note, 3301 note, 3332, 3515, 3521. (P.L. 103– 
356) 

Chief  Financial  Officers  Act  of  1990,  5  U.S.C. 
§§ 5313–5315;  31  U.S.C.  §§ 501  notes,  502– 
506,  901,  901  notes,  902,  903,  1105,  3511 
note, 3512, 3515, 3515 note, 3521, 3521 note, 
9105,  9106;  38  U.S.C.  § 201  note;  42  U.S.C. 
§ 3533. (P.L. 101–576) 

E-Government  Act  of  2002,  5  U.S.C.  §§ 3111, 
3701–3707,  4108,  8432  note;  10  U.S.C. 
§§ 2224,  2332;  13  U.S.C.  § 402;  15  U.S.C. 
§§ 176a,  278g–3,  278g–4;  18  U.S.C.  §§ 207, 
209; 28 U.S.C.  § 1913 note; 31 U.S.C.  §§ 503, 
507;  40  U.S.C.  §§ 305,  502,  11331,  11332, 
11501–11505,  11521,  11522;  41  U.S.C. 
§§ 266a,  423;  44  U.S.C.  §§ 101  note,  3501, 
3504–3506,  3531,  3541–3549,  3601–3606. 
(P.L. 107–347) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

109 

Legislation, Executive Orders, Standards, and OMB and Other Guidance Impacting the Inspector 

General Community—Continued 

Document a 

Description 

Clinger-Cohen Act of 1996, 5 U.S.C. § 571 note, 
5315;  5  U.S.C.  App.  3  § 11,  11  note;  10 
U.S.C.  §§ 1701  note,  2220,  2249,  2302,  2304, 
2304  note,  2304e,  2305,  2305a,  2306a,  2306 
note,  2306b,  2315,  2323,  2324,  2350b,  2372, 
2384,  2397,  2397a–2397c,  2400,  2401  note, 
2405, 2409, 2410, 2410b, 2410d, 2410g, 2424, 
2431,  2432  note,  2461,  2533,  2539b,  2662, 
2702;  15  U.S.C.  §§ 278g–3,  637,  644,  789;  16 
U.S.C.  § 799;  18  U.S.C.  § 281;  22  U.S.C. 
§ 2761, 2761 note; 28 U.S.C. § 612; 29 U.S.C. 
§ 721;  31  U.S.C.  §§ 1352,  1558,  3551–3554; 
38  U.S.C.  § 310;  see  40  U.S.C.  §§ 11101– 
11103,  11301–11303,  11311–11318,  11331, 
11332,  11501–11505,  11521,  11522,  11701– 
11704;  41  U.S.C.  §§ 10a  note,  11,  15,  20a, 
20b,  22,  35  note,  43a,  43b,  44,  45,  57,  251 
note,  253,  253a,  253b,  253l,  253m,  254b, 
254d,  255,  257,  264a,  265,  266,  401–434, 
601,  605,  612,  701;  42  U.S.C.  §§ 6392.  (P.L. 
104–156) 

Reports  Consolidation  Act  of  2000,  31  U.S.C. 
§§ 3116,  3501  note,  3515,  3516,  3521.  (P.L. 
106–531) 

Single  Audit  Act  Amendments  of  1996,  31 
U.S.C.  §§ 7501,  7501  notes,  7502–7505.  (P.L. 
104–156) 

Privacy Act, 5 U.S.C. § 552. (P.L. 93–579) 

Freedom  of  Information  Act,  as  amended,  5 

U.S.C. § 552. (P.L. 104–231) 

Whistleblower Protection Act, 5 U.S.C. §§ 1201, 
1201  notes,  1202–1206,  1208,  1209,  1211, 
1211  note,  1212–1219,  1221,  1222,  2302, 
2303,  3352,  3393,  5509  notes,  7502,  7512, 
7521, 7542, 7701, 7703; 22 U.S.C. § 4139. 

Provides for OMB oversight of information 
technology development and acquisition, agen-
cy management of IT investments, and estab-
lishment of standards by NIST. 

Encourages and authorizes report consolida-
tion; makes report formats more useful and 
meaningful; improves the quality of informa-
tion reported; enhances the coordination and 
efficiency of such reports. 

Requires that the Government Auditing Stand-
ards be followed in audits of state and local 
governments and nonprofit entities that re-
ceive Federal financial assistance. 

Places limitations on how Federal agencies col-
lect, use, and disclose information about indi-
viduals (U.S. citizens and resident aliens). 
Gives individuals the right to have access to 
records maintained on them by agencies and 
the right to seek corrections to those records, 
subject to various exemptions. 

Holds the government accountable to the gov-
erned; it establishes a statutory right, enforce-
able in court, for persons (individuals, corpora-
tions, etc.) to have access to Federal agency 
records, subject to certain exemptions. 

Protects the rights of, and prevents reprisals 
against, Federal employees who disclose gov-
ernmental fraud, waste, abuse, and other 
types of corruption or illegality. 

Health  Insurance  Portability  and  Account-

ability Act. (PL 104–191) 

Covers the privacy of individually identifiable 
information. 

Trade Secrets Act, 18 U.S.C. § 1905. 

Prohibits OIGs from disclosing confidential 
proprietary data obtained during the course of 
conducting their work unless such disclosure 
is authorized by law. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

110 

Legislation, Executive Orders, Standards, and OMB and Other Guidance Impacting the Inspector 

General Community—Continued 

Document a 

Description 

Federal  Conflict  of  Interest  Laws,  18  U.S.C. 

Sections 202–209. 

Establishes criminal prohibitions for employ-
ees of the Executive Branch. 

Executive Orders 

Integrity  and  Efficiency  in  Federal  Programs, 
Exec.  Order  No.  12805,  57  FR  20627  (May 
11, 1992). 

Administrative  Allegations  Against  Inspectors 
General,  Exec.  Order  No.  12993,  61  FR 
13043 (March 21, 1996). 

Establishes the PCIE and ECIE and describes 
their functions and responsibilities. 

The PCIE and ECIE Integrity Committee 
shall receive, review, and refer for investiga-
tion allegations of wrongdoing against IGs and 
certain staff members of OIGs. 

Standards 

Standards  for  Internal  Control  in  the  Federal 
Government,  GAO/AIMD–00–21.3.1  (Novem-
ber 1, 1999). 

Government  Auditing  Standards:  2003  Revi-

sion, GAO–03–673G (June 2003). 

Quality  Standards  for  Investigations,  PCIE/ 

ECIE (September 1997). 

Quality  Standards 

(March 1993). 

for 

Inspections,  PCIE 

Standards of Ethical Conduct for Employees of 
the  Executive  Branch,  5  C.F.R.  Part  2635 
(2003). 

Establishes overall framework for establishing 
and maintaining internal control and for iden-
tifying and addressing major performance and 
management challenges and areas at greatest 
risk of fraud, waste, abuse, and mismanage-
ment. 

Establishes standards for government audits. 

Establishes standards for investigative efforts 
conducted by criminal investigators working 
for Federal Offices of Inspector General. 

Establishes standards for inspections and 
evaluations conducted by Federal Offices of In-
spector General. 

Establishes general principles for ethical con-
duct of employees of the Executive Branch. 

Statements  of  Federal  Financial  Accounting 
Standards,  Federal  Accounting  Standards 
Advisory Board (May 2002). 

Accounting principles for Federal Government 
reporting entities issued by the Federal Ac-
counting Standards Advisory Board. 

Codification  of  Statements  on  Auditing  Stand-
ards (Including Statements on Standards for 
Attestation  Engagements),  American  Insti-
tute of Certified Public Accountants (2003). 

Auditing standards for financial audits. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

111 

Legislation, Executive Orders, Standards, and OMB and Other Guidance Impacting the Inspector 

General Community—Continued 

Document a 

Description 

OMB Circulars, Bulletins, and Guidelines 

Various  OMB  Circulars,  Bulletins,  and  Guide-

lines 

Establish requirements and guidelines for im-
plementing: 

• internal controls. 
• management accountability and control. 
• Federal financial systems. 
• management of Federal information re-

sources. 

• audits of states, local governments and 

nonprofit organizations. 

• financial accounting principles and stand-

ards. 

• financial statement audits. 
• information dissemination. 

Other Guidance 

Guide for Conducting External Quality Control 
Reviews  of  the  Audit  Operations  of  the  Of-
fices  of  Inspector  General,  PCIE  (February 
2002). 

Provides guidance on conducting external 
quality control reviews of OIG Offices of Audit. 

Guide  for  Conducting  Qualitative  Assessment 
Reviews  for  the  Investigative  Operations  of 
Inspectors General, PCIE/ECIE (2002). 

Provides guidance on conducting external 
qualitative assessment reviews of OIG inves-
tigative operations. 

GAO/PCIE  Financial  Audit  Manual,  GAO–01– 

765G (July 2001). 

Provides guidance on conducting financial 
statement audits. 

a Some  OIGs  are  not  components  of  an  entity  legally  defined  as  a  ‘‘Federal  agency.’’  Therefore,  some  of  the 
cited  laws,  regulations,  or  other  guidance  may  not  be  directly  applicable  by  law  to  all  OIGs.  In  these  cases, 
principles or concepts of the guidance may be adopted by the OIG entities as a matter of policy. 

Members  of  the  PCIE/ECIE  Advisory  Committee  to  Revise  the  Quality 

Standards for Federal Offices of Inspector General 

APPENDIX II 

ROBERT MCGREGOR, Chair 
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation 
EMILIE BAEBEL 
Small Business Administration 
DAVID BERRY 
National Labor Relations Board 
PATRICIA BRANNIN 
Department of Defense 
HELEN LEW 
Department of Education 
DAVID LONG 
Department of Health and Human Services 
PETER MCCLINTOCK 
Small Business Administration 
JEROME PERSH 
Department of Transportation 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

112 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 
OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL 
April 1–September 30, 2004 

SEMIANNUAL REPORT 

From the Inspector General 

Since  April  2002,  when  I  became  the  NASA  Inspector  General,  the  Office  of  In-
spector General (OIG) has undergone significant changes in its organizational struc-
ture  and  workforce.  These  changes  are  intended  to  improve  our  ability  to  root  out 
crime, fraud, waste and abuse, and to promote economy and efficiency at NASA. 

Specifically,  during  this  semiannual  period  the  OIG  has  enhanced  the  manage-
ment  of  the  Office  of  Investigations  by  establishing  a  Deputy  Assistant  Inspector 
General for Investigations position at Headquarters and adding Resident Agents-In- 
Charge to our offices at NASA’s larger Centers. In the Office of Audits we continued 
to  implement  the  reorganization  strategy  created  in  April  2003  to  improve  and  di-
versify  the  skill  mix  of  the  audit  staff  by  hiring  technical  experts  and  management 
analysts. We also established an Office of Management and Planning to consolidate 
the  management  of  our  information  technology  services,  strategic  planning  and  de-
velopment, budget, human resources, and administrative services. 

Throughout the transition, we have conducted meaningful work in both the Office 
of  Audits  and  the  Office  of  Investigations.  This  semiannual  report  reflects  on  some 
of  our  activities  that  resulted  in  published  audit  works,  such  as  our  assessment  of 
the quality assurance process for the redesigned Solid Rocket Booster bolt catchers, 
and on results from our investigative work including indictments, prosecutions, and 
convictions for crimes relating to NASA. 

The  semiannual  report  does  not  reflect  some  other  work  we  are  doing  or  have 
done to improve the Agency. For example, some of our Office of Audits activities this 
period  have  included  monitoring  various  financial  management,  contract,  and  Re-
turn  To  Flight  matters  that  do  not  necessarily  fall  within  the  parameters  of  an-
nounced  audits  and  will  not  result  in  published  reports.  Also,  investigative  work 
often  is  not  published  due  to  privacy  concerns  and  a  desire  to  maintain  confiden-
tiality  of  sources  and  investigative  techniques.  We  also  frequently  answer  Congres-
sional  inquiries  or  provide  information  to  Congressional  oversight  committees  on 
matters  of  interest  to  the  Legislative  Branch,  and  these  activities  often  do  not  in-
volve the generation of public reports. 

Although  our  work  may  not  always  result  in  a  published  report,  we  do  not  hesi-
tate to present our independent views to the Agency on a broad range of topics. The 
use  of  alternative  communication  strategies,  such  as  formal  and  informal  briefings, 
allows the OIG to inform the Agency of critical matters in real-time so management 
can take action before issues become problematic. 
Allegations of Reprisal and Whistleblowing 

In  this  semiannual  period,  the  OIG  dedicated  a  significant  amount  of  time  and 
resources investigating allegations of reprisal against NASA and contractor employ-
ees  for  raising  safety  and  other  concerns.  In  fulfilling  the  office’s  overall  mandate, 
the OIG can and does look at whatever matters it thinks most important to protect 
the taxpayers’ investment in NASA, which may include examining whether manage-
ment fairly addresses concerns raised by employees on myriad topics. 

In  the  wake  of  the  Space  Shuttle  Columbia  accident,  a  perception  arose  that 
NASA  culture  at  times  has  muted  the  free  flow  of  information.  The  OIG  is  trying 
to assist the Agency in ensuring that the NASA workplace encourages the free flow 
of  information,  especially  pertaining  to  safety,  and  that  those  who  conscientiously 
raise issues are protected from reprisal. While the OIG does not have the authority 
to  undo  personnel  actions  taken  as  reprisal,  the  OIG  can  be  an  advocate  to  the 
NASA  Administrator  to  seek  redress  where  appropriate  and  report  to  Congress  on 
Agency  activity.  (The  independent  agency  vested  with  the  responsibility  to  protect 
civil  service  whistleblowers  is  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel  [http://www.osc.gov].) 
Whistleblower matters are often difficult to untangle because they involve profes-
sional  disagreements  and  personality  conflicts.  The  OIG  often  relies  on  sources,  in-
cluding  confidential  and  anonymous  sources,  to  conduct  its  business.  Sources  may 
surface fraud, waste and abuse, violations of law, safety issues, and ways of improv-
ing the Agency. However, sometimes after conducting an investigation or audit, our 
office  is  unable  to  validate  a  source’s  statements.  Notwithstanding  the  challenges 
associated with these matters, the OIG believes it plays an important check and bal-
ance  to  Agency  action.  To  reflect  our  views,  we  published  a  white  paper,  Handling 
Disagreement  with  Superiors’  Decisions  and  Whistleblowing,  which  can  be  found  on 
our Website at http://www.hq.nasa.gov/office/oig/hq/whistleblower.pdf. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Peer Review 

113 

During  this  semiannual  report,  under  the  purview  of  the  President’s  Council  on 
Integrity  and  Efficiency  (PCIE),  our  Office  of  Audits  completed  a  time-consuming 
and expensive review of the Department of Treasury OIG’s Office of Audits, and the 
Department  of  Justice  OIG  finished  its  peer  review  of  the  NASA  OIG  Audit  pro-
gram. The peer reviews conducted were compliance audits that determined whether 
audit  policies  comply  with  government  auditing  standards  and  if  audits  are  con-
ducted  in  accordance  with  those  policies,  but  did  not  determine  whether  the  audits 
were meaningful or timely. The peer-review compliance audits, while useful for their 
intended  purpose,  are  not  designed  to  determine  whether  the  taxpayers’  money  is 
being used economically or even appropriately. 

My  office  has  made  recommendations  to  the  PCIE  Audit  Committee  and  its 
workgroup on peer-review standards that they revise the standards to include steps 
to  assess  the  economy,  efficiency,  and  timeliness  of  OIG  audits.  We  will  continue 
to advocate overall improvements in the OIG audit peer-review process. 

This report fairly summarizes the activities of the NASA Office of Inspector Gen-

eral during the reporting period. 

ROBERT W. COBB, 

Inspector General. 

EXCERPTS FROM TRANSCRIPT OF INTERVIEW OF HON.  ROBERT W.  COBB,  CONDUCTED 
BY OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVEL-
OPMENT, JUNE 27, 2006 (PAGES 40, 44, 54, 78, 94, 98, 104, 106, 114, 125) 

Page 40 

A. I don’t know. 
Q. You don’t recall? 
A. Not me. 
Q. You don’t know? 
A. I don’t know. If I’m right in saying Jackie Arends was the person in the Office 
of  Presidential  Personnel  whom  I  was  dealing  with,  whether  she  or  someone  else 
made the arrangements, I do not know. 

Q. OK. The interview was with whom? 
A. Sean O’Keefe. 
Q. When did that interview take place? 
A.  I  have  a  date  in  mind.  Whether  it  is  right,  I  don’t  know.  February  6,  2002. 
Q. Where did the interview take place? 
A. In his office. 
Q. And that would be NASA headquarters? 
A. Yes. 
Q.  Other  than—had  you  met  Mr.  O’Keefe  prior  to  this  interview  at  NASA  head-

A.  I  do  not  believe  that  I  had  ever  met  him  before  that  meeting.  My  recollection 

is that I don’t—that I did not meet him before that meeting. 

quarters? 

Q. OK. 
A. I may have had a phone conversation with . . . 

Page 44 

. . .  for  integrity,  my  reputation  for  having  done  a  first  class  job  in  connection 
with my duties at the Office of Government Ethics for 9 years, that all of my super-
visory chain at the Office of. Government Ethics had found me to be an outstanding 
employee,  and  any  one  of  them,  whether  it  is  Marilyn  Glenn,  Steve  Potts,  Gary 
Davis,  any  of  the  people  I  work  for  would  have  given  me  a  complete  recommenda-
tion  that  the  counsel  to  the  President,  Al  Gonzales,  that  Tim  Flanigan,  Deputy 
Counsel  to  the  President,  my  colleagues  in  that  office,  the  people  in  the  Office  of 
Presidential Personnel, the chief of staff—— 

Q. I would like him to be allowed to finish his answer. 
A. That Mr. O’Keefe being a person who was working in the Administration when 
seeking a person who had the highest levels of integrity in questions with the execu-
tion  of  the  job,  that  when  he  asked  around,  it  might  have  been  that  many  fingers 
pointed  in  my  direction.  He  reached  a  conclusion  based  on  that  that  I  would  be  a 
perfect person to conduct the independent Office of Inspector General activities. 

Which I note with some frustration we have yet begun to talk about. 
Q. If I understand your response correctly, .

. 

.

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

114 

Page 54 

. . .  I  don’t  recall,  if  there  was  such  a  conversation,  it  was  not  one  that  I  rated 
as  memorable.  In  other  words,  I  don’t  recall  it.  Am  I  saying  it  didn’t  happen?  No. 
I’m not saying it didn’t happen. I don’t recall it. 

Q.  You  have  no  knowledge  or  recollection  of  Mr.  Stadd  approaching  you  at  the 
behest of Mr. O’Keefe to ask whether or not you would be interested in the position 
as Inspector General of NASA? 

A. I don’t remember that conversation. I’m not denying whether it ever happened 

or not. 

Q.  How  about  Mr.  Saleeba?  Did  you  ever  have  any  such  conversation  with  Mr. 

A.  I  don’t  believe  so.  I  mean,  I—again,  I  met  with  the  both  of  them.  My  recollec-
tion as to what the content of that meeting was, was about Roberta Gross, her exe-
cution, position, what the legal—the legal standard was for removal. 

Q.  Did  they  state  to  you  why  she  was  being  removed  or  what  the  reason  for  her 

A. They stated they had a number of concerns about her performance as Inspector 

Saleeba? 

removal was? 

General. 

Q. Do you recall what those concerns were? 
A. Not specifically. Other than the overall . . . 

Page 78 

. . . than 3 years. 

By Ms. Bahr: 

Q. OK. 
A. From April of 2002 to February of 2005. 
Q. I forgot to take into account that you came in after—all right. My mistake. 
A. I took—and with substantial discussion with my—again, I have a collaborative 
style  of  conducting  business.  I  asked  for  Frank  LaRocca’s  opinion.  I  asked  for  who-
ever my senior staff’s opinions in connection with activities. 

I don’t always do what they say. We talk about it. I do what I think is right and— 
you know—the—that’s the way I conduct business. In terms of my relationship with 
Sean  O’Keefe,  you  know,  I’d  say  we  had  a  very  good,  professional  working  relation 
where  if  I  thought  there  was  an  issue  that  he  had  to  be  concern  about,  I  had  no 
difficulty or problem communicating to him. 

I  tried  to  have  as  much  contact  with  him  as  his  schedule  could  tolerate.  It  made 
it  so  that  I  could  be  best  informed  as  to  what  the  issues  of  the  day  were  at  NASA. 
I was not a person who came to senior management meetings typically. I was not 

a regular . . . 
Page 94 

A. If you have specific examples, it would be easier to talk about it. 
Q.  I  agree  with  you  complete  frequently.  I  think  there  will  be  points  later  in  the 

interview here we’ll be able to do that. 

Let’s  go  back  to  the  relationship  between  you  as  the  Inspector  General  and  the 

agency administrator. 

You  noted  that  you  on  approximately  two  occasions  recall  golfing  with  Mr. 

O’Keefe? 
A. Yes. 
Q. That would have been at his home in Virginia, correct? 
A. Yes. 
Q. Leesburg, I believe, Belmont? 
A. Yes. 
Q.  Aside  from  that,  did  you  have  any  other  contact  outside  of  the  office,  outside 
of NASA headquarters or NASA center a NASA facility whether you want to charac-
terize it as social or business, were there other contacts? 

A. In what time-frame. 
Q.  During  the  period  that—how  about  let’s  start  with  prior  to  you  becoming  the 

Inspector General . . . 
Page 98 

launch. 

. . .  Understanding,  going  down,  looking  at  every  one  of  facilities,  going  to  a 

I  went  to  a  launch  in  Bykanor,  Russia,  and  let  me  tell  you  I  learned  more  about 
NASA  and  the  manner  in  which  it  does  business  by  going  to  Russia  and  attending 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

115 

a launch in Bykanor which is the rockets launched from the same facility that Sput-
nik went off in 1959 and looked to me like there hadn’t been any improvement since 
then, you know—— 

Q.  What  other  functions  outside  of  NASA  do  you  recall  attending  with  Mr. 

O’Keefe or where Mr. O’Keefe was in attendance? 

A. During the time that he was—— 
Q. That he was the administrator, yes. 
A.  Again,  you  know,  I’d  say  there  are  any  number  of  instances.  He  never  came 
to  my  house.  I  went  to  his  house  after  we  played  golf.  I  don’t  know  if  there  were 
any instances where I went to his house. I can’t recall any. 

You know—— 
Q.  Aside  from  your—I  believe  you  said  weekly  lunches  at  NASA  headquarters 

with Mr. O’Keefe, did you ever have lunch or dinner outside of NASA together? 

A. Alone with Sean O’Keefe, me and him again . . . 

Page 104 

Ms. BAHR. I’m sorry to interrupt you, but there will be a line of questioning later 
where  I  think  it  would  be  more  appropriate  to  address  this.  If  for  the  moment  we 
could go back to just what kind of interactions you had with Mr. O’Keefe, that would 
be most helpful. 

The  WITNESS.  Your  last  question  was  what  prompted  that  instance  where  I  can 
recall  having  a  drink  with  Mr.  O’Keefe.  I  think—I  can  recall  one  other  instance 
where that happened. It wasn’t with just O’Keefe. It was with other persons on his 
staff.  That  was  where  I  had  been  told  that  I  was  going  to  be  appointed  as  the  In-
spector General to the Coalition Provisional Authority. 

I  think  that—I’m  not  positive.  I  think  that  he  might  have  invited  me  to  have  a 

drink relating to that at that time. 
By Ms. Bahr: 

Q. Did he recommend you for that post? 
A. I have no idea. 
Q. Do you know how you came to be suggested for the post? Or—- 
A.  I  believe  it  was  because  for  all  those  reasons  that  I  was  appointed  to  be  the 

NASA Inspector General, that the people that I had worked with in . . . 
Page 106 

. . . that you recall having some contact outside of NASA in a social setting? 
A.  Well,  again,  there  were  many  times  where  there  were—there  were  meetings 
that  took  place.  I  remember  there  was  a—there  was  a  Shuttle  upgrade  conference 
which  I  attended.  While  at  the  Shuttle  upgrade  conference,  which  was  either  at 
Stennis  or  Michaud,  which  is  the  tank  production  facility  in  eastern  Louisiana—— 

Q. How do you spell that? 
A.  M-i-c-h-a-u-d.  But  I’m  probably  misspelling  it  because  I  haven’t  spelled  it  be-

fore. 

Q. Stennis would be S-t-e-n-n-i-s? 
A. Right. 
Q. OK. 
A.  I  remember  running  into  O’Keefe.  We  went  over  to  Stennis  for  an  event  over 
there.  It  was  a  crayfish  bake  that  he  attended.  I  remember  going  to  that  on  the 
premises of the Stennis Space Flight Center. 

Q.  But  there  were  other  NASA  officials  or  senior  staff  members  in  attendance;  is 

that correct? 

A.  Yes.  And  it  might  be  that  when  we  were  attending  those  types  of  events,  that 

there was interaction, social interaction, in effect, after—— . . . 
Page 114 

A. Ten. I’m guessing. Five. More than five. Less than 15 would be my guess. 
Q.  OK.  In  reviewing  the  records  primarily  your  calendar  and  other  records,  I 
think we came to the determination there were 13 instances during the period that 
he was NASA administrator? 
Mr. SOLLERS. Pretty good. 

By Ms. Bahr: 

Q.  Generally  what  was  the  purpose  of  flying  aboard  the  NASA  aircraft,  official 
aircraft,  and  was  it  always  with  Mr.  O’Keefe  there?  Were  there  occasions  when  he 
wasn’t aboard the aircraft? 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

116 

A.  I  would  say  there  would  be  a  number  of  different  reasons  for  why  I  might  be 
on the NASA aircraft. But I’d say that fundamentally, I had an intent and whatever 
the  reason  for  the  intent  was  to,  go  to  someplace  that  the  NASA  plane  was  going 
and  took  the  opportunity  either  at  my  request  or  O’Keefe’s  request  or  whoever  as 
an  indication  of  availability  to  travel  in  that  manner  for  a  number  of  different  rea-
sons. 

After substantial discussion with, as I’ve mentioned before, I have a collaborative 
relationship  with  my  direct  reports.  This  would  be  the  kind  of  thing  I  would  talk 
with them about. 
Page 125 

. . . going. 
Q. In every instance? 
A.  Yes.  I  never  requested  that  there  be  a  NASA  flight  to  take  me  someplace.  In 
other  words,  never  was  the  originator  of  a  request  for  a  flight  that  independent  of 
something  else  that  was  going  on.  I  might  have  asked  whether  or  not  I  could  go 
on a flight, which I believed would already be going to a certain locale. 

Is there space available on the plane for me to go? 
Yes,  there  is  space  available.  Great.  I’ll  go  get  on  that  plane.  No  cost.  No  addi-
tional  cost  to  the  government  as  far  as  I  know.  Now  maybe  there  were  instances 
where somebody was going on the plane but because I asked whether or not or was 
invited  that  they  didn’t  get  a  seat  on  the  plane  and  had  to  go  commercial.  That’s 
a possibility. 

But my assumption is there can be plenty of instances where—you know—I occu-

pied a seat and saved the government money by virtue of my occupying it. 

Q. OK. 
A.  As  far  as  the  appearance  issue,  Steve  Spratt,  good  guy  be  dedicated  Federal 

servant, if he . . . 

EXCERPTS FROM RECORD OF INVESTIGATION OF HON.  ROBERT W.  COBB,  OFFICE OF 
INSPECTOR GENERAL,  NASA,  AUGUST 30,  2006  (PAGES 49–54,  59,  140–142,195– 
197, 206–217, 222–225, 231, 266–271) 

Pages 49–54 

Allegation  8—Inspector  General  COBB  squelched  a  finding  on  the  Audit  of  Bar-
ters on the International Space Station Program after conferring with Paul Pastorek 
(Pastorek), former NASA Legal Counsel. 
Investigative Findings 

Former  Audit  Director  Dennis  Coldren  submitted  a  complaint  to  the  Integrity 
Committee  of  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (Exhibit  8).  On 
February  22,  2006,  Coldren  was  interviewed  (Exhibit  25).  During  the  interview, 
Coldren  provided  an  e-mail  sent  June  7,  2002,  from  Pastorek,  to  COBB  regarding 
the Barters on the International Space Station Program Audit (Barters Audit). 

In the e-mail, Pastorek tells COBB that there are two points in the Barters Audit 
about  which  he  would  discuss  when  they  meet.  Specifically,  Pastorek  noted  in  the 
e-mail that he wanted to discuss restricting the circulation of the Barters Audit be-
cause he had been advised by John Schumacher (Schumacher), NASA Associate Ad-
ministrator  for  External  Relations,  that  disclosure  of  the  audit  report  findings,  as 
was  originally  contemplated,  would  lead  to  showing  foreign  governments  NASA’s 
hand.  Second,  Pastorek  stated  he  wanted  to  discuss  his  concern  the  audit  report 
mentioned  the  possibility  that  NASA  may  have  been  in  breach  of  their  agreements 
with foreign countries if they took certain actions. Relative to that breach, Pastorek 
stated in his e-mail to COBB, ‘‘I question the conclusion and I would like to see the 
analysis.  I  am  doing  my  own  analysis  and  so  far  cannot  understand  such  a  conclu-
sion.’’ 

Coldren stated that ultimately, through their chain of command [Alan Lamoreaux, 
former Assistant Inspector General for Audit and Kevin Carson, former Audit Direc-
tor]  the  auditors  who  worked  on  the  audit,  James  Griggs,  Auditor-in-Charge  and 
Barbara Moody, Auditor, were instructed to remove all audit findings from the. Bar-
ters  audit  report,  and  include  only  the  audit  findings  reported  under  the  heading 
of ‘‘other matters of interest.’’ This effectively removed four pages of audit findings, 
and  left  roughly  one  paragraph  detailing  the  findings  relative  to  other  matters  of 
interest. 

A  review  of  the  contents  of  April  2002  draft  report’s  ‘‘Other  Matters  of  Interest’’ 
section, which consisted of four pages, to the September 6, 2002 final report’s ‘‘Other 
Matters  of  Interest’’  one  paragraph,  which  was  moved  to  the  Executive  Summary, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

117 

was conducted to make a determination if there were substantive changes from the 
draft to the final report. In addition, work papers were reviewed. 
Draft Report 

‘‘NASA risks noncompliance with its intergovernmental agreement and Memoran-
dums  of  Understanding  if  the  Agency  does  not  deliver  the  Habitation  Module  and 
the Crew Return Vehicle. The intergovernmental agreement and Memoranda of Un-
derstanding  require  NASA  to  supply  a  Habitation  Module  to  support  four  crew-
members and a crew rescue vehicle to support the rescue and return of a minimum 
of  four  crewmembers.  NASA  has  complied  with  the  International  Space  Station 
(ISS) bartering agreements. However, because of ISS cost overruns and budget con-
straints,  NASA  reduced  the  ISS  crew  capability  from  seven  to  three.  If  NASA  re-
tains  the  reduced  crew  configuration,  the  Agency  would  be  in  noncompliance  with 
the  international  agreements.  Therefore,  the  agreements  may  need  to  be  renegoti-
ated, and NASA would likely be forced to assume a greater share of costs.’’ 
Final Report 

‘‘. . .  As  a  result,  NASA  deferred  certain  elements  considered  high  risk,  such  as 
the  habitation  module  and  the  crew  return  vehicle.  If  no  alternatives  are  provided, 
the  absence  of  the  deferred  elements  will  limit  the  permanent  ISS  crew  to  three. 
NASA  and  the  international  space  agencies  negotiated  two  ISS  bartering  agree-
ments based on a percentage of utilization rights contemplated with a seven-person 
crew configuration. To the extent that the two bartering agreements may be affected 
by  a  reduction  in  planned  on-orbit  resources,  NASA  should  coordinate  with  the  af-
fected partner.’’ 

Result of Review: The finding in paragraph one of the Draft Report, ‘‘NASA risks 
noncompliance with intergovernmental agreements’’ was not present in the final re-
port. 

On  May  31,  2006,  Pastorek  was  interviewed  (Exhibit  138).  Pastorek  fielded  a 
number  of  questions  regarding  the  sharing  of  IG  Audit  reports.  Specifically,  a  pre- 
draft of the NASA OIG Audit report on International Agreements/Bartering for the 
Space  Station  that  COBB  may  have  shared  with  him.  Pastorek  stated  the  IG  fre-
quently advised the Administration about upcoming. audits but that Schumacher or 
Jason (Jay) Steptoe, Associate General Counsel, NASA, would have handled any de-
tails. His only concern with this audit was that if too much information was in the 
report,  NASA  might  destroy  their  negotiating  position  with  foreign  countries.  Fur-
thermore, Pastorek said the IG used a hypothetical situation to criticize NASA rath-
er than using facts and the took issue with that type of audit. 

Allegation  9—The  substance  of  the  audit  report  and  recommendations  was 
changed on an audit regarding the Independent Technical Authority and Safety and 
Mission Assurance. 
Investigative Findings 

On March 10, 2006, [redacted] was interviewed (Exhibit 41) based on information 
he  provided  to  Senator  Bill  Nelson  [Florida],  which  was  forwarded  to  HUD  OIG  by 
the  Integrity  Committee  of  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (Ex-
hibit  7).  During  the  interview,  [redacted]  stated  there  are  several  examples  where 
Inspector General COBB has directly changed the substance of a report. 

On  April  18,  2006,  a  confidential  source  identified  as  T–6  was  interviewed  (Ex-
hibit 57). Regarding the Independent Technical Authority (ITA) and Safety Mission 
Assurance  (SMA)  audit,  assignment  number  A–04–004–00,  T–6  provided  the  fol-
lowing information. After the Columbia Accident Investigation Board (CAIB) report 
was  issued,  14  of  the  29  recommendations  made  had  to  be  addressed  before  NASA 
could  ‘‘fly  again.’’  [redacted]  several  recommendations  to  audit,  and  to  ensure  that 
NASA  was  making  the  corrective  actions.  Part  of  the  issue  was  the  SMA  group  re-
ported to the Center Director, who reported to the Mission/Program Director. There-
fore,  the  very  people  that  the  SMA  group  was  supposed  to  be  overseeing  were  the 
same people they reported to and received funding from. T–6 stated that the bottom 
line was the safety staff was not independent, and NASA needed to change the orga-
nizational  structure.  GAO  and  an  independent  study  found  this  issue  as  well.  T– 
6  stated  the  audit  team  cited  this  in  their  draft  audit  report,  and  made  rec-
ommendations,  however,  Inspector  General  COBB  changed  the  report  and  the  rec-
ommendations.  In  April  2005,  Michael  Griffin  (Griffin)  became  the  NASA  Adminis-
trator. The first thing Griffin did was realign the Center Directors. Griffin made the 
change the audit team had recommended; the same change the audit team had been 
trying to convince COBB of over the previous year. 

The  first  attempt  to  issue  the  above  report  was  in  December  2003.  COBB  sent 
a  memo  to  NASA  management,  instead  of  an  audit  report  with  recommendations. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

118 

Afterwards  COBB  [redacted]  did  not  receive  a  response  [redacted]  COBB  replied, 
‘‘Well then the next thing we issue will not be a willy-nilly memo.’’ 

The second attempt to issue a report was in March 2004. The audit team drafted 
a  management  letter  with  four  recommendations.  COBB  reviewed  the  draft  and 
made  changes.  Some  of  the  changes  the  audit  team  did  not  know  how  to  reference. 
Suddenly, COBB advised they had to issue something within the next day. On April 
5,  2004,  instead  of  issuing  a  management  letter  COBB  sent  an  e-mail  to  NASA 
management.  What  had  initially  started  as  a  management  letter  with  four  rec-
ommendations ended up as an e-mail with no recommendations. 

The  third  attempt  to  issue  a  report  ‘‘fizzled,  and  did  not  go  anywhere.’’  This  was 
around  August  2004.  [redacted]  were  still  trying  to  make  the  changes  COBB  want-
ed.  At  the  same  time  they  wanted  to  address  the  concerns  the  audit  team  had.  T– 
6 stated nothing was issued this time. 

The  fourth  attempt  to  issue  a  report  was  in  October  2004.  NASA  appointed  Walt 
Cantrell (Cantrell), NASA Deputy Chief Engineer, to come up with a plan to imple-
ment the Columbia Accident Investigation Board’s (CAIB) recommendations. On Oc-
tober 15, 2004, COBB sent Cantrell an e-mail referencing the audit. COBB sent the 
e-mail  without  the  audit  team’s  review.  This  time,  T–6  stated  the  audit  team  did 
not have concerns about the content of COBB’s e-mail. 

In  November  2004,  NASA  issued  a  new  plan.  COBB  asked  the  audit  team  to  re-
view it. In January 2005, the audit team briefed Evelyn Klemstine (Klemstine), the 
new Assistant Inspector General for Audit. The audit team told Klemstine, ‘‘At this 
point  you  might  as  well  shut  down  the  assignment  because  COBB  is  not  going  to 
issue  anything.’’  Klemstine  did  not  close  the  assignment  The  audit  team  drafted  a 
report  in  March  2005,  titled  ‘‘NASA’s  Technical  Authority  and  Safety  and  Mission 
Assurance  Lack  Total  Autonomy.’’  In  May  2005,  the  discussion  draft  was  issued 
with one recommendation. In August 2005, the final report titled ‘‘Risks Associated 
with  NASA’s  Plan  for  Technical  Authority  and  Safety  and  Mission  Assurance’’  was 
issued with no recommendation. 

During the interview with [redacted] on March 10, 2006, Carson specifically men-
tions  this  ITA  and  SMA  audit  (Exhibit  41).  According  to  [redacted]  COBB  told  [re-
dacted]  ‘‘You  guys  have  been  on  this  for  a  year  and  have  nothing  to  show  for  it.’’ 
[redacted]  was  in  this  meeting  and  said  nothing.  [redacted]  said  they  had  written 
several  reports,  but  COBB  would  not  issue  them.  COBB  told  [redacted]  ‘‘was  miss-
ing the message.’’ One of the recommendations [redacted] draft report was to elimi-
nate the warrant holders from having to report to the Center Directors. COBB told 
[redacted]  ‘‘You  don’t  know  what  you  are  talking  about  in  the  recommendations.’’ 
[redacted]  recommendation  was  ‘‘right  on’’  because  when  Griffin  became  the  new 
NASA  Administrator,  Griffin  made  the  change  to  NASA  that  [redacted]  rec-
ommended in his audit report. 

On April 19, 2006, [redacted] was interviewed (Exhibit 62). [redacted] reported an 
audit  was  conducted  on  NASA’s  SMA  and  ITA.  [redacted]  said  the  team  had  an 
issue  with  how  the  ITA  reported  up  the  NASA  chain  of  command.  The  audit  team 
recommended moving the ITA out of the SMA Directorate and having ITA personnel 
report  directly  to  the  NASA  respective  Center  Directors.  [redacted]  said  COBB  did 
not  agree  with  the  audit  team’s  recommendation.  [redacted]  advised  the  audit  was 
conducted prior to Griffin’s appointment to the position of NASA Administrator. [re-
dacted] stated shortly after Griffin became NASA’s Administrator, be independently 
implemented the audit team’s recommendations. 

On  June  15,  2006,  NASA  OIG  [redacted]  was  interviewed.  (Exhibit  157).  [re-
dacted]  mentioned  the  ITA  Audit  [redacted]  recalled  that  the  ‘‘auditors  were  very 
frustrated  that  COBB  was  not  using  the  normal  techniques  to  report  the  results  of 
the audit’’ COBB would converse with NASA management and sometimes the find-
ings and recommendations were not tracked. In his past experience with the NASA 
OIG, the process was a more ‘‘rigid structure.’’ [redacted] stated, ‘‘Perhaps it’s a bet-
ter way to get quick responses or information to NASA, but if you don’t keep track, 
how do you know if you are making a difference.’’ 

On June 19, 2006, [redacted] was interviewed (Exhibit 163). [redacted] stated that 
the ITA audit report was a good example of a report that COBB changed. She stated 
she  would  not  have  ‘‘gone  down  the  same  route’’  as  COBB  on  this  audit.  She  be-
lieves  COBB’s  version  of  the  report  was  ‘‘wishy-washy’’  and  ‘‘watered  down.’’  [re-
dacted]  stated  that  there  was  a  clear  articulation  of  the  issues  in  the  draft  audit 
report.  By  the  time  the  report  was  finally  issued,  the  findings  in  the  report  were 
‘‘overcome  by  events.’’  Meaning  in  this  case,  the  audit  was  ongoing  for  years,  and 
by the time they were finally ready to issue a report, Griffin became the NASA Ad-
ministrator, and made the changes the audit team was trying to recommend in the 
audit report. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

119 

A review of COBB’s e-mails found an e-mail from COBB to Bryan O’Connor, Asso-
ciate  Administrator,  Office  of  Safety  and  Mission  Assurance,  NASA,  dated  March 
17, 2004. In the e-mail, Associate Administrator O’Connor thanks COBB for coming 
by last night and restates his thoughts on the draft audit report. The last paragraph 
in  the  e-mail  states,  ‘‘Moose,  in  summary,  I  cannot  agree  with  either  of  your  two 
recommendations  because  I  have  such  a  problem  with  your  three  conclusions.  Do 
we need to talk some more?’’ The timing of this meeting corresponds with the second 
attempt  to  issue  a  draft  audit  report,  as  discussed  above  in  the  interview  with  T– 
6. 

On  June  29,  2006,  COBB  was  interviewed  (Exhibit  182).  COBB  was  asked  about 
this audit, and his response to the allegation is located on page 403, line 14 through 
page 404, line 16 of his interview transcript. COBB stated: 

Q. How about on the independent technical authority audit report? One of your 
senior  staff  members  stated  that  it  was  a  good  example  of  you  changing  a  re-
port,  but  they  wouldn’t  have  gone  down  the  same  route  as  you.  Subjective,  but 
that your version of the report was ‘‘wishy washy’’ and ‘‘watered down’’? 
A.  I  would  say  in  connection  with  what  I  recall  that  staff  presented  to  me  on 
a  number  of  occasions,  that  the—their—what  their  articulation  of  what  was 
going  on  in  connection  with  the  independent  technical  authority  was  incon-
sistent  with  the  facts  and  to  such  a  point  that  that  was  a  circumstance  where 
the  communication  by  me  to  the  agency  in,  I  believe,  it  was  December  of  2003 
was a product generated mostly by myself with some benefit of—and Tom How-
ard  is  not  enthusiastic  about  the  front  office  generating,  but  it  was  an  issue 
with which I had substantial familiarity by virtue of my participation in the Co-
lumbia  Accident  Investigation  Board,  my  involvement  in  the  Aerospace  Safety 
Advisory  Panel,  considerations  of  issues,  my  personal  discussions  with  a  num-
ber of officials throughout NASA on independent technical authority issues. 

So I had some comfort with what I articulated in that letter. As compared to the 

discomfort I had With the product that had been generated by staff. 

Allegation  10—Inspector  General  COBB  stifled  the  publication  of  audit  findings 

for an audit regarding Wind Tunnel Utilization. 
Investigative Findings 

On March 15, 2006, a confidential source identified as T–3 was interviewed to ob-
tain  information  regarding  allegations  HUD  OIG  received  from  the  Integrity  Com-
mittee of the President’s Council on Integrity and Efficiency (Exhibit 44). During the 
interview, T–3 stated, ‘‘COBB stifled the publication of audit findings,’’ and provided 
several examples. 

T–3  supervised  audit  assignment  A–03–007–00,  Wind  Tunnel  Utilization.  Work 
was performed at Ames Research Center (ARC), Glenn Research Center, and Lang-
ley  Research  Center.  The  audit  disclosed  that  ARC  violated  Office  of  Management 
and Budget policy by failing to bill private users the full cost of using the wind tun-
nels.  Therefore,  ARC  was  improperly  subsidizing  private  industry,  like  Boeing.  Ac-
cording to T–3, ‘‘The front office told me to drop the finding from the report.’’ There 
were several other findings included in the draft report, however, none of them were 
as  important  as  the  full  cost/subsidy  finding.  T–3  believes  a  finding  like  this  would 
have  embarrassed  the  Bush  Administration  because  subsidies  have  been  an  issue 
between the U.S. and Europe. 

T–3 recalled attending a meeting in which ‘‘COBB became so angry, he was prac-
tically spitting.’’ T–3 believed this meeting was in regards to the wind tunnel issues, 
and  took  place  in  June  2003,  in  the  conference  room  at  NASA  Headquarters.  T–3 
recalled  that  he,  Deputy  Inspector  General  Thomas  Howard,  former  Assistant  In-
spector  General  for  Audits  (AIGA)  David  Cushing,  and  COBB  were  all  in  attend-
ance. T–3 stated that COBB made unprofessional comments about the audit and the 
work that had been completed. COBB said that the audit staff had not done enough 
work to support the conclusions they were making in the audit. 

T–3  said  that  COBB  then  agreed  to  look  into  the  subsidy/wind  tunnel  issue  in  a 
later  audit.  The  audit  was  subsequently  initiated  in  January  2005  [Audit  Assign-
ment  A–05–010–00].  T–3  stated  this  audit  is  currently  in  process,  but  it  looks  like 
COBB will not issue this report either. 

For  this  second  wind  tunnel  assignment,  Audit  Assignment  A–05–010–00,  a 
memorandum  was  issued  on  June  1,  2006,  to  NASA.  The  memorandum  stated  the 
OIG was closing the subject assignment because significant changes in the manage-
ment of NASA’s wind tunnels have invalidated the OIG’s initial work. 

On  June  19,  2006,  AIGA  Evelyn  Renee  Klemstine  (Klemstine)  was  interviewed 
(Exhibit  163).  Klemstine  stated  if  certain  auditors  forward  reports  to  Headquarters 
‘‘there is going to be problems.’’ It would not matter whether the audit or the report 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

120 

was the best, it would never be good enough. For example, if she forwards a report 
from  Supervisory  Auditor  David  Gandrud  (Gandrud),  it  will  not  go  through.  This 
happened  on  the  ‘‘Wind  Tunnel’’  audit  report  written  by  Gandrud  [Audit  Assign-
ment  A–05–010–00].  Klemstine  thought  the  second  version  of  the  report  was  good, 
however,  COBB  kept  re-writing  it  over  the  next  6  months.  By  the  time  COBB  was 
ready  to  issue  the  report,  the  report  had  no  meaning  because  the  findings  were 
‘‘overcome by events.’’ Klemstine stated had the second version been issued, the re-
port would have been timely and relevant. 

Allegation 12—The number of audits has decreased and NASA OIG is not issuing 

as many reports as they used to. 
Investigative Findings 

HUD OIG interviewed several current and former NASA OIG employees to obtain 
information  regarding  allegations  received  from  the  Integrity  Committee  of  the 
President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency.  During  several  of  these  interviews, 
the  following  allegation  was  raised:  ‘‘The  number  of  audits  have  decreased  and 
NASA OIG is not issuing as many reports as they used to.’’ 

A review of the number of audit reports and memorandums in NASA OIG’s Semi-
annual  Reports  to  Congress  and  the  Office  of  Audits  Central  Information  System 
(OACIS) from FY 2000 to FY 2006 was conducted (Exhibit 184). The results are in-
dicated below: 

Fiscal Year 

Audit Reports 

Memorandums 

2000 
2001 
2002 
2003 
2004 
2005 
2006* 

62 
40 
30 
29 
26 
29 
7 

0 
0 
0 
3 
7 
2 
9 

Audits 
Closed 

1 
8 
0 
8 
6 
7 
2 

* As of 1st semiannual reporting period. 
On  June  27  and  29,  2006,  Inspector  General  Robert  Watson  (Moose)  COBB  was 
interviewed (Exhibit 182). COBB addressed the allegation during his interview, and 
his  response  begins  at  page  346,  line  13  of  his  interview  transcript.  COBB  stated, 
in part: 

Q. While you were inspector general, to the best of your knowledge, do you know 
if  the  number  of  audits  and  audit  reports  have  increased,  decreased,  remained  the 
same? 

A. I don’t know, but I can tell you— 
Mr. SOLLERS. You mean like on an annual basis? 

By Mr. Febles: 

Q. The semiannuals that you provide? Have they gotten thicker? Thinner? 
A.  The  thickness  of  a  semiannual  is  separate  from  the  issue  that  you  articulate. 

Pages 140–142 

Allegation 34—Inspector General COBB, in his e-mail correspondence with former 
NASA  Administrator  Sean  O’Keefe  (O’Keefe),  might  have  inappropriately  released 
law enforcement sensitive information. 
Investigative Findings 

On January 31, 2006, and April 24, 2006, [redacted] was interviewed (Exhibits 19 
& 75, respectively) regarding [redacted] complaint to the Integrity Committee of the 
President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency,  which  was  forwarded  to  HUD  OIG 
(Exhibit  1).  [redacted]  COBB  does  not  conduct  business  independently  or  carry  out 
his  duties  in  an  impartial  manner.  [redacted]  heard  that  COBB  and  former  NASA 
Administrator O’Keefe were close. 

A review was conducted of e-mails retrieved from the Microsoft Exchange govern-
ment account of COBB (Exhibit 24). In one e-mail, it was determined COBB notified 
senior NASA management officials of impending search warrant executions and the 
existence  of  an  undercover  operation.  The  subject  e-mail,  dated  June  16,  2004,  was 
sent  from  COBB  to  O’Keefe.  COBB’s  e-mail,  titled  ‘‘Re:  bad  parts  case,’’  states  in 
part: 

‘‘fyi. Working with FBI and Defense Criminal Investigative Service and the De-
partment  of  Justice,  we  have  been  involved  in  an  undercover  operation  tar-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

121 

geting  suppliers  of  bad  parts  to  NASA  among  others,  including  bad  parts  for 
Station, Shuttle and NASA aircraft. Search warrants are going to be served on 
six companies over the next couple of days. The names of the suppliers are not 
household  names,  and  typically  involve  subcontractor  suppliers.  We  have  been 
involved  in  a  number  of  similar  investigations  and,  unfortunately,  suppliers 
often  represent  that  parts  they  are  supplying  meet  specs  when  they  do  not. 
Sometimes the misrepresentation is made knowingly and intentionally. Serving 
of  warrants  is  sometimes  noticed  by  the  media.  Please  keep  close  hold.  I  have 
sent this message to [redacted] and Pastorek.’’ 

Special  Agent  [redacted]  reported  the  investigation  mentioned  in  the  subject  e- 
mail  referred  to  a  joint  NASA  OIG  investigation  with  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Inves-
tigation (FBI), on a government contractor, ‘‘Max’s Marketplace’’ (NFI) (Exhibit 125). 
On May 22, 2006, Special Agent [redacted] FBI, Huntsville Resident Agency, Ala-
bama,  and  [redacted]  FBI,  Huntsville  Resident  Agency,  were  interviewed  (Exhibit 
125). [redacted] confirmed the subject of the case is Max’s Marketplace and a num-
ber  of  other  government  contractors,  involved  in  the  production  of  substandard 
NASA parts. In June 2004, his office, together with NASA OIG, executed six simul-
taneous  Federal  search  warrants  throughout  Alabama.  [redacted]  advised  that  ap-
proximately one-month prior to the execution of the search warrants, his office held 
a  massive  operations  briefing  at  a  hotel  in  Huntsville.  Approximately  50  law  en-
forcement officers involved in the executions were present. [redacted] stated neither 
O’Keefe, Paul Pastorek (Pastorek), former NASA General Counsel, nor Glen Mahone 
(Mahone) Assistant Administrator for Public Affairs, NASA, were invited to, or were 
present at, the operations briefing. 

The  search  warrants,  as  per  Straub,  were  obtained  in  coordination  with  David 
Estes,  Assistant  United  States  Attorney  (AUSA),  Northern  District  of  Alabama. 
Prior  to  seeking  the  search  warrants,  NASA  OIG  placed  one  of  their  agents  under-
cover to order parts from the various contractors. 

Ponzo stated, ‘‘As I recall O’Keefe was the guy in charge of NASA at the time we 
did  the  search  warrants.’’  Ponzo  felt  that  notifying  O’Keefe  might  have  been  a  pro-
tocol  in  the  ‘‘NASA  chain  of  command.’’  Ponzo  went  on  to  state  that  in  his  esti-
mation,  NASA  OIG  making  a  notification  to  O’Keefe  would  be  ‘‘no  different’’  than 
his office notifying the FBI Director’s Office in Washington, D.C. 

Ponzo stated he was not familiar enough with the reporting requirements between 
the  two  agencies  to  comment  as  to  whether  COBB’s  actions  were  inappropriate. 
However,  Ponzo  was  ‘‘definitely  concerned’’  with  COBB’s  notification  to  Mahone,  in 
the  NASA  Public  Affairs  office.  According  to  Ponzo,  his  office  is  required  to  direct 
any press related inquiries to the assigned AUSA. 

On May 30, 2006, O’Keefe was interviewed (Exhibit 137). O’Keefe stated typically 
COBB  would  not  brief  him  on  criminal  cases.  It  would  be  ‘‘very  unusual’’  if  COBB 
were  to  brief  him  on  criminal  matters.  O’Keefe  recalled  one  occasion  when  COBB 
briefed him on the status of criminal charges against a NASA employee who viewed 
pornographic material on a government computer. O’Keefe did not recall ever being 
briefed  by  COBB  on  the  status  of  upcoming  NASA  OIG  search  warrants  or  under-
cover operations. 

On  May  31,  2006,  Pastorek  was  interviewed  (Exhibit  138).  Pastorek  noted  there 
were  rare  occasions  when  he  received  a  telephone  call  from  COBB  advising  him  of 
the  arrest  of  a  NASA  employee.  He  believes  this  was  done  in  an  effort  to  afford 
NASA  the  ability  to  prepare  should  they  receive  a  query  from  the  news  media. 
Pastorek  was  not  given  details  of  the  event;  merely  that  it  was  going  to  take  place 
later that day. 

On June 28, 2006, Deputy Inspector General Thomas Howard (Howard) was inter-
viewed (Exhibit 185). Howard was asked about NASA OIG notifying NASA manage-
ment  in  advance  of  search  warrant  operations.  Howard’s  testimony  is  covered  on 
pages 57 through 66 of the interview transcript, and he stated, in part: 

Special  Agent  BAHR.  OK.  His  relationship,  Mr.  Cobb’s  relationship,  with  Mr. 
O’Keefe,  did  it  affect  Mr.  Cobb’s  ability  to  maintain  his  independence  and  impar-
tiality as the NASA OIG? 

Mr. HOWARD. No. None whatsoever. 
Special Agent BAHR. You never saw any indication of that? Never had any reason 

to question it? 

Mr. HOWARD. No. No. 
Special Agent BAHR. OK. Did Mr. Cobb brief Mr. O’Keefe on or NASA senior man-

agement on NASA OIG, ongoing NASA OIG audits or investigations? 

Mr. HOWARD. As I said, if during these meetings we thought there was something 

that warranted his attention, yes. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

122 

Special Agent BAHR. OK. How about on the investigation side of the house, what 
information, if any, would Mr. Cobb ever share with Mr. O’Keefe or anyone else on 
the NASA senior management? 

Mr.  HOWARD.  If  there  were  a  search  warrant  executed,  once  we  got  word  from 
the—through  the  investigative  staff  that  the  search  warrant  had  been  executed,  if 
it  was  on  NASA  property,  we  would  generally  give  Mr.  O’Keefe  a  heads  up  and 
sometimes the affected—— 

Special Agent BAHR. Center director or—— 
Mr. HOWARD. Center director or mission head. Yes, it’s a convoluted organization 
at  NASA.  So  that  was  primarily—generally,  in  our  policy,  which  I  believe  is  still 
in writing was that essentially, the SAC would be responsible for notifying the Cen-
ter  director  and  that’s  a—that  was  a  particularly  sensitive  issue  because  at  the 
NASA Centers—I think at all, if not most—the guards are armed. 

And  so  the—you  know,  just  from  a  safety  standpoint,  we  felt  that  the  need—if 
we were going to be armed and making arrests that we needed to have some, coordi-
nation so that they would understand what was happening. 

Special Agent BAHR. Between armed personnel and NASA OIG agents? 
Mr. HOWARD. Yes. Yes. 
Special Agent BAHR. And the security officers? 
Mr. HOWARD. Yes. 
Special Agent BAHR. These advisements of perhaps Mr. O’Keefe or any of the Cen-

ter Directors or you referred to another—— 

Mr. HOWARD. The mission directors. Essentially, the—— 
Special Agent BAHR. Mission directors. 
Mr. HOWARD.—heads of the major groups in headquarters. 
Special  Agent  BAHR.  So  the  advisements  relative  to  the  execution  of  search  war-

rants this always took place after the warrants had been executed—— 
Pages 195–197 

Allegation 47—Inspector General COBB maintained a close, personal relationship 
with  former  NASA  Administrator  Sean  O’Keefe  and  former  NASA  General  Counsel 
Paul Pastorek. 
Investigative Findings 

This  allegation  was  predicated  upon  information  obtained  in  eight  interviews  of 
current  and  former  employees  of  the  NASA  OIG.  These  interviews  were  conducted 
to obtain information regarding various allegations HUD OIG received from the In-
tegrity  Committee  of  the  President  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency.  In  those 
interviews,  the  employees  alleged  that  COBB  maintained  a  personal  relationship 
with  former  NASA  Administrator,  Sean  O’Keefe  (O’Keefe)  and  former  NASA  Gen-
eral Counsel, Paul Pastorek (Pastorek). In addition, it has been alleged that this re-
lationship has interfered with COBB’s independence and may not have allowed him 
to remain impartial regarding audit and investigative findings. 

During  the  investigation,  e-mails  sent  between  O’Keefe  and  COBB  during  their 
tenure  at  NASA  and.  NASA  OIG  respectively  were  reviewed.  In  addition,  e-mails 
sent between COBB and Pastorek were also reviewed. 

The following e-mails depict the type of relationship maintained (Exhibit 118). 

1. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: Sean O’Keefe 
To: rcobb; 
CC: 
Subject: my apologies. 
Date: Tuesday, June 15, 2004 1:53:04 PM 
Attachments: 

Moose—my apologies for standing you up for lunch today—I completely lost track 
of the time and have been overrun with demands today. I owe ya one—many thanks 
for your patience and understanding. regards, Sean’’ 
2. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: Robert Cobb; 
CC: 
Subject: Apologies 
Date: Tuesday, August 03, 2004 12:22:24 PM 
Attachments: 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

123 

Moose—on  further  reflection,  I  owe  you  an  apology  for  today’s  behavior.  For  lots 
of  reasons  I  was  in  a  foul  mood—you  didn’t  deserve  that.  Points  made,  but  could 
have been more effectively conveyed—thanks for not returning it in kind—’’ 
3. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: Robert Cobb; 
CC: 
Subject: Departure 
Date: Monday, December 13, 2004 8:18:45 AM 
Attachments: 

Moose—Before  the  rumor  mill  runs  too  hot  and  heavy,  I  wanted  to  advise  ypu 
[sic]  of  a  personal  development.  LSU  has  advised  that  they  are  considering  me  to 
be  Chancellor.  The  LSU  Board  plans  to  vote  on  the  recommendation  on  Thurs.  If 
they  offer,  as  I  expect  they  will,  I  intend  to  accept.  With  tuition  bills  for  the  first 
of  three  looming,  it  is  only  a  question  of  months  on  how  much  longer  I  could  keep 
up  this  public  service  addiction.  Life  on  the  bayou  will  improve  the  situation  im-
measurably.  Since  I’ve  pressed  you  to  service,  I  owed  you  a  heads  up.  I’ll  make  it 
through Feb in the hopes of a successor confirmed by then. Best regards, Sean’’ 
4. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: Robert Cobb 
To: sean.okeefe@nasa.gov 
CC: 
Subject: talk 
Date: Friday, November 14, 2003 1:29:07 PM 
Attachments: 

Yesterday  I  received  a  call  from  WH  personnel  about  being  on  the  list  of  can-
didates  for  the  position  of  IG  of  the  Coalition  Provisional  Authority.  They  said  if  I 
were  the  guy,  I  would  be  detailed  for  6  months,  then  back  to  NASA.  I  told  them 
I would get back to them this afternoon to tell them if I am interested. I would like 
to discuss this with you; I will call you at 2:15 when, I understand, you may be be-
tween meetings.’’ 
5. E-mail Thread. 
‘‘From: Cobb, Robert W. (HQ–WAH10) 
To: ‘paul.pastorek@arlaw.com’; 
CC: 
Subject:  Re:In  DC  today  and  tomorrow.  Are  you  around?  Will  be  at  IMAX  tonight 
too. 
Date: Wednesday, September 21, 2005 10:40:18 AM 
Attachments: 

I  am  out  of  the  building  until  after  lunch.  Family  to  be  at  Imax  tonight.  Plan  to 

give you a hug! 
Sent from my BlackBerry Wireless Handheld’’ 
‘‘———Original Message——— 
From: Paul G. Pastorek <paul.pastorek@arlaw.com> 
To: Robert ‘Moose’ Cobb <rcobb@hq.nasa.gov> 
Sent: Wed Sep 21 09:02:52 2005 
Subject: In DC today and tomorrow. Are you around? Will be at IMAX tonight too.’’ 
6. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: Paul Pastorek 
To: RCobb@hq.nasa.gov; 
CC: 
Subject: Jazzfest 
Date: Thursday, April 15, 2004 9:31:31 AM 
Attachments: 

Status of activities. 
I  have  a  friend  who  is  working  on  reservations  at  Commanders  Palace  for  either 

Thursday or Friday night. 

I am also working on reservations at a place called Cuvee’s which is terrific. I ate 
there for the first time last week. A relatively new place. If you want I can get you 
in at Emeril’s instead. Let me know. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

124 

We can go with you or you can go off by yourself. You call the shot. 
I  also  recommend  you  go  to  http://www.nojazzfest.com/  and  determine  whether 
you  want  to  go  to  evening  activities  on  Thursday  or  Friday.  In  addition  to  the  offi-
cial  Jazzfest  acts,  there  is  music  all  over  town  at  any  time  of  the  evening  so  you 
could  still  do  dinner  and  skip  the  big  acts  and  see  the  others.  If  you  want  to  do 
a big act, we can skip dinner. 

Kathy  would  like  to  take  your  wife  around  town  on  Thursday  while  you  are  at 
the Conference. She can take her antique shopping, site seeing around town, or even 
to a Plantation home (or homes) outside the city. 

Let me know what you think. Also let me know your flight arrival and departure 

times and that of your wife, if different, so I can make other recommendations.’’ 
Pages 206–217 

Allegation  48—Inspector  General  COBB.  screened  potential  audit  topics  and  in-
vestigative  findings  through  former  NASA  Administrator  Sean  O’Keefe  (O’Keefe) 
and former NASA General Counsel Paul Pastorek (Pastorek). 
Investigative Findings 

[redacted] was interviewed regarding his complaint to the Integrity Committee of 
the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency,  which  was  forwarded  to  HUD 
OIG (Exhibit 8). On February 22, 2006, [redacted] was interviewed and provided the 
following  allegation  (Exhibit  25).  [redacted]  stated  that  he  learned  from  [redacted] 
that  COBB  would  meet  with  O’Keefe  and/or  Pastorek  and  ‘‘screen’’  potential  audit 
topics,  and  audit  findings.  By  doing  this,  COBB  could  determine  O’Keefe’s  and/or 
Pastorek’s  ‘‘acceptability’’  of  a  potential  audit  topic,  or  an  audit  finding.  [redacted] 
COBB  used  this  same  method  to  screen  potential  investigations,  or  investigative 
findings, to ensure they met with O’Keefe’s or Pastorek’s approval, and/or determine 
what audits and investigations the OIG would conduct. 

Based  on  this  information,  a  review  was  conducted  of  e-mails  sent  to  and  from 
COBB. The following are e-mails where COBB discussed audit and investigative in-
formation with NASA officials (Exhibit 118). 
1. E-Mail Thread 
‘‘From: Robert COBB [rcobb@hq.nasa.gov] 
Sent: 12/20/2002 12:45 PM 
To: [redacted] 
Cc: 

jcreedon@mail.hq.nasa.gov; 

sokeefe@mail.hq.nasa.gov; 

ppastorek@mail.hq.nasa.gov; [redacted] 

Subject: facilities issues 

We are looking into a couple of facilities issues; 
1. NASA-wide wind tunnel use and efficiencies associated with that use; 
2. NASA Research park at Ames. 
I’d like to discuss with you these projects so we can take your views into account 

in designing our activities.’’ 
Followed by: 
‘‘From: SOKEEFE@hq.nasa.gov 
Sent: Thursday, December 26, 2002 3:11 PM 
To: rcobb@hq.nasa.gov 
Subject: Re: facilities issues 

Sounds good—thanks for the heads up—regards, Sean’’ 

2. E-Mail Thread 
‘‘———Original Message——— 
From: Robert Cobb [rcobb@hq.nasa.gov] 
Sent: 06/25/2003 01:32 PM 
To:  R  CABANA  <rcabana@ems.jsc.nasa.gov>;  <robert.d.cabanal@jsc.nasa:gov>; 

<robert.d.cabana@nasa.gov>; Bill Readdy <william.f.readdy@nasa.gov> 

fgregory@mail.hq.nasa.gov; 

Cc: 

sokeefe@mail.hq.nasa.gov; 

David.M.Cushing@nasa.gov; thoward@nasa.gov 

Subject: astronaut report 

My  office  was  close  to  issuing  a  report  on  the  astronaut  corps  at  the  time  of  the 
Columbia accident. I stopped release of the report because the message was not ap-
propriate  at  the  time.  Given  that  NASA  is  contemplating  a  new  astronaut  class,  I 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

125 

believe.  the  circumstances  have  changed  and  the  report  should  surface.  My  staff  is 
coordinating with Code M audit liaison officials on this matter.’’ 
Followed by: 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: rcobb@hq.nasa.gov; wreaddy@hq.nasa.gov; 
CC: 
Subject: Re: astronaut report 
Date: Thursday, June 26, 2003 10:01:36 AM 
Attachments: 

Thanks  for  the  heads  up,  Moose.  We’ll  watch  it  carefully  and  respond  promptly.’’ 

3. E-mail Thread 
‘‘———Original Message——— 
From: Robert Cobb [rcobb@hq.nasa.gov] 
Sent: 06/27/2003 05:44 PM 
To: sokeefe@mail.hq.nasa.gov 
Subject: Fwd: CAIB Observations Letter and Enclosures 

Here  is  the  draft  of  my  observations  on  CAIB  independence,  with  attachments. 
My expectation would be to issue the letter sometime before the CAIB issues its re-
port. Please review and let me know what you think. I will be out the week of July 
4, but will be receiving e-mail.’’ 
Followed by: 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: rcobb@hq.nasa.gov; 
CC: 
Subject: Re:Fwd: CAIB Observations Letter and Enclosures 
Date: Sunday, June 29, 2003 10:44:16 AM 
Attachments: 

Thnks Moose—will advise/comment soonest.’’ 

4. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: Sean O’keefe 
To: Robert.Cobb@hq.nasa.gov; 
CC: 
Subject: 
Date: Monday, July 07, 2003 10:27:35 AM 
Attachments: 

Moose—I’ve  reviewed  your  paper  on  the  Board  independence  issue.  This  is  very 
timely and will likely be helpful input as the Board prepares to release its findings. 
We’ve  tried  to  be  responsive  in  the  establishment  and  conduct  of  this  investigation 
and  your  observations  verify  my  impressions  on  that  score  thanks  for  the  oppor-
tunity to comment. regards, Sean’’ 
5. E-mail Thread 

‘‘At 04:43 PM 7/30/2003—0400, you wrote: 
FYI.  OIG  may  look  into  procedures  for  issuing  bonuses  to  NASA’s  political 
>appointees.  This  is  an  issue  Executive  Branch  wide  and  has  received  press 
>attention.>’’ 
Followed by: 
‘‘From: Sean O’keefe 
To: Robert Cobb; 
CC: 
Subject: Re: bonus issue 
Date: Wednesday, July 30, 2003 6:57:24 PM 
Attachments: 

sure’’ 

6. E-mail Thread 
‘‘———Original Message——— 
From: Robert Cobb [rcobb@hq.nasa.gov] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

126 

Sent: 04/26/2004 04:26 PM 
To: fgregory@nasa.gov 
CC: sean.okeefe@nasa.gov; gwendolyn.brown-1@nasa.gov 
Subject: financial management hearing 

FYI.  I  have  been  asked  to  testify  on  financial  management  at  NASA  on  May  12 
before  the  House  Govt  Reform  Subcommittee  on  Government  Efficiency  and  Finan-
cial Management. I plan to comply with the request.’’ 
Followed by: 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: Robert Cobb; fgregory@nasa.gov; 
CC: gwendolyn.brown-1@nasa.gov; Paul Pastorek; John Schumacher; 
Subject: Re: financial management hearing 
Date: Monday, April 26, 2004 5:33:12 PM 
Attachments: 

Of course—that’s during your retreat?’’ 

7. E-mail Thread 
‘‘———Original Message——— 
From: Robert Cobb [rcobb@hq.nasa.gov] 
Sent: 06/16/2004 02:11 PM 
To: sean.okeefe@nasa.gov 
Subject: bad parts case >fyi. 

Working  with  FBI  and  Defense  Criminal  Investigative  Service  and  the 
>Department  of  Justice,  we  have  been  involved  in  an  undercover  operation 
>targeting  suppliers  of  bad  parts  to  NASA  among  others,  including  bad  parts  >for 
Station, Shuttle and NASA aircraft. Search warrants are going to be >served on six 
companies over the next couple of days. The names of the >suppliers are not house-
hold  names,  and  typically  involve  subcontractor  >suppliers.  We  have  been  involved 
in a number of similar investigations >and, unfortunately, suppliers often represent 
that  parts  they  are  >supplying  meet  specs  when  they  do  not.  Sometimes  the  mis-
representation  is  >made  knowingly  and  intentionally.  Serving  of  warrants  is  some-
times  >noticed  by  the  media.  Please  keep  close  hold.  I  have  sent  this  message  >to 
Mahone and Pastorek.’’ 
Followed by: 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: Robert Cobb; 
CC: 
Subject: Re: bad parts case 
Date: Thursday, June 17, 2004 10:58:12 AM 
Attachments: 

OK—keep me posted—more incoming cowpies I suspect’’ 

8. E-mail Thread 
‘‘———Original Message——— 
From: Robert Cobb [rcobb@hq.nasa.gov] 
Sent: 01/12/2005 01:42 PM 
To: sean.okeefe@nasa.gov 
Subject: Strategic Planning 

Sean:  After  receiving  some  inquiries  from  the  Hill,  we  have  been  looking  at  the 
role  of  Dr.  Elachi  in  connection  with  Strategic  Planning  activities.  Quite  obviously, 
the concern is about conflicts; we have found nothing illegal about it, and the ques-
tion is do we have an opinion about the appearances. In connection with this, I am 
going  to  send  an  e-mail  to  Shoe  requesting  documents  that  reflect  on  Dr.  Elachi’s 
role.  I  wanted  to  give  you  a  heads  up.  I  have  not  had  a  discussion  with  Charles 
about  this,  although  his  folks  know  we  are  interested  as  we  have  been  rummaging 
around  in  the  contract  and  talking  to  his  counsel’s  office  and  others.  Of  course,  we 
are aware of NASA’s counsel’s approval of the arrangement and et cetera. I will be 
sure to discuss this with you and Charles before we report out. 

Regards, 
Moose’’ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

127 

Followed by: 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: Robert Cobb; 
CC: 
Subject: Re: Strategic Planning 
Date: Thursday, January 13, 2005 1:13:35 PM 
Attachments: 

Thanks Moose—I think we touched all the right bases here and did it by the book 
in setting this up. As for appearances—Charles brings a lot to the equation and he 
is  probably  the  most  objective  of  all  the  scientists  given  that  he  doesn’t  represent 
any  one  discipline  and  he  has  mgt  responsibilities  that  injects  a  sense  of  realism 
into our planning. As evidence, just look at how the road map teams have been as-
sembled (in accord with FACA etc) and are operating vs the endless circular motion 
of the JSAC? I rest my case.’’ 
9. E-mail thread 
‘‘From: Robert Cobb 
To: paul.g.pastorek@nasa.gov; 
CC: 
Subject: Fwd: KSC Case 
Date: Wednesday, November 05, 2003 2:45:53. PM 
Attachments: 

FYI  on  Hi-Shear  case.  If  you  forward  to  others,  please  let  them  know  that  it  is 

sensitive information about an ongoing investigation, not for general release. 
X-Sender: lcarring@198.116.64.6 
X-Mailer: QUALCOMM Windows Eudora Version 6.0.0.22 
Date: Wed, 05 Nov 2003 14:26:30–0500 
To: Robert.W.Cobb@nasa.gov, thoward @nasa.gov 
From: ‘Lance G. Carrington’ <lcarring@nasa.gov> 
Subject: KSC Case 

Moose, 
Here’s  a  summary  that  can  be  shared  with  Code  G  regarding  our  ongoing  inves-
tigation. This case pertains to the letters sent from KSC to Mr. Pastorek where USA 
asks KSC for access to the center to prepare for their civil case against High Shear. 

Thanks, Lance 

Hi-Shear Technology Corporation 
Case Number: O–KE–00–0107–O 

This  investigation  was  initiated  based  on  information  provided  by  United  Space 
Alliance (USA), Cape Canaveral, FL. It was alleged that Hi-Shear President George 
Trahan  and  Vice  President  Herb  Salit  were  attempting  to  extort  contracts  from 
USA. USA operates as the Space Flight Operations Contractor (SFOC) under NASA 
contract  #NAS9–20000.  USA  awarded  Purchase  Order  (PO)  #300531,  valued  at 
$596,539, to Hi-Shear for the production of 17-Second Delay Cutters, which are con-
sidered Launch Critical Hardware. After numerous delays caused by both USA and 
Hi-Shear,  a  new  delivery  date  was  being  negotiated.  The  Cutters  were  complete, 
pending a final quality inspection by USA. Approximately $395,035 was paid to Hi- 
Shear under the PO. According to USA, on at least three occasions between Decem-
ber  28,  1999  and  present,  Salit  attempted  to  extort  the  award  of  another  USA  PO 
that  was  in  the  pre-award  phase,  in  exchange  for  the  delivery  of  the  Cutters.  Hi- 
Shear  also  attempted  to  extort  USA  by  tying  the  receipt  of  the  bonnet  thruster 
award to the delivery of forward and aft separation bolts. 

The investigation was accepted by the U.S. Attorney’s Office (USAO), Middle Dis-
trict of Florida. Several conversations between Salit, Trahan and a USA representa-
tive  regarding  the  alleged  extortion  attempt  by  Hi-Shear  were  recorded.  USA  later 
terminated  its  contracts  with  Hi-Shear  and  qualified  another  firm  to  manufacture 
the separation bolts. As a result, Hi-Shear filed suit against USA. 

Subsequently  a  target  letter  was  issued  to  Salit.  Salit  initially  agreed  to  plead 
guilty  and  cooperate  in  both  the  civil  and  criminal  cases;  however  that  agreement 
has  not  materialized  due  to  Salit’s  demands.  The  USAO  recently  released  copies  of 
the recordings and transcripts to USA and Hi-Shear counsel for use in the civil trial, 
which  was  scheduled  to  begin  October  27,  2003,  but  has  been  continued  to  address 
discovery issues. 

Update:  A  draft  OIG  report  of  investigation  is  being  prepared  at  the  request  of 
the  USAO  who  intends  to  seek  an  indictment  of  Salit  and  Hi-Shear  for  violations 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

128 

of Title 18 U.S.C. § 1951 (Interference with commerce by threats or violence). A final 
decision has not been made on seeking an indictment of Trahan. 

Further examples of e-mails between COBB and O’Keefe may be found in (Exhibit 

113). 

On  May  30,  2006,  O’Keefe  was  interviewed  (Exhibit  137).  Asked,  ‘‘How  often  did 
COBB  brief  you  on  audits  and  investigations  prior  to  drafts  being  available,  or  be-
fore  charges  were  filed?’’  O’Keefe  stated  that  he  would  generally  meet  with  COBB 
once  a  month  (or  more)  on  audit  issues.  For  example,  O’Keefe  reported  a  major 
NASA  OIG  audit  that  received  more  of  his  attention  than  any  other  issue  was  the 
audit  of  ‘‘NASA  financial  statements.’’  However,  O’Keefe  advised  COBB  had  an 
‘‘open door’’ to visit with him at any time concerning essential matters. With regard 
to  NASA  OIG  audits,  O’Keefe  stated  he  always  told  COBB,  ‘‘On  anything,  come  to 
your  judgments  and  let  me  know  your  recommendations.’’  O’Keefe  characterized 
COBB’s involvement with the audit function as ‘‘proactive.’’ As an example, O’Keefe 
stated COBB hired Deputy Inspector General Thomas Howard (Howard), an experi-
enced audit manager from the Government Accountability Office, to further enhance 
NASA  OIG’s  audit  capabilities.  O’Keefe  advised  NASA  OIG  audits  generally  cen-
tered  on  process  and  procedural  issues,  not  specific  NASA  programs  or  missions. 
O’Keefe  and  COBB  would  regularly  ‘‘collaborate’’  prior  to  audit  activities,  to  deter-
mine which inquiries could most benefit the agency [NASA] and ‘‘the American peo-
ple.’’ 

Mr.  O’Keefe  stated  typically  COBB  would  not  brief  him  on  criminal  cases.  It 
would  be  ‘‘very  unusual’’  if  COBB  were  to  brief  him  on  criminal  matters.  O’Keefe 
recalled  one  occasion  when  COBB  briefed  him  on  the  status  of  criminal  charges 
against a NASA employee who viewed pornographic material on a government com-
puter. 

COBB was interviewed on June 27 and 29, 2006. His response to questions associ-
ated  with  this  area  start  on  Page  72,  line  19  through  Page  78,  line  23,  and  Page 
87,  line  17  through  Page  94,  line  8  of  his  interview  transcript  (Exhibit  182).  COBB 
stated, in part: 

Q.  Do  I  understand  correctly  that  Mr.  O’Keefe  was  concerned  about  the  audit 
function;  and  you  had  conversations  about  that,  and  not  so  much  about  the  inves-
tigations  function  of  NASA  OIG;  is  that  correct?  He  felt  as  if  there  were  problems 
with the audit function? 

A.  You’d  have  to  talk  to  him  about  what  his  recollection  is  and  all  that.  It  is  dif-

ficult for me to characterize what he thought. 

Q. Is that what he communicated to you? 
A. My recollection of the conversation would be that we didn’t get into specific ac-
tivities  or  whatever  but  that  just  as  a  philosophy,  that  an  Office  of  Inspector  Gen-
eral  has  an  opportunity  to  add  value  to  an  organization.  And  it  should  work  hard 
to do that; 

That’s  essentially  it.  I  don’t  recall  anything  specific  from  the  conversation,  but  I 
do  remember  him  thinking—you  know—and  me  being  in  full  agreement  that  that 
is the nature. We might have talked about a consultative role, that in effect an Of-
fice of Inspector General can provide a consultation in connection. 

You  know,  I’m  aware  and  he  is  fully  aware  having  been  around  government  a 
long time of what the independent element is in connection with the activities after 
Office  of  Inspector  General;  and  I  can  say  that  he  and  his  staff  accorded  complete 
respect for that independence. 

I  never  felt  a  circumstance  where  he  articulated  that  I  should—I  should  have 
some  opinion  or  should—if  he  wanted  us  to  do  some  kind  of  work,  I  told  him  the 
same thing I told every other senior manager in the agency. 

Hey,  we’d  be  happy  to  consider  whether  or  not  you  thought  there  was  a  fertile 
ground  for  us  to  audit  in  connection  with  an  activity,  whether  or  not  I  can  tell  you 
not  too  many  takers  in  that  department  of  saying  bring  in  your  auditors  and  con-
duct an audit of our particular activity, but—— 

Q.  All  right.  You  touched  on  this  in  your  last  response.  Your  philosophy  and/or 
understanding in regard to how an agency IG and the agency head should interact. 
You  have  made  reference  to  a  consultative  relationship.  Can  you  explain  that  and 
then what your philosophy under Mr. O’Keefe and under Mr. Griffin is as your role 
and Inspector General in your interaction with the agency head? 

A. This is the kind of conversation we have in the office all the time. I’m collabo-
rative  in  terms  of  my  direct  reports.  When  you  get  to  the  independence  issue,  you 
can have a group of people that are the most independent people in the world, and 
they  never  talk  to  anyone,  because  once  you  get  out  of  the  box  and  start  talking 
to people, that’s an incursion on your independence. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00134 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

129 

I can tell you in connection with audits that we’ve had. I’ve worried about wheth-
er or not our auditors at times were independent in connection with projects because 
there would be people who would come and in effect push an issue at auditors that 
suggest,  gee,  this  program,  my  program  should  get  more  money  than  that  one  over 
there,  it  shouldn’t.  I  can  tell  you.  I’ve  seen  audit  work  where  it  felt  like,  gee,  the 
program could have written the audit work. 

We’ve  had  those.  In  terms  of  the  consultative  role,  I  think  that  might  have  been 
a  word  that  O’Keefe  used  in  that  conversation.  I  don’t  recall  specifically  it  would 
not  be  inconsistent  with  my  impression  of  what  he’d  have  said.  Or  there  is  a  docu-
ment  that  Clay  Johnson  in  connection  with  the  IG  community  has  circulated  with 
the assistance of the IG community that talks about in effect supposed to be a sug-
gestive governance document between IGs and their agencies. 

It  is  those  types  of  things  I’m  talking  about  as  being,  in  effect,  at  least  from  the 
O’Keefe  side  what  they  were  looking  for  in  connection  with  a  role  of  an  Inspector 
General. 

Q. What did Mr. O’Keefe say he was looking for in his Inspector General? 
A.  My  guess  that  he  would  have  talked  ,  about  something,  whether  he  used  the 
word  consultative  or,  that  in  effect  you  can  go  and  obtain  an  independent  analysis 
of issues and provide that to the agency, that that is a valuable—that is a valuable 
commodity,  and  that—you  know—again  getting  it  before—getting  it  early,  getting 
advice  early  when  the  agency  can  take  advantage  of  that  information  rather  than 
after there has been a problem and a—you know, of note. 

Q. So getting advice from the Inspector General as to an issue within the agency 

before as opposed to after the fact, after the milk is spilt, so to speak? 

A. You go ask him what we talked about. It wouldn’t surprise me if he had a com-
pletely different recollection. I’m walking away in that meeting with one impression. 
I  don’t  know  his  impression.  I’d  say  everything  I  said  here  is  impressionistic  of  a 
conversation that may have lasted 45 minutes that took place four-and-a-half years 
ago. 

Q. But you spent 4 years as the Inspector General under the O’Keefe administra-

The WITNESS. Right. Unless my math is wrong, I think the overlap of our service 

tion, correct? 

was less than 3 years. 
By Ms. Bahr. 

Q. OK. 
A. From April of 2002 to February of 2005. 
I  took—and  with  substantial  discussion  with  my—again,  I  have  a  collaborative 
style  of  conducting  business.  I  asked  for  Frank  LaRocca’s  opinion.  I  asked  for  who-
ever  my  senior  staffs  opinions  in  connection  with  activities.  I  don’t  always  do  what 
they  say.  We  talk  about  it.  I  do  what  I  think  is  right  and—you  know—the—that’s 
the  way  I  conduct  business.  In  terms  of  my  relationship  with  Sean  O’Keefe,  you 
know,  I’d  say  we  had  a  very  good,  professional  working  relation  where  if  I  thought 
there  was  an  issue  that  he  had  to  be  concern  about,  I  had  no  difficulty  or  problem 
communicating to him. 

I  tried  to  have  as  much  contact  with  him  as  his  schedule  could  tolerate.  It  made 
it  so  that  I  could  be  best  informed  as  to  what  the  issues  of  the  day  were  at  NASA. 
Q.  If  we  could  go  back  to  the  original  question.  In  terms  of  what  information  did 
you  share  either  with  Mr.  O’Keefe  or  with  the  center  directors  or  any  other  senior 
staff  members  within  NASA  related  to  what  was  going  on  on  the  investigative  side 
of the House? 

A. On that, I was giving security as a coordinating point. I might ask a question, 
have  we  coordinated  in  security  in  connection  with  the  search  warrant  that’s  going 
to be served at a certain center. That would be something that the staff level. 

There might be certain investigations like a safety investigation. We get—give an 
example,  prior  to  the  launch  of  STS  114  last  summer,  we  got  an  allegation  there 
was  a  piece  on  the  external  tank  that’s  a  bad  piece  and  this  is  about  a  month  or 
3  weeks  before  launch  is  supposed  to  take  place.  The  fact  that  we’re  going  to  have 
a  criminal  investigation  possibly  arising  out  of  this  allegation,  there’s  a  weighing 
balance on how to handle it. I would talk with staff on what is our vehicle for com-
municating what we need—what limited information we need to communicate to the 
agency. 

And  typically,  if  we  had,  for  example,  a  member  of  senior  staff  who  was  under 
investigation,  I  would  sit  down  with  my  assistant  Inspector  General  for  investiga-
tions,  my  counsel,  my  deputy,  Tom  Howard,  and  we  would  sit  and  talk  about  what 
is  the  best  time  to  communicate  to  the  agency  this  sensitive  information  that  we 
have  so  that  it,  for  example,  can  take,  in  the  instance  of  safety,  a  remedial  action 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00135 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

130 

to  make  sure  we  don’t  blow  up  seven  astronauts  on  launch  or  alternatively,  I  can 
give you an example. 

After getting an OK from whoever my IT was in questions with the administrator 
Griffin,  our  office  in  conjunction  with  DCIS  was  going  to  serve  search  warrants  on 
orbital  scientists.  Griffin  used  to  work  there.  I  think  he’d  rather  hear  it  from  his 
Inspector General than see it on TV or read about it in the newspaper. Roughly si-
multaneous with the execution of the search warrants, by prearrangement with my 
investigative  team,  I  would  communicate  to  Griffin,  hey,  here’s  a  heads  up.  We’re 
going  to  be  serving  a  search  warrant  in  15  minutes  or  5  minutes.  I  don’t  know  the 
articulation  of  time.  It  was  close,  worked  out  with  my  staff  that.  Would  be  my 
modus  operandi  on  sensitive  investigative  matters  whether  O’Keefe,  center  direc-
tors, general counsel, anybody else. 

I  would  just  go  and  say,  hey,  we  got  an  investigation  going  on  such  and  such. 
Thought  you  ought  to  know.  That  would  not  be  my—the  manner  in  which  I  would 
deal. 

Q.  OK.  What  about  search  warrants?  You  spoke  about  communicating  with  the 
center  directors  relative  to  search  warrants.  How  would  that  be  communicated  and 
in what time-frame? 

A. Well, typically—— 
Q. Or arrests? Search warrants or arrests? 
A.  Typically,  those  types  of  things  would  be  coordinated  by  my  staff  and  would 
not  involve  a  phone  call  by  me  in  questions  with  the  issue.  How  exactly  to  execute 
them.  I  would  want—I  would  not  want  our  armed  agents  going  into  a  facility  with 
other  armed  agents  who  were  not  under  my  employ  without  giving  a  notice  to,  for 
example, security. There are certain protocols that have been established of commu-
nicating with security, maybe communicating with chief counsel, or whatever, where 
we’re going to be doing this. 

Q. What about the center directors? 
A. I typically would not be involved in picking up the phone and telling them that 
something  was  about  to  happen.  There  might  be  instances  where  we  sent  e-mails 
to  some  people,  but  that  would  not  be  a  normal  thing.  Whatever  I  would  do,  again 
my  modus  operandi  is  whether  it  was  Kevin  Winters,  Lance  Carrington,  it  would 
be I’m thinking this person needs to know this certain information for the following 
reason. When would be an appropriate time to communicate that information? 

And  taking  the  lead  from  the  investigators  in  terms  of  obviously  you  don’t  want 
to do anything that in any way, shape, or form can negatively impact an investiga-
tion. 

And  so  I’m  sensitive  to  that,  and  that’s  why  I  had  a  protocol  that  for  myself  was 
in  effect.  I’m  not  going  to  go  tell  somebody  about  an  investigation  unless  people  in 
my office are on board with the communications. 

Let  me  tell  you.  We  have  a  number  of  very  serious  and  sensitive  investigations 
that  have  been  conducted  throughout  my  tenure  but  right  now,  and  this  protocol 
and how we communicate with the agency, the agency—if you go and talk to—if you 
conduct  an  investigation  involving  a  senior  agency  official  and  talk  to  five  people, 
the likelihood, it is going to get back to them. 

So how can you control that? You do the best you can. And—but you do it working 
with  an  eyes  toward  the  prize  in  terms  of  what  we’re  doing,  how  we  do  it,  how  we 
communicate the information we need to. 

I  wouldn’t  go  off  by  my  loan  some  and  wing  it  in  terms  of  what  types  of  things 

we’re looking at. 

Q. If I understand you generally; it would be your staff that would make the con-
tacts  or  communications  to  either  the  security  personnel  on  centers  or  perhaps  the 
center directors that was not generally something you did but were there occasions 
when  that  occurred  specifically  with  the  center  directors  when  you  would  commu-
nicate  directly  with  them  as  to  either  a  search  warrant  or  an  arrest  that  was  emi-
nent? 

A.  I’m  not  coming  up  with  examples  to  give  you  of  where  I  made  those  calls.  I 
cannot  say  definitively  it  didn’t  happen.  I  would  say  typically  staff  would  handle 
those communications. 

Q. What staff members? 
A.  The  special  agents  in  charge,  or  the  resident  agent  in  charge  would,  in  effect, 
have the responsibility for making sure that the people that needed to know—espe-
cially, you can have a lot of safety issues in connection with a search warrant—that 
the people that needed to know about it would know. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00136 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

131 

Q.  Was  that  protocol  within  the  Inspector  General’s  office,  NASA  Inspector  Gen-
eral’s  office  that  one  of  the  people  that  needed  to  know  was  the  center  director  or 
the center directors? 

A. I don’t know what the paper says. 
Q. What paper? Are you referring to NASA regulations? 
A. Yes. What our internal guidance articulates in connection with this. 
Q. What was the practice? 
A. My guess is the practice was not consistently applied. That in effect it requires 
a  judgment  in  every  case  as  to  what  the  sensitivities  are  in  terms  of  carrying  out 
the  particulars.  So  it  may—you  know;  it  may  involve  a  call  to  security  office  might 
involve a call to the facility people to get access to a particular portion of the build-
ing that would not otherwise be accessible. 

But  you  wouldn’t  always  call  the  people  in  a  facility.  Whether  it  involved  a  con-
versation  with  the  chief  counsel,  I  can  tell  from  you  my  perspective,  and  what  I 
would  generally  have  communicated  about  this  topic  is  we  need  to  let  the  people 
know.  We  do  not  do  our  work  in  a  vacuum.  We  need  to  let  the  people  who  need 
to know about certain activity know. 
Pages 222–225 

Allegation 50—Inspector General COBB frequently had lunch with former Admin-
istrator  Sean  O’Keefe  and  former  General  Counsel  Paul  Pastorek,  which  may  have 
caused an appearance of lack of independence and impartiality. 
Investigative Findings 

On February 22, 2006, and March 10, 2006, [redacted] (Exhibit 25) [redacted] (Ex-
hibit  41)  were  interviewed  regarding  complaints  and  information  they  submitted  to 
the  Integrity  Committee  of  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency, 
which  was  forwarded  to  HUD  OIG  (Exhibits  8  &  7,  respectively).  In  their  inter-
views, [redacted] stated that COBB frequently had lunch with former Administrator 
Sean  O’Keefe  (O’Keefe)  and  former  General  Counsel  Paul  Pastorek  (Pastorek), 
which may have caused an appearance of lack of independence and impartiality. 

Based  on  these  allegations,  a  review  of  COBB’s  e-mails  was  conducted.  The  fol-
lowing  are  e-mails  between  COBB,  O’Keefe,  and  Pastorek  that  identify  instances 
where they discussed having lunch: 
1. 
‘‘From: Sean O’Keefe 
To: Robert.Cobb@hq.nasa.gov; 
CC: 
Subject: 
Date: Tuesday, May 06, 2003 3:09:48 PM 
Attachments: 

Moose—sorry  I  stiffed  ya  for  lunch  today.  I  spent  quality  time  waiting  for  the 
House  Govt  Reform  Cmte  to  fire  up  the  hearing  on  human  capital  legislation.  But 
I  was  in  good  company  with  the  SEC  Chairman—upon  learning  who  I  was  holding 
up,  his  legis  affairs  rep  advised  as  how  I  should  tell  our  IG  to  cool  his  jets  and  get 
a life. just repeating the comment, clearly from someone who believes she knows you 
. . .  too  well,  it  would  appear!  t’was  a  pleasure  talking  with  your  better  half.  re-
gards and apologies, Sean’’ 
2. 
‘‘From: Robert Cobb 
To: Paul Pastorek; 
CC: 
Subject: Re: lunch 
Date: Tuesday, September 02, 2003 12:26:27 PM 
Attachments: 

Thank you, sir. 
At 11:03 AM 9/2/2003—0400, you wrote: 
Looks  like  Sean  may  be  around  after  all,  so  I  had  [redacted]  reserved  a  table  at 

Columbia Cafe. 

something different? 
Robert W. Cobb 
Inspector General 

I  think  it  is  just  you  and  me.  Do  you  want  to  eat  upstairs  at  noon  or  so  or  do 

National Aeronautics and Space 

Administration 
Washington, D.C. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00137 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Paul G. Pastorek 
General Counsel 

132 

National Aeronautics and Space 

Administration 
Washington, D.C.’’ 

On  April  20,  2006,  [redacted]  was  interviewed  (Exhibit  67).  According  to  [re-
dacted]  COBB  and  O’Keefe,  along  with  other  NASA  senior  staff,  ate  together  every 
Tuesday.  The  lunches  took  place  either  in  O’Keefe’s  office  or  sometimes  in  the  Co-
lumbia  Cafe´,  which  is  located  next  to  O’Keefe’s  office.  These  lunches  are  reflected 
on COBB’s calendar [redacted] provided the interviewing agents with printed copies 
of  COBB’s  calendar  covering  the  time  period  July  2004  through  April  2006.  [re-
dacted]  The  lunch  meetings  were  sometimes  referred  to  by  COBB  as  being  at  the 
‘‘Administrator’s  hideaway.’’  [redacted]  stated  the  Administrator’s  hideaway  was  ei-
ther O’Keefe’s office or a reserved corner of the Columbia Cafe. According [redacted] 
COBB  sometimes  puts  other  lunch  dates  on  the  calendar  and  he  sometimes  puts 
down  whom  he  was  meeting  for  lunch,  but  sometimes  he  does  not.  [redacted]  re-
called that O’Keefe and COBB had lunch alone together on one occasion. 

[redacted]  advised  COBB  does  not  have  lunch  with  the  current  NASA  Adminis-
trator,  Michael  Griffin  (Griffin).  COBB  and  Griffin  may  have  had  a  total  of  five 
meetings since Griffin became Administrator. Lately COBB has attempted to sched-
ule meetings with Griffin and, Griffin has continually postponed the meetings to the 
point where they are ultimately not rescheduled. 

A review was conducted of COBB’s OIG official calendar for the period April 2002 
to April 2006. This review showed that COBB met with O’Keefe for lunch at a min-
imum of two times per month from April 2002 through February 2005, the time pe-
riod  when  COBB  and  O’Keefe  were  at  NASA  together.  The  lunches  were  called 
‘‘Tag-Up’’ or ‘‘Administrator’s Hideaway.’’ Some of those lunches included [redacted] 
and Paul Pastorek. In addition, in some months the lunches exceeded two times per 
month. 

COBB’s  schedule  did  not  show  evidence  he  continued  those  lunches  with  current 

Administrator, Michael Griffin. 

luncheons 

On May 30, 2006, O’Keefe was interviewed (Exhibit 137). O’Keefe was asked how 
often he held ‘‘Director’s luncheons’’ with COBB. O’Keefe stated, ‘‘I’m not sure. Once 
or  twice  a  month  I  suppose,  or  more  often.’’  O’Keefe  stated  others  often  present  at 
the 
included:  Fred  Gregory,  Deputy  Administrator,  NASA;  John 
Schumacher (Schumacher), Chief of Staff, NASA; and Courtney Stadd, Chief of Staff 
prior  to  Schumacher.  O’Keefe  stated  the  luncheons  always  had  a  working  atmos-
phere. 

On  June  27  and  29,  2006,  Inspector  General  Robert  Watson  (Moose)  COBB  was 
interviewed (Exhibit 182). His response to questions associated with this area start 
on Page 79 line 5 and Page 98 line 22 of his transcript, and states, in part: 

A. But what I was part of was as his schedule would dictate, we—I tried to have 
a  weekly  luncheon  with  Mr.  O’Keefe;  and  again  his  schedule  was  extraordinarily 
busy.  If  he  wanted  to  talk  to  me  at  any  time,  I  was  available  to  talk  to  him.  And 
to  me,  as  a  consequence  of  this  interaction  with  Mr.  O’Keefe,  our  office  was  able 
to get involved and make contributions and establish credibility that it formerly did 
not have. 

Q. What credibility? 
A. Well, for example, when we made an audit recommendation, the agency would 
implement  it.  That  was  something  that  did  not—was  not  occurring  as  far  as  I  can 
tell  at  least  from  a  statistical  review  of  what  was  going  on  under  my  predecessor. 
Q.  OK.  You  said  that  you  would  have  weekly  lunches  with  Mr.  O’Keefe.  You 
would attend staff meetings on not a regular basis, on average how often would you 
attend a senior staff meeting? 

A.  That  would  be  a  very  exceptional  circumstance  that  I  would  attend  any  kind 

of senior staff function. There were instances where it happened. 

Q.  Aside  from  your—I  believe  you  said  weekly  lunches  at  NASA  headquarters 

with Mr. O’Keefe, did you ever have lunch or dinner outside of NASA together? 

A. Alone with Sean O’Keefe, me and him again I went to events attended by sen-

ior staff. At least one. I typically was not invited to those types of things. 

Q. Why did you attend that particular one? 
A. Because O’Keefe asked me to come to a particular event which was at the Sten-
nis Space Flight Center in Mississippi there. Was a dinner afterward and I attended 
both of those at his request. 

Q. Was there a specific reason why he requested you to attend? 
A. Yes. There was a presentation that was going to be given by a contractor who 
had come in to analyze NASA culture and, in effect, a consulting firm. It was going 
to  communicate  about  its  finding  and  provide  a  status  report.  Because  of  my  inter-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00138 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

133 

est in all of the Columbia accident investigation activities, including NASA culture, 
I  had  been  involved  in  a  lot  of  different  aspects  of  that.  O’Keefe  thought  it  would 
be  worthwhile  for  me  to  attend  the  presentation  that  those  people  were  given  and 
I did so. 

Q.  OK.  Outside  of  that  kind  of  lunch  or  dinner  that  obviously  appears  to  be  di-

rectly related to business, were there any lunches or dinners? 

A. There may have been. 
Q.  Either  one-on-one  or  with  others  in  attendance?  I’m  generally  talking  about 

more of a social setting, smaller group? 

A.  I  understand.  We’re.  talking  about  a  person  where  there’d  be  events  at  the 
Smithsonian.  I  would  attend  those  for  the  same  reason  I  articulated  as  attending 
other things so people can see who you are, so you can get information from people 
and pass it on to staff. 

Q. That’s more business related? 
A.  I  understand.  I’m  seeing  O’Keefe  a  fair  amount.  Not  every  week.  But  a  fair 
amount. I’m Just trying to articulate. I cannot remember whether or not I ever went 
out  to  dinner.  I  think  I  would  remember  if  I  had  a  personal  one-on-one  dinner  or 
one  on  two  lunch  or  dinner  with  him.  I  don’t  recall  it.  Not  while  he  was  NASA  ad-
ministrator.  It  may  have  happened.  I’m  just  trying  to  think.  Whether  there  was  a 
time  where  he  called  me  up  and  said,  Moose,  we  ought  to  go  spend  time  together. 
I can’t remember that happening. But. I’m not saying it didn’t because I’m just say-
ing I can’t remember it. 
Page 231 

. . . their (yellow book) standards and hide behind their pencils.’’ [redacted] stat-
ed that COBB ends his meetings by saying, ‘‘Everyone is in agreement now, right?’’ 
[redacted] said; ‘‘Who is going to question him or raise issues?’’ [redacted] noted that 
it was very clear to all the staff that you do not question what COBB states. 

[redacted]  recalled  that  in  June  or  July  2005,  COBB  and  [redacted]  appeared  at 
an  Audit  Liaison  Representative  (ALR)  Conference.  Somebody  there  asked  COBB 
why so many people have departed NASA OIG. COBB replied that he, ‘‘wears them 
leaving  like  a  badge  of  honor.’’  [redacted]  stated  that  over  100  employees  have  de-
parted NASA OIG since COBB arrived. [redacted] advised NASA was once voted the 
best place to work, and now it is one of the worst. 

[redacted]  said  the  statement,  ‘‘There  are  1,000  people  to  take  your  place,’’  was 
a commonly used saying by COBB. [redacted] recalled when one of the auditors who 
departed  NASA  OIG  was  staring  out  of  the  office  window  on  his  last  day  at  work. 
When  [redacted]  asked  him  what  he  was  doing,  the  auditor  replied,  I’m  looking  for 
the 1,000 people who are lined up waiting to take my place.’’ 

[redacted]  stated  that  COBB  is  ‘‘a  mean,  vicious  and  arrogant  man  who  needs  to 
go.’’  [redacted]  believed  COBB  has  ‘‘wrecked  many  careers,’’  but  feels  he  [redacted] 
got  lucky  and  found  another  employment  opportunity.  [redacted]  thought  that  he 
would  end  his  career  at  NASA  OIG  and  not  be  forced  to  go  somewhere  else.  [re-
dacted]  explained  NASA  OIG  staff  went  through  a  lot  by  saying,  ‘‘reorganization 
after  reorganization,  foul  language  and  intimidation,  COBB  misusing  his  investiga-
tive powers and having employees forced out and replaced with unqualified cronies.’’ 
On  March  15,  2006,  a  confidentia1  source  identified  as  T–3  was  interviewed  (Ex-
hibit  44).  T–3  stated  there  was  a  meeting  of  all  staff  at  the  Marshall  Space  Flight 
Center and ‘‘COBB humiliated and insulted the audit staff by stating that the audi-
tors were incompetent.’’ T–3 directly heard COBB say that he wanted the Audit Pro-
gram  Directors  to  be  relocated  to  Headquarters  so  they  ‘‘would  be  within  choking 
distance.’’ T–3 stated, ‘‘I thought this was a stupid thing to say.’’ T–3 felt humiliated 
and insulted by COBB. 

On  July  23,  2004,  COBB  sent  an  e-mail  to  all  OIG  staff  and  referred  to  all  the 
GS–15  Audit  Program  Directors  in  the  field  as  ‘‘surplus.’’  T–3  stated,  ‘‘I’ve  always 
had a good record, and it’s how I became a 15; to be referred to as surplus is insult-
ing and humiliating.’’ T–3 stated ‘‘the staff here are highly demoralized.’’ In discus-
sions T–3 has had with NASA OIG auditors, more staff would have responded ‘‘dis-
agreed,’’  however,  they  feared  the  responses  could  be  attributed  back  to  them.  T– 
3 also stated that there has been an ‘‘extremely high turnover,’’ and believes at least 
30 employees left last year alone. 

In  2005,  at  a  conference  held  at  the  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  (GSFC)  with 
all  the  NASA  audit  liaison  representatives,  someone  raised  the  question  to  COBB 
as  to  the  reason  for  the  high  turnover  rate  within  NASA  OIG.  T–3  stated  that 
COBB said he was ‘‘proud of the high turnover rate,’’ and referred to the people who 
had  left  as  ‘‘trash.’’  [redacted]  who  once  worked  in  NASA  OIG  and  now  is  an  audit 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00139 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

134 

liaison representative at the [redacted], told T–3 that he ‘‘was shocked’’ to hear that 
from COBB. 

On  March  20,  2006,  [redacted]  was  interviewed  (Exhibit  45).  [redacted]  described 
COBB’s  management  style  as  ‘‘kind  of  strange,’’  and  stated  that  you  ‘‘never  knew 
where  you  stood  with  him.’’  [redacted]  noted  that  to  his  knowledge,  COBB  did  not 
have a background in management prior to . . . 
Pages 266–271 

Allegation  67—Inspector  General  COBB,  former  NASA  Administrator  Sean 
O’Keefe  (O’Keefe),  and  former  NASA  General  Counsel  Paul  Pastorek  (Pastorek) 
would drink alcohol together. 
Investigative Findings 

[redacted] 
Special  Agent  BAHR.  OK.  Generally,  who  was  present  at  these  meetings  in  Mr. 

O’Keefe’s office at the end of the day? 

Mr.  HOWARD.  Who—it  varied.  Whoever  happened  to  have  any  business  to  be  tip 

there at the time. 

Special Agent BAHR. You mentioned the chief of staff? 
Mr. HOWARD. Right. 
Special Agent BAHR. Who was that at the time? 
Mr. HOWARD. It was—well, there were a couple. First, it was Courtney Staid, and 

then later it was John Schumacher. 

Special Agent BAHR. OK. How about the General Counsel for NASA? 
Mr. HOWARD. Yes, he would be there on occasion, Paul Pastorek. 
Special Agent BAHR. All right. Are you aware of—did—would they share in drink-

ing within Mr. O’Keefe’s office? Was there alcohol served? 

Mr. HOWARD. On some occasions I believe there was. Yes. 
Below  is  an  excerpt  from  the  transcript  of  COBB’s  interview  conducted  on  June 
27,  2006,  where  he  addresses  the  issue  of  drinking  alcohol  with  O’Keefe,  beginning 
at Page 102, line 12 (Exhibit 182). 

Q.  Was  there  ever  an  occasion  when  you  had  drinks  with  Mr.  O’Keefe  at  NASA 
headquarters within his office or anywhere—perhaps within your office or anywhere 
else within NASA headquarters? 

A.  I  can  remember  one  instance  where  I  had—O’Keefe  had  social  functions  that 
took  place  up  when  there  was  a  retiring  employee  or  some  type  of  event  like  that. 
There  would  be  social  functions  and  there  would  occasionally  be  alcohol  there.  I 
didn’t  go  pull  the  GSA  permit  for  whether  or  not  they  had  obtained  permission  in 
connection with that. 

I  can  recall  an  incident—not  an  incident,  an  instance  where  O’Keefe  gave  me  a 

drink in his office. 

Q.  OK.  Could  you  give  us  some  background  on  what  the  occasion  was,  why  were 
you  meeting  with  him?  How  did  it  come  about  that  you  were  sharing—were  you 
having a drink as well? 

A. I think he said to me that you look like you could use a drink, and I articulated 

that, OK. I don’t know what he said. But I had a drink. 

The  specific  instance  there  was  again  the  Columbia  accident  in  terms  of  the  im-
pact  on  the  agency,  like  the  Challenger,  there  were  tremendously  sensitive  issues 
associated  with—for  example,  I  bet  you  no  one  here  at  this  table  even  though 
they’re  fairly  familiar  with  the  Challenger  incident  has  any  understanding  of  what 
happened to the seven astronauts that were on that vessel. 

The  reason  is  that  NASA  is  extraordinarily  protective  of  that  information,  the 
well-being of the program, and the families of those who died. They know what hap-
pened. It is not like it’s a secret. It is known. But it is kept secret. 

Same  thing  is  true  in  connection  with  Columbia.  What  happened  with  respect  to 
each  of  the  dead  astronauts  is  something  that  is  well  known.  We  had  an  instance 
in February of 2004, where our service working with the Texas Rangers, this is one 
or—— 

Ms. BAHR. I’m sorry to interrupt you, but there will be a line of questioning later 
where  I  think  it  would  be  more  appropriate  to  address  this.  If  for  the  moment  we 
could go back to just what kind of interactions you had with Mr. O’Keefe, that would 
be most helpful. 

The  WITNESS.  Your  last  question  was  what  prompted  that  instance  where  I  can 
recall  having  a  drink  with  Mr.  O’Keefe.  I  think—I  can  recall  one  other  instance 
where that happened. It wasn’t with just O’Keefe. It was with other persons on his 
staff.  That  was  where  I  had  been  told  that  I  was  going  to  be  appointed  as  the  In-
spector General to the Coalition Provisional Authority. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00140 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

135 

I  think  that—I’m  not  positive.  I  think  that  he  might  have  invited  me  to  have  a 

Allegation  68—Inspector  General  COBB  played  golf  with  former  NASA  Adminis-

drink relating to that at that time. 

trator Sean O’Keefe (O’Keefe). 
Investigative Findings 

This  allegation  was  received  through  interviews  of  nine  individuals  who  alleged 
that  COBB  and  O’Keefe  played  golf  together.  Based  on  those  allegations  a  review 
of  COBB’s  e-mails  was  conducted.  The  following  are  e-mails  that  identify  instances 
where COBB discussed playing golf with O’Keefe: 
1. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: Robert Cobb 
To: Sean O’Keefe; 
CC: 
Subject: Re: 
Date: Tuesday, July 02, 2002 2:45:20 PM 
Attachments: 

I would love to, although kids and work have wrecked an at one time not embar-

rassing game. If the spot is still open, let me know details. 

At 10:38 AM 7/2/2002—0400, you wrote: 
Moose—don’t  recall  if  you  are  a  golfer—I’m  pulling  together  a  foursome  for  this 
Friday  AM,  Clay  Johnson  and  Alphonso  Jackson  (Deputy  Secy  at  HUD).  if  you’re 
interested, I’ll send along particulars. best for the 4th—Sean’’ 
2. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: SOKeefe@hq.nasa.gov 
To: rcobb@hq.nasa.gov; 
CC: 
Subject: Re: 
Date: Friday, July 11, 2003 2:13:24 PM 
Attachments: 

Fabulous—let’s  plan  to  meet  Sat  around  11:30  or  so  at  the  pro  shop  or  around 

the practice tee/putting green. Do recall how to get there? 
———Original Message——— 
From: Robert Cobb [rrcobb@hq.nasa.gov] 
Sent: 07/10/2003 05:48 PM 
To: ‘‘Sean O’keefe’ <sean.okeefe.nasa.gov> 
Cc: cobbj@sec.gov 
Subject: Re: 

yes— 
At 05:10 PM 7/10/2003—0400, you wrote: 
>Moose—you up for golf Sat around noon?>’’ 

3. E-mail Thread 
‘‘From: Robert Cobb 
To: sean.okeefe@nasa.gov 
CC: 
Subject: golf buddy 
Date: Monday, December 15, 2003 9:24:19 AM 
Attachments: 

What  was  the  name  of  the  guy  who  worked  at  the  Naval  Criminal  Investigative 

Service that we played golf with at Belmont?’’ 

On May 30, 2006, O’Keefe was interviewed and provided the following information 
(Exhibit  137).  O’Keefe  was  asked,  ‘‘Did  you  and  COBB  ever  meet  outside  of  work 
for drinks, golf, or other activities?’’ O’Keefe stated, ‘‘We did not socialize.’’ However, 
he  and  COBB  played  golf  together  once  or  twice.  O’Keefe  could  not  recall  when  or 
where  they  played  golf.  Asked,  ‘‘Did  you  golf  together  here  [Belmont  Country 
Club]?’’ O’Keefe stated, ‘‘I don’t recall.’’ Asked if he and COBB ever traveled together 
onboard  NASA  aircraft,  O’Keefe  stated  he  traveled  in  such  a  capacity  with  COBB 
once  or  twice,  but  could  not  recall  any  specific  flight  information.  Asked  if  he  ever 
traveled to Bermuda aboard a NASA aircraft, with COBB for the purpose of golfing, 
O’Keefe  stated  he  has  never  traveled  onboard  NASA  aircraft  and  engaged  in  golf 
activities following the official trip. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00141 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

136 

COBB  was  interviewed  on  June  27  and  29,  2006  (Exhibit  182).  His  response  to 
questions  associated  with  this  area  start  on  Page  81,  line  20  and  Page  94,  line  9 
of the transcript dated June 27, 2006. 

Q. Did you have any social relationship? 
A.  I  don’t—I  guess  these  kinds  of  questions  ask  for  me  to  expand  on  the  nature 
of  my  relationship  with  Mr.  O’Keefe.  I  had  a  business  relationship  with  him.  Did 
we  personally  enjoy  each  other’s  company?  I  don’t  know  let  [sic]  enjoyed  my  com-
pany.  To  me  it  was  advantageous  to  me  and  my  office  that  I  spend  a  lot  of  time 
as  much  time,  in  effect,  as  I  could  with  O’Keefe.  When  he  asked  me  to  come  out 
to  where  he  plays  golf,  I  accepted  that  invitation.  And  I  did  that  I  think  twice,  to 
go  out  and  play  golf  with  him.  Whether  that’s  a  social  relationship  or  a  business 
relationship,  I  can  tell  you  that—you  know—did  I  tell  him  I  had  kids?  Probably.  I 
tell  him  you  know—about  my  wife?  Probably.  Where  she  worked.  But  from  my 
standpoint—you  know—that  relationship  was  defined  by—you  know—my  carrying 
out  the  job  as  Inspector  General  of  the  agency  and  being  able  to  get  access  to  the 
person who’s chiefly responsible for policy and execution of the agency mission. 

Q.  I  agree  with  you  complete  frequently.  I  think  there  will  be  points  later  in  the 
interview  here  we’ll  be  able  to  do  that.  Let’s  go  back  to  the  relationship  between 
you  as  the  Inspector  General  and  the  agency  administrator.  You  noted  that  you  on 
approximately two occasions recall golfing with Mr. O’Keefe? 

A. Yes. 
Q. That would have been at his home in Virginia, correct? 
A. Yes. 
Q. Leesburg, I believe, Belmont? 
A. Yes. 

INTEGRITY COMMITTEE 
PRESIDENT’S COUNCIL ON INTEGRITY AND EFFICIENCY 
EXECUTIVE COUNCIL ON INTEGRITY AND EFFICIENCY 

Washington, DC, January 22, 2007 

Hon. CLAY JOHNSON III, 
Chairman, 
President’s & Executive Councils on Integrity and Efficiency, 
c/o United States Office of Management and Budget (OMB), 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Mr. Johnson: 

The purpose of this letter is to inform you of the determinations made by the In-
tegrity  Committee  (IC)  at  its  meeting  on  December  13,  2006,  regarding  allegations 
of  misconduct  on  the  part  of  Inspector  General  (IG)  Robert  Cobb,  National  Aero-
nautics and Space Administration (NASA). In summary, the IC determined that cer-
tain actions on the part of IG Cobb, described in detail below, amounted to an abuse 
of  authority.  Other  actions  taken  by  Cobb  were  viewed  as  creating  the  appearance 
of a lack of independence and as not adhering to the Quality Standards for Federal 
Offices of Inspector General promulgated by the PCIE and ECIE. I will first outline 
the procedural history of the case, follow with a discussion of the particular conduct 
on  the  part  of  IG  Cobb  which  the  IC  found  troubling,  and  conclude  with  comment 
about  some  of  the  matters  raised  in  the  correspondence  received  from  IG  Cobb  re-
garding the process. 
Case Initiation and Investigation 

Executive Order (EO) 12993 is the IC’s charter for review of allegations of admin-
istrative misconduct made against an IG. The EO provides that on receipt of allega-
tions, the IC shall first determine if there is a substantial likelihood that the allega-
tions  disclose  a  violation  of  any  law,  rule,  or  regulation,  or  gross  mismanagement, 
gross waste of funds, or abuse of authority. If the IC makes this preliminary deter-
mination, and further concludes that allegations cannot be referred to an agency of 
the  Executive  Branch  with  appropriate  jurisdiction  over  the  matter,  it  refers  the 
matter to the IC Chair who is to cause a thorough and timely investigation of alle-
gations to be conducted. 

During  its  meeting  on  December  12,  2005,  the  IC  reviewed  several  new  com-
plaints  against  IG  Cobb  and  concluded  there  was  a  need  for  an  administrative  in-
vestigation. The IC also reevaluated other allegations regarding IG Cobb that it pre-
viously reviewed but which had not been the subject of an investigation. These were 
reevaluated because the IC wished to consider the full picture and determine wheth-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00142 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

137 

er the pattern of activity disclosed violation of law, rule, or regulation, or amounted 
to gross mismanagement, gross waste of funds, or abuse of authority. Following the 
IC  decision  to  initiate  the  investigation,  as  IC  Chair,  I  requested  the  Housing  and 
Urban  Development  (HUD)  Office  of  Inspector  General  (OIG)  to  conduct  the  inves-
tigation. 

The IC forwarded complaints received against IG Cobb to the HUD OIG and their 
investigators  organized  the  case  into  79  separate  allegations.  The  HUD  OIG  con-
ducted a thorough investigation of 69 allegations and submitted its Report of Inves-
tigation (ROI) to the IC on August 30, 2006. The remaining 10 allegations were not 
investigated  by  the  HUD  OIG  based  on  their  conclusion  that  the  information  sup-
porting  the  allegations  was  too  vague  or  insufficient  to  justify  continuing  the  in-
quiry. The IC concurred with that assessment. The ROI prepared by the HUD OIG 
is  enclosed  for  your  review.  IG  Cobb  cooperated  with  this  investigation  and  was 
interviewed,  with  legal  counsel  present,  by  HUD  OIG  investigators  for  more  than 
10  hours  during  sessions  on  June  27  and  29,  2006.  At  the  conclusion  of  his  inter-
view,  IG  Cobb  was  allowed  to  both  review  and  supplement  his  deposition.  The  IC 
also  received  correspondence  from  IG  Cobb  during  its  review  of  the  matter  that  is 
also enclosed for your review. 
Integrity Committee Review of the Report of Investigation 

Over the course of three IC meetings, the allegations and the HUD OIG ROI were 
reviewed  and  discussed.  Utilizing  the  ROI,  the  IC  placed  the  allegations  into  four 
categories, as follows: 

1. Abusive work environment. 
2. Lack of independence. 
3. Audit Division reorganization. 
4. Other Matters. 

The  identifying  numbers  used  below  are  those  assigned  by  the  HUD  OIG.  They 
are referred to in this letter as a matter of convenience but they have no other sig-
nificance. 
Abusive Work Environment 

The  IC  evaluated  nine  allegations,  appearing  as  numbers  52,  53,  57,  58,  59,  60, 
61, 62, and 63 in the ROI, which fell under the broad category of abusive work envi-
ronment. The IC determined that ‘‘abusive work environment’’ fit under the EO for 
jurisdiction  purposes  through  the  ‘‘abuse  of  authority’’  clause.  The  term  ‘‘abuse  of 
authority’’ is defined in the IC Policies and Procedures as: 

arbitrary  or  capricious  exercise  of  power  by  a  Federal  official  or  employee  that 
adversely affects the rights of any person or that results in personal gain or ad-
vantage to himself or to preferred other persons. There is no de minimis stand-
ard for abuse of authority. 

Allegation  53  was  made  by:  [redacted]  allegations  are  confirmed  by  interviews  of 
two  witnesses.  According  to  the  ROI,  IG  Cobb  berated  the  [redacted]  using  a  loud 
and nasty tone that included profanity in front of the [redacted] to the point of caus-
ing  tears  and  her  departure  from  the  meeting.  When  the  staff  member  returned  to 
the  meeting  at  which  this  occurred,  she  informed  IG  Cobb  that  profanity  in  the 
workplace was not acceptable; IG Cobb did not apologize for his behavior. On other 
occasions, he screamed at the same individual over the issuance of a search warrant 
and  called  the  staff  member’s  work  a  ‘‘fucking  piece  of  shit’’  as  he  slammed  his  fist 
on the table next to the staff member. A witness confirms that IG Cobb’s treatment 
of  [redacted]  was  condescending,  berating,  and  demeaning.  IG  Cobb’s  treatment  of 
[redacted]  was  similar  in  that  he  routinely  yelled  and  screamed  at  the  individual 
as  part  of  disagreements  on  positions  taken  by  the  individual  in  investigative  mat-
ters. 

Three  other  witnesses  confirm  IG  Cobb’s  habitual  use  of  profanity  in  the  office 
while another, [redacted] confirms that IG Cobb referred to his staff as ‘‘fucksticks.’’ 
According to the witness, under IG Cobb there were constant threats and intimida-
tions creating in the witness’ view a ‘‘hostile work place.’’ Another witness describes 
IG’s  Cobb’s  lack  of  respect  for  NASA  OIG  employees  by  his  referring  to  Special 
Agents in the field as ‘‘knuckle draggers.’’ According to this senior employee, morale 
among NASA OIG staff was ‘‘horrible.’’ 

IG Cobb confirmed use of the F-word in his office and indicated he is ‘‘passionate 

when people are insubordinate to my face,’’ but denies, ‘‘cursing’’ at employees. 

The  IC  determined  IG  Cobb  engaged  in  an  abuse  of  authority  as  defined  by  the 
EO.  IG  Cobb’s  treatment  of  [redacted]  detailed  in  allegation  53  was  inconsistent 
with the high standards of conduct expected of senior executives. The IC viewed this 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00143 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

138 

as more than an aggressive management style or a way of expressing dissatisfaction 
with  employee  performance  but  as  arbitrary  or  capricious  conduct,  which  affected 
the rights of senior employees to a non-hostile and abusive workplace. 

The IC further determined that other conduct on the part of IC Cobb, as described 
in allegations 59 and 61 did occur. This conduct involved regular belittlement of the 
audit  staff  and  putting  his  feet  on  the  desk  in  the  face  of  those  sitting  opposite  as 
a  sign  of  disrespect.  The  IC  further  determined  the  conduct  did  not  rise  to  a  level 
of abuse of authority. 
Lack of Independence 

The  IC  considered  eighteen  allegations,  appearing  as  numbers  9,  10,  28,  29,  30, 
31,  32,  34,  35,  37,  47,  48,  49,  50,  51,  66,  67,  and  68  in  the  ROI,  which  fell  under 
the  broad  category  of  lack  of  independence.  The  starting  point  for  the  ICs  analysis 
is  EO  12805  which  established  the  President’s  Council  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency 
(PCIE)  and  the  Executive  Counsel  on  Integrity  and  Efficiency  (ECIE).  Section  3(c) 
of the EO provides that ‘‘[t]he individual members of the Councils should, to the ex-
tent  permitted  under  law,  adhere  to  the  professional  standards  developed  by  the 
Councils and participate in the plans, programs, and projects of the Councils.’’ 

In October 2003, the PCIE and ECIE promulgated the Quality Standards for Fed-
eral  Offices  of  Inspector  General,  which  sets  out  quality  standards  for  the  manage-
ment,  operation,  and  conduct  of  the  Federal  Offices  of  Inspector  General.  Section 
II.A.  of  the  Quality  Standards  establishes  general  standards  for  ethics,  independ-
ence,  and  confidentiality,  indicating  that  ‘‘[i]ndependence  is  a  critical  element  of  ob-
jectivity.  Without  independence,  both  in  fact  and  in  appearance,  objectivity  is  im-
paired.’’ Section II.C. describes the independence standard with more detail: 

The  Inspector  General  and  OIG  staff  must  be  free  both  in  fact  and  appearance 
from  personal,  external,  and  organizational  impairments  to  independence.  The 
Inspector General and OIG staff have a responsibility to maintain independence, 
so that opinions, conclusions, judgments, and recommendations will be impartial 
and  will  be  viewed  as  impartial  by  knowledgeable  third  parties.  The  Inspector 
General  and  OIG  staff  should  avoid  situations  that  could  lead  reasonable  third 
parties  with  knowledge  of  the  relevant  facts  and  circumstances  to  conclude  that 
the OIG is not able to maintain independence in conducting its work. 

Six of the eighteen allegations within the subset labeled as ‘‘lack of independence’’ 
indicate  that  IG  Cobb  sought  to  develop  and  maintain  a  close  relationship  with 
former NASA Administrator Sean O’Keefe and that this effort contributed to an ap-
pearance  that  his  independence  was  being  compromised.  The  ROI  and  IG  Cobb’s 
interview documents these efforts: 

staff at NASA Headquarters. 

at least two audits. 

Administrator O’Keefe was also traveling. 

ing the independence of the Columbia Accident Investigation Board. 

• IG Cobb frequently joined Administrator O’Keefe in lunches intended for senior 
• IG Cobb played golf on two occasions with Administrator O’Keefe. 
• IG  Cobb  used  the  NASA  aircraft  for  official  travel  on  several  occasions  when 
• IG Cobb referred to the Administrator as ‘‘his boss.’’ 
• IG  Cobb  sought  guidance  from  Administrator  O’Keefe  on  the  audit  design  for 
• IG  Cobb  sought  Administrator  O’Keefe’s  review  of  a  draft  OIG  opinion  regard-
• IG  Cobb  advised  Administrator  O’Keefe  about  search  warrants  to  be  issued  in 
a significant criminal investigation before those search warrants were executed. 
An  IG  is  required  to  keep  the  head  of  the  agency  fully  and  currently  informed 
about  fraud  and  other  serious  problems,  abuses,  or  deficiencies  relating  to  the  pro-
grams  and  operations  administered  or  financed  by  the  agency.  He  has  a  responsi-
bility  to  communicate  with  the  Administrator.  IG  Cobb  concedes  his  activities  and 
responds  that  he  has  a  ‘‘collaborative  approach’’  with  senior  management  and  spe-
cifically  agrees  with  the  policy  laid  out  by  Administrator  O’Keefe  that  an  OIG  has 
an  opportunity  to  add  value  to  an  organization.  None  of  these  instances,  standing 
alone, is sufficient to create an ‘‘appearance’’ problem, but it is the responsibility of 
the IG to consider how the combined affect of his interaction with the Agency head 
might  cloud  or  be  perceived  to  cloud  his  independence.  Against  this  backdrop,  the 
IC found two specific allegations warranting its detailed comment. 

The  fact  pattern  of  allegation  28  involved  a  June  2002  computer  intrusion  and 
theft  of  International  Traffic  in  Arms  Regulation  (ITAR)  designated  files  from  a 
NASA  server  worth  about  $1.9  billion.  The  matter  was  brought  to  the  attention  of 
NASA  by  a  news  reporter.  The  theft  of  ITAR  data  must  be  reported  to  the  State 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00144 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

139 

Department. The HUD OIG investigation revealed the primary responsibility to re-
port  the  theft/compromise  of  ITAR  data  was  the  responsibility  of  NASA’s  Office  of 
Security and Program Protection, known as ‘‘Code X.’’ However, the investigation re-
vealed that IG Cobb was aware that Code X was not reporting the theft/compromise 
and  IG  Cobb  took  no  action  to  ensure  the  reporting  was  made  to  the  State  Depart-
ment. The complainant believes that IG Cobb failed to report the matter to the De-
partment of State and Congress to avoid embarrassment for NASA management. 

Two  witnesses,  one  of  whom  was  [redacted]  opined  that  if  the  appropriate  NASA 
entity  failed  to  report  the  loss,  the  reporting  requirement  would  fall  onto  whoever 
had  oversight  over  NASA,  which  would  include  the  OIG.  Under  an  OIG’s  oversight 
role, IG Cobb should have recognized Code X’s misinterpretation of the reporting re-
quirement  and  ensured  that  the  proper  parties  were  alerted.  This  is  incumbent 
upon  the  IG  by  virtue  of  his  position.  Both  witnesses  questioned  the  independence 
of  IG  Cobb’s  decision  to  not  report  the  theft/compromise  or  work  to  ensure  Code  X 
reported the theft/compromise. One of the witnesses opined that IG Cobb prevented 
the  reporting  of  the  matter  because  he  was  attempting  to  prevent  public  disclosure 
that would have embarrassed NASA. Another witness said IG Cobb viewed Code X 
as  a  ‘‘source  of  grief’’  and  that  the  easiest  way  to  handle  matters  involving  Code  X 
was  to  ‘‘acquiesce’’  to  the  Code  X  Director.  Another  senior  NASA  OIG  official  pre-
pared  a  Memorandum  for  Record  (MFR),  dated  02/23/2006,  concerning  the  ITAR 
matter. The MFR states in part: 

It  took  over  a  year  for  the  loss  [referring  to  the  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center 
case]  to  be  assessed  by  DOD,  who  opined  the  stolen  ITAR  had  national  security 
implications  (no  further  information).  For  whatever  reason,  NASA  senior  man-
agement  [Code  X]  failed  to  report  the  loss.  By  definition  and  purpose  the  OIG’s 
oversight role, the IG [Cobb] should have recognized the Code X’s misinterpreta-
tion and misplaced emphasis and ensured the proper parties were alerted. Even 
after being coached by experienced OIG staff, the IG failed to act. 

IG  Cobb  said  he  directed  his  staff  to  prepare  a  report  regarding  the  compromise 
that  was  sent  to  the  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center  and  a  copy  provided  to  NASA 
management  in  April  2003.  In  his  supplemental  letter  IG  Cobb  indicates  that  any 
delay  in  preparing  that  report  was  a  result  of  his  insistence  that  the  NASA  OIG 
staff  do  the  grinding  work  to  produce  an  accurate  and  relevant  report.  IG  Cobb 
maintains  that  there  was  no  clear  legal  requirement  for  the  loss  to  be  reported  to 
the  Department  of  State  by  Code  X  and  that  the  matter  was  discussed  informally 
with the Department of State upon learning of the intrusion. 

Allegation  35  involves  IG  Cobb’s  actions  in  the  investigation  of  an  alleged  theft 
of jewelry from the remains of a Columbia Space Shuttle Astronaut. The Columbia 
Space  Shuttle  exploded  on  February  1,  2003,  during  re-entry  to  the  Earth’s  atmos-
phere.  The  explosion  initiated  over  Texas  en  route  to  the  planned  landing  at  Ken-
nedy Space Center. The remains of deceased Astronaut Laurel Clark were recovered 
shortly  after  the  Columbia  accident  and  a  ring  was  allegedly  present  on,  and  then 
stolen  from,  her  recovered  remains.  NASA  OIG,  in  partnership  with  the  Texas 
Rangers,  pursued  a  joint  investigation  into  the  theft.  As  part  of  the  investigative 
process,  the  Texas  Rangers  planned  to  release  a  ‘‘Crime  Stoppers  Report’’  to  the 
public to assist in the recovery of the stolen ring. 

[Redacted] the deceased Astronaut, and a NASA employee, supported the request 
for  public  assistance  to  find  his  wife’s  ring.  [Redacted]  said  he  met  personally  with 
IG Cobb who told him he would not issue a report on the investigation of the stolen 
ring. The meeting was tape recorded by [redacted]. At one point during the meeting, 
IG  Cobb  asked  [redacted]  to  turn  off  the  tape  recorder.  According  to  [redacted]  IG 
Cobb said the whole NASA Columbia investigation was not going well, NASA want-
ed  it  finished,  and  for  the  outcome  to  reveal  nothing  that  would  make  NASA  look 
bad or shake the public’s trust in NASA. 

Two  witnesses  interviewed  by  the  HUD  OIG  suggest  that  IG  Cobb  inserted  him-
self  in  the  investigation  with  the  intent  of  ensuring  NASA  would  not  be  embar-
rassed. [Redacted] states that when IG Cobb saw the Crime Stoppers Report, he (IG 
Cobb) went ‘‘ballistic.’’ He recalled that IG Cobb, when discussing the report, stated, 
‘‘how  can  you  even  think  of  allowing  this  to  go  out’’  and  ‘‘I  am  going  to  have  to  re-
sign  if  this  report  gets  out.’’  [Redacted]  stated  that  at  the  time  he  did  not  under-
stand  IG  Cobb’s  response,  but  later  learned  that  NASA  Administrator  O’Keefe  in-
structed everyone at NASA not to contact any Astronaut or their families. He opined 
that  IG  Cobb  believed  O’Keefe  was  his  ‘‘boss’’  and  IG  Cobb  would  do  whatever 
O’Keefe wanted. 

Another  NASA  employee  who  requests  confidentiality  recalls  IG  Cobb  saying, 
‘‘Can  you  believe  how  embarrassing  that  would  have  looked  for  the  agency  [NASA] 
if  that  [crime  stoppers  report]  went  out?’’  The  Texas  Ranger  involved  in  the  inves-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00145 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

140 

tigation  informed  HUD  OIG  that  he  believed  someone  at  NASA  wanted  the  inves-
tigation  shut  down  because  if  it  got  out  that  the  ring  was  stolen,  questions  would 
be asked as to the conduct of the whole NASA investigation into the Columbia acci-
dent. 

IG  Cobb  responds  that  the  decision  he  made  regarding  the  matter  was  that  his 
office  needed  to  conduct  additional  investigation  to  see  if  what  was  articulated  in 
the  draft  crime  stopper  notice  was  right  or  wrong.  He  questioned  the  evidence  that 
was  being  relied  on  to  conclude  that  a  ring  had  been  stolen  and  directed  further 
investigation be conducted before consenting to NASA OIG involvement in issuance 
of  any  public  notice  of  a  criminal  act.  In  IG  Cobb’s  view,  publication  of  the  notice 
based on the information would have been irresponsible. IG Cobb evaluated the evi-
dence  as  not  supporting  the  contention  that  the  ring  was  stolen  from  recovered  re-
mains but was lost along with millions of pieces of Columbia and all other personal 
effects of the astronauts over thousands of miles of Texas and Louisiana. 

The  IC  determined  that  neither  allegation  28  or  35  substantiated  an  actual  lack 
of  independence  on  the  part  of  IG  Cobb  that  could  be  characterized  as  gross  mis-
management,  gross  waste  of  funds,  abuse  of  authority,  or  a  violation  of  any  law, 
rule,  or  regulation  under  EO  12993.  The  facts  set  out  in  allegations  28  and  35  did 
substantiate  two  specific  instances  in  which  IG  Cobb’s  performance  caused  the  ap-
pearance  of  a  lack  of  independence  not  in  keeping  with  the  Quality  Standards  for 
Federal  Offices  of  Inspector  General.  IG  Cobb’s  decision  not  to  act  to  ensure  the 
ITAR  theft/compromise  was  reported  in  a  timely  manner  created  the  appearance  of 
a lack of independence. This determination augments the IC’s review of the matter 
in  2004  in  which  it  relied  only  on  the  allegation  and  a  response  from  IG  Cobb.  In 
that  review  the  IC  determined  that  IG  Cobb  had  not  engaged  in  any  wrongdoing. 
In  addition,  IG  Cobb’s  actions  associated  with  allegation  35,  including  his  state-
ments  to  [redacted]  and  a  confidential  witness,  created  the  appearance  of  lack  of 
independence  not  in  keeping  with  the  Quality  Standards  for  Federal  Offices  of  In-
spector General. While the Quality Standards do not have status of law, rule, or reg-
ulation, the IC views these standards as a benchmark for IG performance and appli-
cable  to  all  IGs  through  EO  12805,  Integrity  and  Efficiency  in  Federal  Programs. 
Audit Division Reorganization 

The  IC  considered  six  allegations,  appearing  as  numbers  12,  14,  15,  17,  18,  and 
19 in the ROI, concerning IG Cobb’s handling of audits and staffing for the auditing 
function  of  the  OIG.  The  thrust  of  these  allegations  was  that  IG  Cobb  reorganized 
the  office  several  times,  decreased  the  number  of  audit  reports  and  changed  their 
format making it difficult for auditors to know which format to follow, and generally 
slowed  the  audit  reporting  process  to  a  substantial  degree.  IG  Cobb’s  actions  were 
within the discretion of an IG. The IC determined that the ROI did not substantiate 
actions  by  IG  Cobb  that  amounted  to  gross  mismanagement,  gross  waste  of  funds, 
abuse  of  authority,  or  a  violation  of  any  law,  rule  or  regulation  as  it  relates  to  his 
handling of audit division reorganization matters. 
Other Matters 

The  IC  placed  all  remaining  allegations  in  a  general  category  referred  to  as 
‘‘Other.’’  In  its  review  of  theses  allegations,  the  IC  determined  that  they  were  not 
substantiated by information in the ROI, indicated no wrongdoing by IG Cobb, were 
outside the purview of the IC, or did not warrant further investigation. It is impor-
tant to note that within this category there were some allegations involving whistle-
blower retaliation which is an area outside the purview of the IC. The whistleblower 
retaliation  allegations  were  referred  to  the  Office  of  Special  Counsel,  the  agency 
with the appropriate authority to conduct inquiries on such matters. 
Conclusion 

The  IC  concludes  that  IG  Cobb  engaged  in  abuse  of  authority  as  an  Inspector 
General  by  creating  an  abusive  work  environment.  In  addition,  IG  Cobb’s  actions 
created  an  appearance  of  a  lack  of  independence  outside  the  quality  standards  ex-
pected of an IG when he did not report the theft of NASA ITAR files and prevented 
the dissemination of a Crime Stoppers Report. 
Issues of Due Process 

During  the  course  of  the  IC  inquiry,  IG  Cobb  expressed  dissatisfaction  with  the 
IC process in multiple letters. He questioned the methodology by which IC directed 
an investigation, the degree of due process for him in that methodology, his inability 
to  review  the  report  prepared  by  the  HUD  OIG  before  it  was  presented  to  the  IC, 
and  what  he  perceives  as  a  lack  of  fairness  to  him  during  the  course  of  the  inves-
tigation and the IC review. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00146 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

141 

The  decision  to  investigate  was  made  by  the  IC.  IG  Cobb  received  notice  that  an 
outside  investigation  would  ensue.  The  letter  did  not  purport  to  identify  all  of  the 
matters  to  be  investigated,  but  as  IG  Cobb  was  later  informed,  this  letter  was  not 
intended  to  limit  the  authority  of  the  IC  to  review  other  allegations  of  wrongdoing. 
IG  Cobb  was  generally  cognizant  of  the  matters  under  investigation  and  answered 
extensively  in  the  questioning  during  his  interview.  He  was  provided  a  copy  of  his 
interview  transcript  and  given  the  opportunity  to  comment  on  the  accuracy  of  the 
transcription  or  submit  additional  matters  for  consideration  by  the  IC  prior  to  IC’s 
review  of  the  report.  His  interview  regarding  allegations  28,  35,  and  53  was  exten-
sive  and  he  responded  with  seemingly  clear  knowledge  of  the  matters  about  which 
he was being questioned. 

In  subsequent  correspondence  to  the  IC,  IG  Cobb  did  not  question  the  accuracy 
of  the  transcription  and  did  submit  additional  matters  to  the  IC  that  went  to  the 
substance of allegations. IG Cobb’s materials dealt generally with the matter of lack 
of  independence  and  specifically  with  the  substance  of  allegations  28  and  35,  the 
compromise of ITAR data and Astronaut Clark’s missing ring respectively. The addi-
tional information submitted by IG Cobb was provided to IC members shortly after 
it was received. While IG Cobb may not have been sent a letter detailing the specific 
allegations  being  investigated,  he  was  more  than  able  to  respond  to  the  allegations 
which  ultimately  form  the  basis  for  the  IC’s  determinations  in  this  case.  IG  Cobb 
also  offered  the  names  of  witnesses  to  be  interviewed  by  the  HUD  OIG  and  later 
suggested  questions  for  those  interviews.  Some  of  those  individuals  had  been  inter-
viewed  by  the  HUD  OIG  but  others,  including  many  from  outside  the  agency,  were 
not. 

IG Cobb did not receive a copy of the ROI prepared by the HUD OIG at the con-
clusion  of  the  investigation  under  the  Policy  and  Procedures  of  the  IC.  The  ROI  is 
available to him under the Privacy Act and implementing regulations of the Depart-
ment of Justice. He has already submitted a request for the ROI which will be pro-
vided to him through that mechanism. The copy he receives will be redacted of per-
sonal  information  and  other  information  as  allowed  by  the  Privacy  Act  and  imple-
menting regulations. 

IG  Cobb  will  be  notified  that  the  IC  has  concluded  its  review  and  is  forwarding 
the  matter  for  your  consideration.  He  has  not  been  informed  about  the  IC’s  deter-
minations or provided a copy of this letter. 
Outside Inquiries 

The  IC  has  received  both  media  and  Congressional  inquiries  concerning  this  in-
vestigation.  As  part  of  the  PCIE/ECIE,  the  IC  considers  its  review  a  component  of 
the  overall  process  which  you,  as  Chairman,  have  ultimate  authority.  Neither  the 
IC,  nor  its  members  will  provide  any  information  or  briefing  on  this  matter  unless 
it is specifically approved by your office. Until advised otherwise, as IC Chair, I will 
refer all media and Congressional requests on this matter to your office. 
Please contact me if I can be of any further assistance in this matter. 

Sincerely, 

JAMES H. BURRUS, JR. 
Chair, Integrity Committee. 

Æ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  13:06 Jul 16, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00147 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\SCST607 SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

